{"Para-aminobenzoic acid": {"Symptoms": ["Coma", "Diarrhea", "Dizziness", "Eye irritation if it touches the eyes", "Fever", "Liver failure", "Nausea", "Rash (allergic)", "Shortness of breath", "Slowed breathing", "Stupor (altered thinking and decreased level of consciousness)", "Vomiting "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Potter syndrome": {"description": "Potter syndrome and Potter phenotype refers to a group of findings associated with a lack of amniotic fluid and kidney failure in an unborn infant. ", "Symptoms": ["Widely separated eyes with epicanthal folds, broad nasal bridge, low set ears, and receding chin", "Absence of urine output", "Difficulty breathing"], "Exams and Tests": "A pregnancy ultrasound may show lack of amniotic fluid, absence of fetal kidneys, or severely abnormal kidneys in the unborn baby.The following tests may be used to help diagnose the condition in a newborn:X-ray of the abdomen, X-ray of the lungs. ", "Causes": "In Potter syndrome, the primary problem is kidney failure. The kidneys fail to develop properly as the baby is growing in the womb. The kidneys normally produce the amniotic fluid (as urine).Potter phenotype refers to a typical facial appearance that occurs in a newborn when there is no amniotic fluid. The lack of amniotic fluid is called oligohydramnios. Without amniotic fluid, the infant is not cushioned from the walls of the uterus. The pressure of the uterine wall leads to an unusual facial appearance, including widely separated eyes.Potter phenotype may also lead to abnormal limbs, or limbs that are held in abnormal positions or contractures.Oligohydramnios also stops development of the lungs, so the lungs do not work properly at birth. ", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention.", "Treatment": "Resuscitation at delivery may be attempted pending the diagnosis. Treatment will be provided for any urinary outlet obstruction."}, "Philodendron poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Burning and painful eyes", "Burning in mouth and throat", "Diarrhea", "Irritated skin", "Nausea", "Slurred speech", "Swelling of mouth", "Swelling of tongue", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Do not touch or eat any plant with which you are not familiar. Wash your hands after working in the garden or walking in the woods."}, "Patent ductus arteriosus": {"Symptoms": ["Fast breathing", "Poor feeding habits", "Rapid pulse", "Shortness of breath ", "Sweating while feeding", "Tiring very easily", "Poor growth"], "Exams and Tests": "Babies with PDA often have a heart murmur that can be heard with a stethoscope. However, in premature infants, a heart murmur may not be heard.\u00a0The health care provider\u00a0may suspect the condition if the infant has breathing or feeding problems soon after birth.Changes may be seen on chest x-rays. The diagnosis is confirmed with an echocardiogram.Sometimes, a small PDA may not be diagnosed until later in childhood.", "description": "PDA leads to abnormal blood flow between the aorta and pulmonary artery, two major blood vessels that carry blood from the heart.", "Causes": "PDA affects girls more often than boys. The condition is more common in premature infants and those with neonatal respiratory distress syndrome. Infants with genetic disorders, such as Down syndrome, or babies whose mothers had rubella during pregnancy are at higher risk for PDA.PDA is common in babies with congenital heart problems, such as hypoplastic left heart syndrome, transposition of the great vessels, and pulmonary stenosis.", "Treatment": "If there are no other heart defects present, often the goal of treatment is to close the PDA. If the baby has certain other heart problems or defects, keeping the ductus arteriosus open may be lifesaving. Medicine may be used to stop it from closing.Sometimes, a PDA may close on its own. In premature babies, it often closes within the first 2 years of life. In full-term infants, a PDA that remains open after the first several weeks rarely closes on its own.When treatment is needed, medications such as indomethacin or ibuprofen are often the first choice. Medicines can work very well for some newborns, with few side effects. The earlier treatment is given, the more likely it is to succeed.If these measures do not work or can't be used, the baby may need to have a medical procedure.A transcatheter device closure is a procedure that uses a thin, hollow tube placed into a blood vessel. The doctor passes a small metal coil or other blocking device through the catheter to the site of the PDA. This blocks blood flow through the vessel. These coils can help the baby avoid surgery.Surgery may be needed if the catheter procedure does not work or it cannot be used due to the baby\u2019s size or other reasons. Surgery involves making a small cut between the ribs to repair the PDA.\r\n"}, "Pentobarbital overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Heart and blood vessels:Heart failure, Low blood pressure, Weak pulse. ", "Heart failure", "Low blood pressure", "Weak pulse", "Kidneys and bladderKidney failure (possible). ", "Kidney failure (possible)", "LungsDifficulty breathing, Slowed or stopped breathing, Pneumonia (possible). ", "Difficulty breathing", "Slowed or stopped breathing", "Pneumonia (possible)", "Nervous systemComa, Confusion, Decreased energy, Delirium, Headache, Sleepiness, Slurred speech, Unsteady gait. ", "Coma", "Confusion", "Decreased energy", "Delirium", "Headache", "Sleepiness", "Slurred speech", "Unsteady gait", "SkinLarge blisters, Rash. ", "Large blisters", "Rash"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Pelvic inflammatory disease (PID)": {"description": "Pelvic inflammatory disease is an infection of a woman's womb (uterus), ovaries, or fallopian tubes. ", "Possible Complications": "PID infections can cause scarring of the pelvic organs. This can lead t:Chronic pelvic pain, Ectopic pregnancy, Infertility, Tubo-ovarian abscess . If you have a serious infection that doesn't improve with antibiotics, you may need surgery.", "Symptoms": ["Fever", "Pain or tenderness in the pelvis, lower belly, or lower back", "Fluid from your vagina that has an unusual color, texture, or smell ", "Bleeding after intercourse", "Chills", "Being very tired", "Pain when you urinate", "Having to urinate often", "Period cramps\u00a0that hurt more than usual or last longer than usual", "Unusual bleeding or spotting during your period", "Not feeling hungry", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "Skipping your period", "Pain when you have intercourse "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider may do a pelvic exam to look for:Bleeding from your cervix. The cervix is the opening to your uterus., Fluid coming out of your cervix, Pain when your cervix is touched, Tenderness in your uterus, tubes, or ovaries . You may have lab tests to check for signs of infection:C-reactive protein (CRP), Erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), WBC count. Other tests include:A swab taken of your vagina or cervix. This sample will be checked for gonorrhea, chlamydia, or other causes of PID., Pelvic ultrasound or CT scan to see what else may be causing your symptoms. Appendicitis or pockets of infection around your tubes and ovaries may cause similar symptoms., Pregnancy test. ", "Treatment": "Your doctor will often have you start taking antibiotics while waiting for your test results.If you have mild PID:Your health care provider will give you a shot containing an antibiotic., You will be sent home with antibiotic pills to take for up to 2 weeks., You will need to follow up closely with your health care provider. . If you have more severe PID:You may need to stay in the hospital., You may be given antibiotics through a vein (IV)., Later, you may be given antibiotic pills to take by mouth. . There are many different antibiotics that can treat PID. Some are safe for pregnant women. Which type you take depends on the cause of the infection. You may receive a different treatment if you have gonorrhea or chlamydia.If your PID is caused by an STI like gonorrhea or chlamydia, your sexual partner must be treated as well.If you have more than one sexual partner, they must all be treated., If your partner is not treated, he or she can infect you again, or can infect\u00a0other people in the future., Both you and your partner must finish taking all of your antibiotics., Use condoms until you both have finished taking antibiotics. . ", "Causes": "Pelvic inflammatory disease (PID) is an infection caused by bacteria. When bacteria from the vagina or cervix travel to your womb, fallopian tubes, or ovaries\u00a0they can cause an infection.Most of the time, PID is caused by bacteria from chlamydia and gonorrhea. These are sexually transmitted infections (STIs). Having unprotected sex with someone who has an STI can cause PID. Bacteria can also enter your body during a medical procedure such as:Childbirth, Endometrial biopsy (removing a small piece of your womb lining\u00a0to test for cancer), Getting an intrauterine device (IUD), Miscarriage, Abortion. In the U.S., nearly 1 million women have PID each year. About 1 in 8 sexually active girls will have PID before age 20.You are more likely to get PID if:You have a male sex partner with gonorrhea or chlamydia., You have sex with many different people., You have had an STI in the past., You have recently had PID., You have recently gotten an IUD., You have had sex before age 20. . ", "Prevention": "Get prompt treatment for STIs.You can prevent PID by practicing safe sex.The only absolute way to prevent an STI is to not have sex (abstinence)., You can reduce your risk by having a sexual relationship with only one person. This is called being monogamous., Your risk will also be reduced\u00a0if you and your sexual partners get tested for STIs before starting a sexual relationship., Using a condom every time you have sex also reduces your risk. . Here is how you can reduce your risk of PID:Get regular STI screening exams., If you are a new couple, get tested before starting to have sex. Testing can detect infections that aren't causing symptoms., If you are a sexually active woman age 25 or younger, get screened each year for chlamydia and gonorrhea., All women with new sexual partners or multiple partners should also be screened. . "}, "Phonological disorder": {"description": "Children with phonological disorder do not use some or all of the speech sounds expected for their age group.", "Possible Complications": "In severe cases, the child may have problems being understood even by family members. In milder forms, the child may have difficulty being understood by people outside the immediate family. Problems with social interaction and academic performance may occur as a result.", "Symptoms": ["The child should make most sounds correctly by age 4 or 5, except for a few sounds such as l,s, r, v, z, ch, sh, and th.", "Some of the more difficult sounds may not be completely correct, even by age 7 or 8. ", "Problems with words that begin with two consonants. \"Friend\" becomes \"fiend\" and \"spoon\" becomes \"soon.\"", "Problems with words that have a certain sound, such as words with \"k,\" \"g,\" or \"r.\" The child may either leave out these sounds, not pronounce them clearly, or use a different sound in their place. (Examples include: \"boo\" for \"book,\" \"wabbit\" for \"rabbit,\" \"nana\" for \"banana,\" \"wed\" for \"red,\" and making the \"s\" sound with a whistle.) "], "Exams and Tests": "Children should be examined for disorders such as:Cognitive problems (such as intellectual disability), Hearing impairment, Neurological conditions (such as cerebral palsy), Physical problems (such as cleft palate). The health care provider should ask about issues, such as whether more than one language or a certain dialect is spoken at home.", "Treatment": "Milder forms of this disorder may disappear on their own by around age 6.Speech therapy may be helpful for more severe symptoms or speech problems that do not get better. Therapy may help the child create the sound, for example by showing where to place the tongue or how to form the lips when making a sound. ", "Causes": "This disorder is more common in boys. The cause of phonological disorder in children is often unknown. Close relatives may have had speech and language problems. Other risk factors may include poverty and coming from a large family.Phonological disorders may also be caused by:Problems or changes in the structure or shape of the muscles and bones that are used to make speech sounds. These changes may include cleft palate and problems with the teeth., Damage to parts of the brain or the nerves that control how the muscles and other structures work to create speech (such as from cerebral palsy). . "}, "Primary thrombocythemia": {"description": "Primary thrombocythemia is when the bone marrow is making too many platelets without a known cause. Platelets are needed for blood clotting.", "Possible Complications": "Acute leukemia or myelofibrosis, Severe bleeding (hemorrhage), Thrombotic episodes (stroke, heart attack, or blood clots in the hands or feet). ", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding from the gastrointestinal tract, respiratory system, urinary tract, or skin", "Bleeding from the gums", "Bleeding (prolonged) from surgical procedures or tooth removal", "Dizziness and headaches", "Easy bruising and nosebleeds (epistaxis) \r\n ", "Numbness of the hands or feet", "Ulcers on the fingers or toes"], "Exams and Tests": "Most of the time, this condition is found through blood tests done for other conditions before symptoms appear.Your health care provider will do a physical exam to look for an enlarged spleen or liver. You may also have abnormal blood flow in the toes or feet that causes skin damage in these areas.Other tests may include:Bone marrow aspiration and biopsy, CBC, Genetic tests (to look for a change in the JAK2 gene), Uric acid level. ", "Treatment": "The doctors can do a procedure to remove platelets directly from the blood if you have life-threatening complications.Long-term, you will need to take medicines to decrease the platelet count and avoid complications. The most common of these medicines are hydroxyurea, interferon-alpha, or anagrelide.\u00a0In some people with a JAK2 mutation, specific inhibitors of the JAK2 protein may be used.In people who are at a high risk for clotting, aspirin at a low dose (81 to 100 mg per day) decreases clotting episodes. People who may benefit from this treatment include older persons and people with very high platelet levels or who have had past clotting episodes.Many people do not need any treatment. However, the health care provider should monitor your condition.", "Causes": "Primary thrombocythemia is caused by too much growth of a type of cell that is used to make blood cells. The platelets are mostly affected, but the red blood cells and white blood cells may be involved as well. This condition slowly gets worse over time. Because these platelets do not work normally, bleeding is a common problem.The disease is part of a group of conditions known myeloproliferative disorders. Others include:Chronic myelogenous leukemia, Polycythemia vera, Primary myelofibrosis. Most of the time, this condition affects people in middle age. It is also seen in younger people, especially women under age 40."}, "Poison ivy - oak - sumac": {"Symptoms": ["Blisters", "Burning skin", "Itching", "Redness of the skin", "Swelling "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Wear protective clothing whenever possible when travelling through terrain which is known to harbor these plants. Do not touch or eat any plant with which you are not familiar. Wash your hands after working in the garden or walking in the woods."}, "Primary lymphoma of the brain": {"description": "Primary lymphoma of the brain is cancer of white blood cells that starts in the brain.", "Possible Complications": "Possible complications include:Chemotherapy side effects, including low blood counts, Radiation side effects, including confusion, headaches, nervous system (neurologic) problems, and tissue death, Return (recurrence) of the lymphoma. ", "Symptoms": ["Changes in speech", "Changes in vision", "Confusion", "Fever ", "Hallucinations", "Headaches", "Leaning to one side when walking", "Loss of coordination", "Numbness to hot, cold, and pain", "Personality changes", "Seizures", "Weakness in hands", "Weight loss "], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests may be done to help diagnose a primary lymphoma of the brain:Biopsy of the brain, Head CT scan or MRI, Spinal tap (lumbar puncture). ", "Treatment": "Primary lymphoma of the brain is usually first treated with corticosteroids to control swelling and improve symptoms. The main treatment is with chemotherapy.Younger patients may receive high-dose chemotherapy, followed by an autologous stem cell transplant.Radiation therapy of the whole brain may be done after chemotherapy.Boosting the immune system, such as in those with HIV, may also be tried.", "Causes": "The cause of primary brain lymphoma is not known. Patients who have a weakened immune system are at high risk of primary lymphoma of the brain. Common causes of a weakened immune system include HIV and having had an organ transplant (especially heart transplant).Primary lymphoma of the brain may be linked to Epstein-Barr Virus (EBV), especially in people with HIV. This is the virus that causes mononucleosis.Primary brain lymphoma is more common in people ages 45 to 70. The rate of primary brain lymphoma is rising. But this cancer is still very rare."}, "Potassium carbonate poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain - severe", "Blood pressure rapidly drops", "Breathing difficulties due to swelling of the throat", "Collapse", "Diarrhea", "Mouth pain - severe", "Throat pain - severe"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a\u00a0local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Pellagra": {"Symptoms": ["Delusions", "Diarrhea", "Inflamed mucus membranes", "Mental confusion", "Scaly skin sores"], "description": "Pellagra is a disease that occurs when a person does not get enough niacin (one of the B complex vitamins) or tryptophan (an amino acid).", "Causes": "Pellagra is caused by having too little niacin or tryptophan in the diet. It can also occur if the body fails to absorb these nutrients. It may develop after gastrointestinal diseases or with alcoholism.The disease is common in parts of the world where people have a lot of corn in their diet."}, "Presbyopia": {"description": "Presbyopia is a condition in which the lens of the eye loses its ability to focus. This makes it hard to see objects up close.", "Possible Complications": "Vision difficulty that gets worse over time and is not corrected can cause problems with driving, lifestyle, or work.", "Symptoms": ["Decreased focusing ability for near objects\r\n  ", "Eyestrain\r\n  ", "Headache"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a general eye exam. This will include measurements to determine a prescription for glasses or contact lenses.Tests may include:Exam of the retina, Muscle integrity test, Refraction test, Slit-lamp test, Visual acuity. ", "Treatment": "There is no cure for presbyopia, but it can be corrected with glasses or contact lenses. In some cases, adding bifocals to an existing lens prescription is enough. The bifocal prescription will need to be strengthened as you lose the ability to focus up close. Most peoples' eyes have lost the elasticity needed to focus up close by age 65. However, you may still be able to read with the help of the right prescription. You may find that you need to hold reading materials farther away, and you may need larger print and more light for reading. People who do not need glasses for distance vision may only need half glasses or reading glasses.People who are nearsighted may be able to take off their distance glasses to read.With the use of contact lenses, some people choose to correct one eye for near and one eye for far vision. This is called \"monovision.\" The technique eliminates the need for bifocals or reading glasses, but it can affect depth perception.Sometimes monovision can be produced through laser vision correction. There are also bifocal contact lenses that can correct for both near and far vision in both eyes.New surgical procedures are being evaluated that can also provide solutions for people who do not want to wear glasses or contacts. One promising procedure involves implanting a lens or a pinhole membrane in the cornea. Procedures very often can be reversed, if necessary.", "Causes": "The lens needs to change its length or shape to focus on objects that are close. The ability of the lens to change shape is called the elasticity of the lens. This elasticity decreases slowly as people age. The result is a slow loss in the ability of the eye to focus on nearby objects.People most often begin to notice the condition at around age 45, when they realize that they need to hold reading materials farther away in order to focus on them. Presbyopia is a natural part of the aging process and it affects everyone.", "Prevention": "There is no proven prevention for presbyopia."}, "Piroxicam overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Airways and lungs \r\n\r\nRapid breathing, Slow, labored breathing, Wheezing. ", "Rapid breathing", "Slow, labored breathing", "Wheezing", "Eyes, ears, nose, and throat \r\n\r\nRinging in the ears, Blurred vision. ", "Ringing in the ears", "Blurred vision", "Nervous system \r\n\r\nAgitation, Coma, Confusion, Convulsions, Drowsiness, Headache (severe), Incoherence (not understandable), Movement disorder, Unsteadiness. ", "Agitation", "Coma", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Drowsiness", "Headache (severe)", "Incoherence (not understandable)", "Movement disorder", "Unsteadiness", "Skin \r\n\r\nRash. ", "Rash", "Stomach and intestines \r\n\r\nDiarrhea, Nausea, Stomach pain (possible bleeding in the stomach and intestines), Vomiting. ", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Stomach pain (possible bleeding in the stomach and intestines)", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Pulmonary arteriovenous fistula": {"description": "Pulmonary arteriovenous fistula is an abnormal connection between an artery and vein in the lungs. As a result, blood passes through the lungs without receiving enough oxygen.", "Possible Complications": "Major complications after treatment for this condition are unusual. Complications may include:Bleeding in the lung, Stroke due to blood clot that travels from the lungs to the arms, legs, or brain (paradoxical venous embolism), Infection in the brain or heart valve, especially in patients with HHT. ", "Symptoms": ["Bloody sputum", "Difficulty breathing", "Difficulty exercising", "Nosebleeds", "Shortness of breath with exertion", "Blue skin (cyanosis)", "Clubbing of the fingers"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you. The exam may show:Abnormal blood vessels (telangiectasias) on the skin or mucus membranes, Abnormal sound, called a murmur when a stethoscope is placed over the abnormal blood vessel. Tests that may be done include:Arterial blood gas, with and without oxygen, Complete blood count (CBC), Chest x-ray, Chest CT scan, Echocardiogram, Liver function tests, Perfusion radionuclide lung scan, Pulmonary arteriogram. ", "Treatment": "A small number of patients who have no symptoms may not need treatment. For most patients with fistulas, the treatment of choice is to block the fistula during an arteriogram (embolization).Some patients may need surgery to remove the abnormal vessels and nearby lung tissue.When arteriovenous fistulas are caused by liver disease, the treatment is a liver transplant.", "Causes": "Pulmonary arteriovenous fistulas are usually the result of abnormal development of the blood vessels of the lung. Most occur in patients with Rendu-Osler-Weber disease (ROWD) \u2013 now commonly called hereditary hemorrhagic telangiectasia (HHT). These patients often have abnormal blood vessels in many parts of the body, including the lung.Fistulas also can be a complication of liver disease or lung injury, although this is much less common.", "Prevention": "Because this condition is often genetic, prevention is not usually possible."}, "Phenothiazine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["No breathing", "Rapid breathing", "Shallow breathing ", "Retention of urine (unable to empty bladder) ", "Blurred vision", "Congested nose", "Drooling", "Dry mouth", "Swallowing difficulties", "Ulcers in the mouth, on the tongue, or in the throat", "Vision color changes (things look brownish)", "Yellow eyes ", "High or severely low blood pressure", "Irregular heartbeat", "Rapid heartbeat ", "Muscle spasms, particularly of the neck, face, and back", "Muscle stiffness ", "Agitation", "Clumsiness", "Coma", "Confusion", "Convulsions", "Deep sleep", "Difficulty walking or shuffling gait", "Fainting", "Hallucinations (rare)", "Uncoordination", "Irritability", "Needing to move, restlessness (dystonia)", "Tremor", "Weakness ", "Rapid sunburn if exposed to the sun", "Skin discoloration, bluish (changing to purplish) ", "Constipation", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea ", "Changes in menstrual pattern (in women, from chronic doses)", "Fever", "Low body temperature (hypothermia) "], "description": "This article is for information only, NOT for use in treating or managing an actual overdose. If you have overdosed or been exposed to poison, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medications in childproof containers out of the reach of children."}, "Persistent depressive disorder": {"Symptoms": ["Feelings of hopelessness", "Too little or too much sleep", "Low energy or fatigue", "Low self-esteem", "Poor appetite or overeating", "Poor concentration "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will take a history of your mood and other mental health symptoms. The health care provider may also check your blood and urine to rule out medical causes of depression.", "description": "Persistent depressive disorder used to be called dysthymia.", "Causes": "The exact cause of\u00a0persistent depressive disorder (PDD)\u00a0is unknown. It tends to run in families.\u00a0PDD occurs more often in women.Most people with\u00a0PDD will also have an episode of major depression at some point in their lives.Older people with\u00a0PDD often have difficulty caring for themselves, isolation, or medical illness.\u00a0", "Treatment": "There are a number of things you can try to improve PDD:Get enough sleep., Follow a healthy, nutritious diet., Take medicines correctly. Discuss any side effects with your doctor., Learn to watch for early signs that your\u00a0PDD is getting worse. Have a plan for how to respond if it does., Try to exercise regularly., Look for activities that make you happy., Talk to someone you trust about how you are feeling., Surround yourself with people who are caring and positive., Avoid alcohol and illegal drugs. These can make your mood worse over time and impair your judgment.. Medicines are often effective for PDD, though they sometimes do not work as well as they do for major depression and they\u00a0may take longer to work.Do not stop taking your medicine on your own, even if you feel better or have side effects. Always call your doctor first.When it is time to stop your medicine, your doctor will instruct you on how to\u00a0slowly reduce the dose instead of stopping suddenly.People with\u00a0PDD may also be helped by some type of talk therapy. Talk therapy is a good place to talk about feelings and thoughts, and to learn ways to deal with them. Types of talk therapy include:Cognitive behavioral therapy (CBT), which helps you learn to be more aware of your symptoms and what makes them worse. You will be taught problem-solving skills., Insight-oriented or psychotherapy, which can help people with\u00a0PDD understand factors that may be behind their depressive thoughts and feelings. . Joining a support group for people who are having problems like yours can also help. Ask your therapist or health care provider to recommend a group.\u00a0 "}, "Parkinson disease": {"description": "Parkinson disease causes certain brain cells to die. These are the cells that help control movement and coordination. The disease leads to shaking (tremors) and trouble walking and moving.", "Possible Complications": "Difficulty performing daily activities, Difficulty swallowing or eating, Disability (differs from person to person), Injuries from falls, Pneumonia from breathing in saliva, Side effects of medications . ", "Symptoms": ["Problems with balance and walking", "Rigid or stiff muscles", "Muscle aches and pains", "Low blood pressure when you stand up", "Stooped posture", "Constipation", "Sweating and not being able to control your body temperature", "Slow blinking", "Difficulty swallowing", "Drooling", "Slowed, quieter speech and monotone voice", "No expression in your face (like you are wearing a mask) ", "Difficulty starting movement, such as starting to walk or getting out of a chair", "Difficulty continuing to move", "Slowed movements", "Loss of small hand movements (writing may become small and difficult to read)", "Difficulty eating ", "Usually occur when your limbs are not\u00a0moving; this is called resting tremor", "Occur when your arm or leg is held out", "Go away when you move", "May be worse when you are tired, excited, or stressed", "Can cause you to rub your finger and thumb together without meaning to (called pill-rolling tremor)", "Eventually may occur in your head, lips, tongue, and feet ", "Anxiety, stress, and tension", "Confusion", "Dementia", "Depression", "Fainting", "Memory loss "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider may be able to diagnose Parkinson disease based on your symptoms and a physical exam. But the symptoms can be hard to pin down, particularly in older adults. Symptoms are easier to recognize as the illness gets worse.The examination may show:Difficulty starting or finishing a movement, Jerky, stiff movements, Muscle loss, Shaking (tremors), Changes in your heart rate, Normal muscle reflexes . Your doctor may do some tests to rule out other conditions that can cause similar symptoms. ", "Treatment": "There is no cure for Parkinson disease, but treatment can help control your symptoms.MEDICINEYour health care provider will prescribe medicines to help control your shaking and movement symptoms. These drugs work by increasing dopamine in your brain. At certain times during the day, the medicine often wears off and symptoms can return. If this happens, your health care provider may need to change the:Type of medicine, Dose, Amount of time between doses, Way you take\u00a0the medicine . You may also need to take medicines to help with:Mood and thinking problems, Pain relief, Sleep problems . Parkinson medicines can cause severe side effects, including:Confusion, Seeing or hearing things that are not\u00a0there (hallucinations), Nausea, vomiting, or diarrhea, Feeling light-headed or fainting, Behaviors that are hard to control, such as gambling, Delirium. Tell your doctor right away if you have these side effects. Never change or stop taking any medicines without talking with your doctor. Work with your doctors and other providers to find a treatment plan that works for you.As the disease gets worse, symptoms such as stooped posture, frozen movements, and speech problems may not respond to the medicines.SURGERYSurgery may be an option for some people. Surgery does not cure Parkinson disease, but it\u00a0may help ease symptoms. Types of surgery include:Deep brain stimulation. This involves placing electric stimulators in areas of the brain that control movement., Surgery to destroy brain tissue that causes Parkinson symptoms., Stem cell transplant and other procedures are being studied. . LIFESTYLECertain lifestyle changes\u00a0may help you cope with Parkinson disease:Stay healthy by eating\u00a0nutritious\u00a0foods and not smoking., Make changes in what you eat or drink if you have swallowing problems., Use speech therapy\u00a0to help you adjust to changes in your swallowing and speech., Stay active as much as possible when you feel good. Do not\u00a0overdo it when your energy is low., Rest as needed during the day and avoid stress., Use physical therapy and occupational therapy\u00a0to help you\u00a0stay independent and reduce the risk of falls., Place handrails throughout your house to help prevent falls. Place them in bathrooms\u00a0and along stairways., Use assistive devices, when needed,\u00a0to make movement easier. These devices may include special eating utensils, wheelchairs, bed lifts, shower chairs, and walkers., Talk to a social worker or other counseling service\u00a0to help you and your family cope with the disorder. These services\u00a0can also help you get outside help, such as Meals on Wheels. . ", "Causes": "Nerve cells use a brain chemical called dopamine to help control muscle movement. With Parkinson disease, the brain cells that make dopamine slowly die. Without dopamine, the cells that control movement cannot send messages to the muscles. This makes it hard to control\u00a0the muscles. Slowly, over time, this damage gets worse. No one knows what causes these brain cells to waste away.Parkinson disease most often develops after age 50. It is one of the most common nervous system problems in older adults. The disease tends to affect men more than women, although women also get the disease. Parkinson disease sometimes runs in families., The disease can occur in younger adults. In such cases, it is often due to the person's genes., Parkinson disease is rare in children. . Watch this video about:Parkinson's disease"}, "Preeclampsia": {"description": "Preeclampsia is when a pregnant woman develops high blood pressure and protein in the urine after the 20th week (late 2nd or 3rd trimester) of pregnancy.", "Possible Complications": "Rare but\u00a0severe complications for the mother can include:Bleeding problems, Premature separation of the placenta from the uterus before the baby is born , Rupture of the liver, Stroke, Death (rarely). ", "Symptoms": ["Swelling of the hands and face/eyes (edema)", "Sudden weight gain over 1-2 days, more than 2 pounds a week", "Headache that does not go away", "Belly pain on the right side, below the ribs. Pain may also be felt in the right shoulder, and can be confused with heartburn, gallbladder pain, a stomach virus, or the baby kicking", "Irritability", "Decreased urine output, not urinating very often", "Nausea and vomiting (worrisome sign)", "Vision changes, including temporary blindness, seeing flashing lights or spots, sensitivity to light, and blurry vision"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. This may show:High blood pressure, usually higher than 140/90 mm/Hg, Swelling in the hands and face, Weight gain. Blood and urine tests will be done. This may show:Protein in the urine (proteinuria), Higher-than-normal liver enzymes, Platelet count less than 100,000. Tests will also be done to:See how well your blood clots, Monitor the baby's health. The results of a pregnancy ultrasound, non-stress test, and other tests will help your doctor decide whether your baby needs to be delivered immediately.Women who had low blood pressure at the start of their pregnancy, followed by a significant rise in blood pressure need to be watched closely for other signs of preeclampsia.", "Treatment": "The only way to cure preeclampsia is to deliver the baby.If your baby is developed enough (usually 37 weeks or later), your doctor may want your baby to be delivered so the preeclampsia does not get worse. You may receive medicines to help trigger labor, or you may need a c-section.If your baby is not fully developed and you have mild preeclampsia, the disease can often be managed at home until your baby has a good chance of surviving after delivery. The doctor will probably recommend:Bed rest, lying on your left side most or all of the time, Drinking plenty of water, Eating less salt, Frequent doctor visits to make sure you and your baby are doing well, Medicines to lower your blood pressure (sometimes). Sometimes, a pregnant woman with preeclampsia is admitted to the hospital so the health care team can more closely watch the baby and mother.Treatment in the hospital may include:Close monitoring of the mother and baby, Medicines to control blood pressure and prevent seizures and other complications, Steroid injections (after 24 weeks) to help speed up the development of the baby's lungs. You and your doctor will continue to discuss the safest time to deliver your baby, considering:How close you are to your due date. The further along you are in the pregnancy before you deliver, the better it is for your baby., The severity of the preeclampsia. Preeclampsia has many severe complications that can harm the mother., How well the baby is doing in the womb.. The baby must be delivered if there are signs of severe preeclampia, including:Tests that show your baby is not growing well or is not getting enough blood and oxygen, The bottom number of your blood pressure is over 110 mmHg or is greater than 100 mmHg consistently over a 24-hour period, Abnormal liver function test results, Severe headaches, Pain in the belly area (abdomen), Seizures or changes in mental function (eclampsia), Fluid in the mother's lungs (pulmonary edema), HELLP syndrome (rare)\r\n , Low platelet count or bleeding, Low urine output, a lot of protein in the urine, and other signs that your kidneys aren't working properly. ", "Causes": "The exact cause of preeclampsia is unknown. Possible causes include:Autoimmune disorders, Blood vessel problems, Your diet, Your genes. Risk factors include:First pregnancy, Multiple pregnancy (twins or more), Obesity, Being older than age 35, History of diabetes, high blood pressure, or kidney disease. ", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent preeclampsia. It is important for all pregnant women to start prenatal care early and continue it through the pregnancy."}, "Partial (focal) seizure": {"Symptoms": ["Abnormal muscle contraction, such as abnormal head movements", "Staring spells, sometimes with repetitive movements such as picking at clothes or lip smacking ", "Eyes moving from side to side", "Abnormal sensations, such as numbness, tingling, crawling sensation (like ants crawling on the skin)", "Hallucinations \u2013 seeing, smelling, or sometimes hearing things that are not there", "Abdominal pain or discomfort", "Nausea", "Sweating", "Flushed face", "Dilated pupils", "Rapid heart rate/pulse", "Blackout spells -- periods of time lost from memory", "Changes in vision", "Sensation of d\u00e9j\u00e0 vu (feeling like current place and time have been experienced before)", "Changes in mood or emotion ", "Temporary inability to speak"], "description": "Partial seizures can be divided into:", "Causes": "Partial seizures are the most common type of seizure in persons 1 year and older. In persons older than 65 who have blood vessel disease of the brain, partial seizures are very common.", "Treatment": "For information on diagnosis and treatment, see:Epilepsy, Seizures. "}, "Pseudomembranous colitis": {"description": "Pseudomembranous colitis is infection of the large intestine (colon) with an overgrowth of Clostridium difficile bacteria.", "Possible Complications": "Dehydration with electrolyte imbalance, Perforation of (hole through) the colon, Toxic megacolon. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal cramps (mild to severe)", "Bloody stools", "Fever", "Urge to have a bowel movement", "Watery diarrhea (often 5\u00a0- 10 times per day) "], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests may be done:Colonoscopy or flexible sigmoidoscopy, Immunoassay for C. difficile toxin in the stool, Newer stool tests such as PCR. ", "Treatment": "The antibiotic or other medicine causing the condition should be stopped. Metronidazole or vancomycin is usually used to treat the problem, but other medicines may also be used.Electrolyte solutions or fluids given through a vein may be needed to treat dehydration due to diarrhea. In rare cases, surgery is needed to treat infections that get worse or do not respond to antibiotics.Long term antibiotics may be needed if the C. difficile infection returns. A new treatment called fecal microbiota transplant (\"stool transplant\") has also been effective for infections that come back.Your doctor may also suggest that you take probiotics if the infection returns. ", "Causes": "The Clostridium difficile bacteria normally lives in the intestine. However, too much of these bacteria\u00a0may grow when you take antibiotics. The bacteria give off a strong toxin that causes inflammation and bleeding in the lining of the colon.Any antibiotic can cause this condition. The drugs responsible for the problem most of the time are ampicillin, clindamycin, fluoroquinolones, and cephalosporins. Pseudomembranous colitis is uncommon in children, and rare in infants. It is most often seen in people who are in the hospital. However, it is becoming more common in people who take antibiotics\u00a0and are not in\u00a0a hospital.Risk factors include:Older age, Antibiotic use, Use of medicines that weaken the immune system (such as chemotherapy), Recent surgery, History of pseudomembranous colitis, History of inflammatory bowel disease (ulcerative colitis and Crohn's disease) . ", "Prevention": "People who have had pseudomembranous colitis should tell their doctors before taking antibiotics again. It is also very important to wash hands well to prevent passing the germ to other people. Alcohol sanitizers do not always work on C. difficile."}, "Pituitary tumor": {"description": "A pituitary tumor is an abnormal growth in the pituitary gland. This is the part of the brain that regulates the body's balance of many hormones.", "Possible Complications": "The most serious complication is blindness. This can occur if the optic nerve is seriously damaged.The tumor or its removal may cause permanent hormone imbalances. The affected hormones may need to be replaced, and you may need to take medicine for the rest of your life.Surgery can sometimes damage the posterior pituitary (back part of the gland). This can lead to diabetes insipidus, a condition with symptoms of frequent urination and extreme thirst.", "Symptoms": ["Hyperthyroidism (extremely rare)", "Cushing syndrome", "Gigantism or acromegaly", "Nipple discharge and irregular or absent menstrual periods in women", "Decreased sexual function in men", "Changes in vision such as double vision, visual field loss, drooping eyelids", "Headache", "Lethargy", "Nasal drainage of clear fluid", "Nausea and vomiting", "Problems with the sense of smell", "In rare cases, these symptoms occur suddenly and can be severe (pituitary infarction)."], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical examination. The provider will note any problems with double vision and visual field, such as a loss of side (peripheral) vision or the ability to see in certain areas.Tests to check endocrine function may be ordered, including:Cortisol levels: dexamethasone suppression test, urine cortisol test, Follicle-stimulating hormone (FSH) levels, Insulin growth factor-1 (IGF-1) levels, Luteinizing hormone (LH) levels, Serum prolactin levels, Testosterone/estradiol levels, Thyroid hormone levels: Free T4 test, TSH test, Tests that help confirm the diagnosis include the following:, Visual field MRI of head. ", "Treatment": "Surgery to remove the tumor is often needed, especially if the tumor is pressing on the optic nerves (nerves that control vision).Most of the time, pituitary tumors can be removed surgically through the nose and sinuses. If the tumor cannot be removed this way, it is removed through the skull (transcranial).Radiation therapy may be used to shrink the tumor for people who cannot have surgery. It may also be used if the tumor returns after surgery.In some cases, medicines are prescribed to shrink certain types of tumors.", "Causes": "Most pituitary tumors are noncancerous (benign). Up to 20% of people have pituitary tumors. Many of these tumors do not cause symptoms and are never diagnosed during the person's lifetime.The pituitary gland is a pea-sized endocrine gland located at the base of the brain. The pituitary helps control the release of hormones from other endocrine glands, such as the thyroid, sex glands, and adrenal glands. The pituitary also releases hormones that directly affect body tissues, such as bones and the breast milk glands. The pituitary hormones include:Adrenocorticotropic hormone (ACTH), Growth hormone (GH), Prolactin, Thyroid-stimulating hormone (TSH), Luteinizing hormone (LH) and follicle stimulating hormone (FSH). Watch this video about:Pituitary glandAs a pituitary tumor grows, the normal hormone-releasing cells of the pituitary may be damaged. This results in the pituitary gland not producing enough of its hormones. This condition is called hypopituitarism.The causes of pituitary tumors are unknown. Some tumors are part of a hereditary disorder called multiple endocrine neoplasia I (MEN I).The pituitary gland can be affected by brain tumors that develop in the same part of the brain, resulting in symptoms."}, "Pituitary apoplexy": {"description": "Pituitary apoplexy is the death of an area of tissue in the pituitary gland.", "Possible Complications": "Complications of untreated pituitary apoplexy can include:Adrenal crisis, Vision loss . If other missing hormones are not replaced, symptoms of hypothyroidism and hypogonadism may develop.", "Symptoms": ["Severe headache", "Paralysis of the eye muscles, causing double vision (ophthalmoplegia)", "Low blood pressure, nausea, and vomiting from acute adrenal insufficiency", "Personality changes due to sudden narrowing of one of the arteries in the brain (anterior cerebral artery)", "Growth hormone deficiency", "Adrenal insufficiency (if not already present or treated)", "Hypogonadism", "Hypothyroidism", "Failure of the uterus to contract to give birth to a baby (in women)", "Failure to produce breast milk (in women)", "Frequent urination and severe thirst "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and ask about your symptoms.Tests that may be ordered include:Eye exams, MRI or CT scan. Blood tests will be done to check levels of:ACTH, Cortisol, FSH, Growth hormone, LH, Prolactin, TSH, IGF-1. ", "Treatment": "Acute apoplexy may require surgery to relieve pressure on the pituitary and improve vision symptoms. Severe cases need emergency surgery. If vision is not affected, surgery is usually not necessary.Immediate treatment with adrenal replacement hormones (glucocorticoids) is needed. Other hormones will be replaced, including:Growth hormone, Sex hormones (estrogen/testosterone), Thyroid hormone. ", "Causes": "The pituitary is a small gland at the base of the brain. The pituitary produces many of the hormones that control essential body processes.Pituitary apoplexy is commonly caused by bleeding inside a noncancerous tumor of the pituitary. When pituitary bleeding occurs in a woman during or right after childbirth, it is called Sheehan syndrome.Risk factors for pituitary apoplexy include:Bleeding disorders, Diabetes, Head injury, Radiation to the pituitary gland, Use of a breathing machine. In most cases, the cause is not clear."}, "Piriformis syndrome": {"description": "The syndrome, which affects more women than men, is uncommon. But when it occurs, it is a major cause of sciatica. ", "Symptoms": ["Tenderness or a dull ache in the buttock", "Tingling or numbness in the buttock and along the back of the leg", "Difficulty sitting", "Pain from sitting that grows worse as you continue to sit", "Pain that gets worse with activity", "Lower body pain that is so severe it becomes disabling "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will:Do a physical exam, Ask about your symptoms and recent activities, Take your medical history . During the exam, your provider may put you through a range of movements. The point is to see if and where they cause pain.Other problems can cause sciatica. For instance, a slipped disk or arthritis of the spine can put pressure on the sciatic nerve. To rule out other possible causes, you may have an MRI or a CT scan. ", "Causes": "The piriformis muscle is involved in nearly every move you make, from walking to shifting weight from one foot to the other. Beneath the muscle is the sciatic nerve. This nerve runs from your lower spine all the way down the back of your leg to your foot.Injuring or irritating the piriformis muscle can cause muscle spasms.The muscle may also swell or tighten from the spasms. This puts pressure on the nerve beneath it, causing pain.Overuse can irritate or injure the muscle. Muscle spasms may come from:Sitting for long periods, Over exercising, Running, walking, or doing other repetitive activities, Playing sports, Climbing stairs, Lifting heavy objects . Trauma can also cause muscle irritation and damage. This may be caused by:Car accidents, Falls, Sudden twisting of the hip, Penetrating wounds . ", "Prevention": "To prevent future pain:Get regular exercise., Avoid running or exercising on hills or uneven surfaces., Warm up before exercising. Then gradually increase the intensity of your activity., If something causes you pain, stop doing it. Don't push through the pain. Rest until the pain passes., Don't sit or lie down for long periods in positions that put extra pressure on your hips. . ", "Treatment": "In some cases, you may not need medical treatment. The following self-care tips can help relieve pain.Avoid activities that cause pain, such as biking or running. You can resume these activities after the pain is gone., Be sure to use proper form and equipment when doing sports or other physical activities., Use pain medicines such as ibuprofen (Motrin, Advil), naproxen (Aleve, Naprosyn), or acetaminophen (Tylenol) for pain., Try ice and heat. Use an ice pack for 15 to 20 minutes every few hours. Wrap the ice pack in a towel to protect your skin. Alternate the cold pack with a heating pad. Don't use a heating pad for longer than 20 minutes at a time., Follow your provider's instructions for doing special stretches. Stretches and exercises can relax and strengthen the piriformis muscle., Use proper posture when sitting, standing, or driving. Sit up straight and don't slump. . Your provider may prescribe muscle relaxants. This will relax the muscle so you can exercise and stretch it. Injections of steroid medicines into the area may also help.For more severe pain, your provider may recommend electrotherapy such as TENS. This treatment uses electrical stimulation to reduce pain and stop muscle spasms.As a last resort, your provider may recommend surgery to cut the muscle and relieve pressure on the nerve."}, "Pregnancy and herpes": {"description": "Newborn infants can become infected with herpes virus during pregnancy, during labor or delivery, or after birth.", "Symptoms": ["Herpes infection in the brain is called herpes encephalitis", "The liver, lungs, and kidneys may also be involved", "There may or may not be blisters on the skin", "Bleeding easily", "Breathing difficulties", "Blue appearance (cyanosis)", "Flaring of the nostrils", "Grunting", "Rapid breathing (tachypnea)", "Short periods without breathing (apneic episodes)", "Coma", "Jaundice", "Lethargy", "Low body temperature (hypothermia)", "Poor feeding", "Seizures", "Shock", "Skin lesions, fluid-filled blisters", "Eye disease, such as inflammation of the retina (chorioretinitis)", "Severe brain damage", "Skin sores (lesions)"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests for birth-acquired herpes include:DFA test for herpes (scraping from vesicle), EEG, MRI of the head, Spinal fluid culture, Vesicle culture. Additional tests that may be done if the baby is very sick include:Blood gas analysis, Coagulation studies (PT, PTT), Complete blood count, Electrolyte measurements, Tests of liver function. ", "Causes": "Newborn infants can become infected with herpes virus:In the uterus (this is unusual), Passing through the birth canal (birth-acquired herpes, the most common method of infection), Right after birth (postpartum) from being kissed\u00a0or having other contact with someone who has herpes mouth sores. If the mother has an active outbreak\u00a0genital herpes at the time of delivery, the baby is more likely to become infected during birth. Some mothers may not know they have herpes sores inside the vagina.Some\u00a0women have had herpes infections in the past, but\u00a0are not aware of it, and\u00a0may pass\u00a0the virus\u00a0to their baby.Herpes type 2 (genital herpes) is the most common cause of herpes infection in newborn babies. But\u00a0herpes type 1 (oral herpes) can also occur.", "Prevention": "\r\nIt is important for you to tell your health care provider if you have a history of genital herpes. If you have frequent herpes outbreaks, you will be given a medicine to take during the last month of pregnancy that treats the virus. This helps prevent an outbreak around the time of delivery. C-section is recommended for pregnant women who have a new herpes sore and are in labor.Safer sexual practices can help prevent the mother from getting genital herpes.Persons with cold sores (herpes labialis) should not come in contact with newborn infants. To prevent transmitting the virus, caregivers who have a cold sore should wear a surgical mask and wash their hands carefully before coming in contact with an infant.Mothers should speak to their health care providers about the best way to minimize the risk of transmitting herpes to their infant.\r\n", "Treatment": "Herpes virus infection in infants\u00a0is generally treated with antiviral medicine given through a vein (intravenous). The baby may need to take the medicine for several weeks.Treatment may also be needed to for the effects of herpes infection, such as shock or seizures. Because these babies are very ill, treatment is often done in the hospital intensive care unit."}, "Potato plant poisoning - green tubers and sprouts": {"Symptoms": ["Delirium", "Diarrhea", "Dilated pupils", "Fever", "Hallucinations", "Headache", "Loss of sensation", "Lower than normal body temperature (hypothermia)", "Paralysis", "Shock", "Slow pulse", "Slowed breathing", "Stomach or abdominal pain", "Vision changes", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Do not touch or eat any plant with which you are not familiar. Wash your hands after working in the garden or walking in the woods."}, "Psychosis": {"description": "Psychosis occurs when a person loses contact with reality. The person may: ", "Possible Complications": "Psychosis can prevent people from functioning normally and caring for themselves. Left untreated, people can sometimes harm themselves or others.", "Symptoms": ["Disorganized thought and speech", "False beliefs that are not based in reality (delusions), especially unfounded fear or suspicion", "Hearing, seeing, or feeling things that are not there (hallucinations)", "Thoughts that \"jump\" between unrelated topics (disordered thinking) "], "Exams and Tests": "Psychiatric evaluation and testing are used to diagnose the cause of the psychosis.Laboratory testing and brain scans may not be needed, but sometimes can help pinpoint the diagnosis. Tests may include:Blood tests for abnormal electrolyte and hormone levels, Blood tests for syphilis and other infections, Drug screens, MRI of the brain. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause of the psychosis. Care in a hospital is often needed to ensure the patient's safety.Antipsychotic drugs, which reduce hallucinations and delusions and improve thinking and behavior, are helpful.", "Causes": "Medical problems that can cause psychosis include:Alcohol and certain illegal drugs, both during use and during withdrawal, Brain diseases, such as Parkinson disease, Huntington disease, Brain tumors or cysts, Dementia (including Alzheimer disease), HIV and other infections that affect the brain, Some prescription drugs, such as steroids and stimulants, Some types of epilepsy, Stroke. Psychosis may also be found in:Most people with schizophrenia, Some people with bipolar disorder (manic-depressive) or severe depression, Some personality disorders. ", "Prevention": "Prevention depends on the cause. For example, avoiding alcohol abuse prevents alcohol-induced psychosis."}, "Parinaud oculoglandular syndrome": {"description": "Note: Parinaud syndrome is a different disorder in which you are unable to look up. This can be caused by a brain tumor, and requires an immediate evaluation by your health care provider.", "Possible Complications": "Serious complications are rare.The conjunctival nodules can sometimes form sores (ulcers) during the healing process. The infection can spread to nearby tissues or into the bloodstream.", "Symptoms": ["Red, irritated, and painful eye (looks like \"pink eye\") ", "Fever", "General ill feeling", "Increased tearing (possible) ", "Swelling of nearby lymph glands (often in front of the ear)"], "Exams and Tests": "An examination shows:Fever and other signs of illness, Red, tender, inflamed eye, Tender lymph nodes may be present in front of the ear, There may be growths (conjunctival nodules) on the inside of the eyelid or the white of the eye. Blood tests will be done to check for infection.\u00a0The white blood cell count may be high or low, depending on the cause of the infection.A blood test to check antibody levels is the main method used to diagnose many of the infections that cause POS. Other tests may include:Biopsy of the lymph node, Laboratory culture of eye fluids, lymph node tissue, or blood. ", "Treatment": "Depending on the cause of the infection, antibiotics may be helpful. Surgery may be necessary in rare cases to clean away the infected tissues.", "Causes": "Parinaud oculoglandular syndrome (POS) is caused by an infection with bacteria, a virus, fungus, or parasite.The most common causes are cat scratch disease and tularemia (rabbit fever). The bacteria that cause either condition can infect the eye. The bacteria can directly enter the eye (on a finger or other object), or air droplets that carry the bacteria can land on the eye.Other infectious diseases may spread the same way, or through the bloodstream to the eye.", "Prevention": "Frequent hand washing can reduce the likelihood of getting POS. Avoid being scratched by a cat, even a healthy cat. You can avoid tularemia by not having contact with wild rabbits, squirrels, or ticks."}, "Pneumocystis jiroveci pneumonia": {"description": "Pneumocystis jiroveci pneumonia is a fungal infection of the lungs. The disease used to be called Pneumocystis carini or PCP pneumonia.", "Possible Complications": "Pleural effusion (extremely rare), Pneumothorax (collapsed lung), Respiratory failure (may require breathing support). ", "Symptoms": ["Cough, often mild and dry", "Fever", "Rapid breathing", "Shortness of breath, especially with activity (exertion)"], "Exams and Tests": "Blood gases, Bronchoscopy (with lavage), Lung biopsy, X-ray of the chest, Sputum exam to check for fungus that causes the infection, CBC, \u00df-1,3 glucan level in the blood . ", "Treatment": " Antibiotics can be given by mouth (orally) or through a vein (intravenously), depending on the severity of the illness.People with low oxygen levels and moderate to severe disease are often prescribed corticosteroids as well.", "Causes": "This type of pneumonia is caused by the fungus Pneumocystis jiroveci. This fungus is common in the environment and rarely causes illness in healthy people.However, it can cause a lung infection in people with a weakened immune system due to:Cancer, Chronic use of corticosteroids or other medications that weaken the immune system, HIV/AIDS, Organ or bone marrow transplant. Pneumocystis jiroveci was a relatively rare infection before the AIDS epidemic. Before the use of preventive antibiotics for the condition, most people in the United States with advanced AIDS would develop this infection.", "Prevention": "Preventive therapy is recommended for:Patients with AIDS who have CD4 counts below 200 cells/microliter, Bone marrow transplant recipients, Organ transplant recipients, People who take long-term, high-dose corticosteroids, People who have had previous episodes of this infection. "}, "Plastic resin hardener poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty (from inhalation)", "Rapid breathing", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Throat swelling (which may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Loss of vision", "Low blood pressure, develops rapidly", "Collapse", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting, possibly bloody", "Burns of the esophagus (food pipe)", "Blood in the stool", "Irritation", "Burn", "Necrosis (holes) in the skin or underlying tissues"], "description": "This is for information only, and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all poisons in childproof containers, with original labels, and out of the reach of children."}, "Pulmonary nocardiosis": {"description": "Pulmonary nocardiosis is an infection of the lung with the bacteria, Nocardia asteroides.", "Possible Complications": "Brain abscesses, Skin infections. ", "Symptoms": ["Fever (comes and goes)", "General ill feeling (malaise)", "Night sweats ", "Nausea", "Liver and spleen swelling (hepatosplenomegaly)", "Unintentional weight loss", "Vomiting ", "Breathing difficulty", "Chest pain not due to heart problems", "Coughing up blood", "Cough with mucus", "Rapid breathing", "Shortness of breath ", "Joint pain", "Change in mental state", "Confusion", "Dizziness", "Headache", "Seizures ", "Skin rashes or lumps", "Skin sores (abscesses)", "Swollen lymph nodes"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or nurse will examine you and listen to your lungs using a stethoscope. You may have abnormal lung sounds, called crackles. Tests that may be done include:Bronchoalveolar lavage - fluid is sent for stain and culture, which is taken by bronchoscopy, Chest x-ray, CT scan of the chest, Pleural fluid culture and stain, Sputum stain and culture . ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to control the infection. Antibiotics are used, but it may take a while to get better. You must keep taking the medications for at least 3 months.Surgery may be needed to remove or drain infected areas.Your health care provider may tell you to stop taking any medicines that weaken your immune system. Never stop taking any medicine before talking to your health provider first. ", "Causes": "Nocardia infection develops when you breathe in (inhale) the bacteria. The infection causes pneumonia-like symptoms. The infection can spread to any part of the body.People at highest risk for nocardia infection are those with a weakened immune system. This includes people who have:Been taking steroids or other medicines that weaken the immune system for a long time, Cushing disease, An organ transplant, HIV, Lymphoma . Other people at risk include those with chronic lung problems related to smoking, emphysema, or other infections such as tuberculosis.", "Prevention": "Be careful when using corticosteroids. Use these drugs sparingly, in the lowest effective doses and for the shortest periods of time possible.Some patients with an impaired immune system may need to take antibiotics for long periods of time to prevent the infection from returning."}, "Paraphimosis": {"description": "Paraphimosis occurs when the foreskin of an uncircumcised male cannot be pulled back over the head of the penis.", "Possible Complications": "If paraphimosis is left untreated, it can disrupt blood flow to the tip of the penis. In extreme (and rare) cases, this may lead to:Damage to the penis tip, Gangrene, Loss of the penis tip. ", "Symptoms": ["Inability to pull the retracted foreskin over the head of the penis", "Painful swelling at the end of the penis", "Pain in the penis"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination confirms the diagnosis. The health care provider will usually find a \"doughnut\" around the shaft near the head of the penis (glans).", "Treatment": "Pressing on (compression of) the head of the penis while pushing the foreskin forward may reduce the swelling due to paraphimosis. If this fails, prompt surgical circumcision will be needed.", "Causes": "Causes of paraphimosis include:Direct trauma to the area, Failure to return the foreskin to its normal location after urination or washing (most common in hospitals and nursing homes), Infection, which may be due to poor personal hygiene. Uncircumcised males, and those who may not have been correctly or completely circumcised, are at risk.Paraphimosis occurs most often in children and the elderly.", "Prevention": "Returning the foreskin to its normal position after pulling it back may help prevent this condition. Circumcision, when done correctly, prevents this condition."}, "Pharyngitis - sore throat": {"description": "Pharyngitis, or sore throat, is discomfort, pain, or scratchiness in the throat. It often makes it painful to swallow. ", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Ear infection, Sinusitis, Abscess near the tonsils. ", "Symptoms": ["Fever", "\r\n  Headache\r\n  ", "\r\n  Joint pain and muscle aches\r\n  ", "\r\n  Skin rashes\r\n  ", "Swollen lymph nodes (glands) in the neck\r\n  "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will perform a physical exam and look at your throat.A rapid test or throat culture to test for strep throat may be done. Other laboratory tests may be done, depending on the suspected cause.", "Treatment": "Most sore throats are caused by viruses. Antibiotics do not help viral sore throats. Using these medicines when they are not needed leads to antibiotics not working as well when they are needed.Sore throat is\u00a0treated with antibiotics if: A strep test or culture is positive. Your health care provider cannot diagnose strep throat by symptoms or a physical exam alone., A culture for chlamydia or gonorrhea is positive.. Sore throat caused by the flu (influenza) may be helped by antiviral medicines.The following tips may help your sore throat feel better:Drink soothing liquids. You can either drink warm liquids, such as lemon tea with honey, or cold liquids, such as ice water. You could also suck on a fruit-flavored ice pop., Gargle several times a day with warm salt water (1/2 tsp of salt in 1 cup of water)., Suck on hard candies or throat lozenges. Young children should not be given\u00a0these products because they can choke on them., Use of\u00a0a cool-mist vaporizer or humidifier can moisten the air and soothe a dry and painful throat., Try over-the-counter pain medications, such as acetaminophen. . ", "Causes": "Pharyngitis is caused by swelling in the back of the throat (pharynx) between the tonsils and the (larynx).Most sore throats are caused by colds, the flu, coxsackie virus or mono (mononucleosis).Bacteria that can cause pharyngitis in some cases.Strep throat is caused by group A streptococcus., Less commonly, bacteria such as gonorrhea, and chlamydia can cause sore throat. . Most cases of pharyngitis occur during the colder months. The illness often spreads among family members and close contacts."}, "Pericarditis - after heart attack": {"description": "See also: Bacterial pericarditis", "Possible Complications": "Cardiac tamponade, Congestive heart failure, Constrictive pericarditis. ", "Symptoms": ["Anxiety", "Chest pain occurs when the\u00a0pericardium\u00a0becomes swollen and rubs on the heart.\r\n May come and go (recur), Pain may be sharp and stabbing (pleuritic) or tight and crushing (ischemic), Pain may get worse when breathing and may go away when you lean forward,\u00a0stand, or sit up, Pain moves to the neck, shoulder, back, or abdomen . ", "May come and go (recur)", "Pain may be sharp and stabbing (pleuritic) or tight and crushing (ischemic)", "Pain may get worse when breathing and may go away when you lean forward,\u00a0stand, or sit up", "Pain moves to the neck, shoulder, back, or abdomen ", "Difficulty breathing", "Dry cough", "Fast heart rate (tachycardia)", "Fatigue", "Fever (more common with the second type of pericarditis)", "Malaise (general ill feeling)", "Splinting of ribs (bending over or holding the chest) with deep breathing"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will use a stethoscope to listen to your heart and lungs. There may be a rubbing sound (called a pericardial friction rub, not to be confused with a heart murmur). Heart sounds in general may be weak or sound far away.A buildup of fluid in the covering of the heart or space around the lungs (pericardial effusion) is not common after a heart attack. But, it often does occur in some patients with Dressler syndrome.Tests may include:Cardiac injury markers (CK-MB and troponin may help tell pericarditis from a heart attack), Chest CT scan, Chest MRI, Chest x-ray, Complete blood count, ECG, Echocardiogram, ESR (sedimentation rate) or C-reactive protein (measures of inflammation). ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to make the heart work better and reduce pain and other symptoms.Nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory medications (NSAIDs) or aspirin may be used to treat inflammation of the pericardium.\u00a0When other medicines don't work, steroids or colchicine may be used.In some cases, excess fluid surrounding the heart (pericardial effusion) may need to be removed. This is done with a procedure called pericardiocentesis. If complications develop, part of the pericardium may need to be removed with surgery (pericardiectomy).", "Causes": "Two types of pericarditis can occur after a heart attack.Early\u00a0pericarditis most often occurs within 1 to\u00a03 days after a heart attack. When the body tries to clean up the diseased heart tissue, swelling and inflammation occur.Late pericarditis is also called Dressler syndrome (or post-cardiac injury syndrome or postcardiotomy pericarditis). It usually\u00a0occurs several weeks or months after a heart attack, heart surgery, or other trauma to the heart. However, it may happen a week after a heart injury. Dressler syndrome is believed to be caused by the immune system mistakenly attacking healthy heart tissue.You have a higher risk of pericarditis if you have had a previous heart attack, open heart surgery, or chest trauma, or if your heat attack affected the thickness of your heart muscle."}, "Pneumonia - adults (community acquired)": {"description": "This article covers community-acquired pneumonia (CAP). This type of pneumonia is found\u00a0in persons who have not recently been in the hospital or another health care facility such as a nursing home or rehab facility. Pneumonia that affects persons in health care facilities, such as hospitals is called hospital-acquired pneumonia. ", "Symptoms": ["Cough (with some pneumonias you may cough up greenish or yellow mucus, or even bloody mucus)", "Fever, which may be mild or high", "Shaking chills", "Shortness of breath (may only occur when you climb stairs or exert yourself) ", "Confusion, especially in older people", "Excess sweating and clammy skin", "Headache", "Loss of appetite, low energy, and fatigue", "Malaise\u00a0(not feeling well)", "Sharp or stabbing chest pain that gets worse when you breathe deeply or cough", "White nail syndrome, or leukonychia "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will\u00a0listen for\u00a0crackles or abnormal breath sounds when listening to your chest with a stethoscope. Tapping on your chest wall (percussion) helps\u00a0the health care provider listen and feel for abnormal sounds\u00a0in\u00a0your chest.The health care provider will likely order a chest x-ray if pneumonia is suspected.Other tests that may be ordered include:Arterial blood gases to see if enough oxygen is getting into your blood from the lungs, Blood and sputum cultures to look for the germ that may be causing the pneumonia, CBC to check white blood cell count, CT scan of the chest, Bronchoscopy--a flexible tube with a lighted camera on the end\u00a0passed down to your lungs, Thoracentesis--removing fluid from the space between the outside\u00a0lining of the lungs and the chest wall, Pleural fluid culture if there is fluid in the space around the lungs . ", "Causes": "Pneumonia is a common illness that affects millions of people each year in the United States. Germs called bacteria, viruses, and fungi may cause pneumonia. In adults, bacteria are the most common cause of pneumonia.Ways you can get pneumonia include:Bacteria and viruses living in your nose, sinuses, or mouth may spread to your lungs., You may breathe some of these germs directly into your lungs., You breathe in (inhale) food, liquids, vomit, or fluids from the mouth into your lungs (aspiration pneumonia) . Pneumonia can be caused by many types of germs.The most common type of\u00a0bacterium is Streptococcus pneumoniae (pneumococcus)., Atypical pneumonia, often called walking pneumonia, is caused by other bacteria., The bacterium called Pneumocystis jiroveci can cause\u00a0pneumonia in people whose immune system is not working well., Viruses, such as the flu virus,\u00a0are also a common cause of pneumonia.\u00a0. Risk factors that increase your chance of getting pneumonia include:Chronic lung disease (COPD, bronchiectasis, cystic fibrosis), Cigarette smoking, Dementia, stroke, brain injury, cerebral palsy, or other brain disorders, Immune system problem (during cancer treatment, or due to HIV/AIDS, organ transplant, or other diseases) , Other serious illnesses, such as heart disease, liver cirrhosis, or diabetes mellitus, Recent surgery or trauma, Surgery to treat cancer of the mouth, throat, or neck. ", "Prevention": "You can help prevent pneumonia by following the measures below.Wash your hands often, especially:Before preparing and eating food, After blowing your nose, After going to the bathroom, After changing a baby's diaper, After coming in contact with people who are sick. Do not\u00a0smoke. Tobacco damages your lung's ability to\u00a0fight infection.Vaccines may help prevent some types of pneumonia. Be sure to get the following vaccines:Flu vaccine can help prevent pneumonia caused by the flu virus., Pneumococcal vaccine lowers your chances of getting pneumonia from Streptococcus pneumoniae.. Vaccines are even more important for the elderly and people with diabetes, asthma, emphysema, HIV, cancer, persons with organ transplants, or other long-term conditions.", "Treatment": "Your doctor must first decide whether you need to be in the hospital. If you are treated in the hospital, you will receive:Fluids and antibiotics\u00a0through your veins, Oxygen therapy, Breathing treatments (possibly). It is important that you are started on antibiotics very soon after you are admitted. If you have viral pneumonia, you will not receive antibiotics. This is because antibiotics do not kill viruses. You will receive other medicines, especially if you have the flu.\u00a0You are more likely to be admitted to the hospital if you:Have another serious medical problem, Have severe symptoms, Are unable to care for yourself at home, or are unable to eat or drink, Are older than 65, Have been taking antibiotics at home and are not getting better. Many people can be treated at home. If so, your doctor may tell you to take antibiotics.\u00a0 When taking antibiotics:Do not\u00a0miss any doses. Take the medicine until it is gone, even\u00a0when you start to feel better., Do\u00a0not take cough medicine or cold medicine unless your doctor says it is OK. Coughing helps your body get rid of mucus from your lungs.. Breathing warm, moist (wet) air helps loosen the sticky mucus that may make you feel like you are choking. These things may help:Place a warm, wet washcloth loosely over your nose and mouth., Fill a humidifier with warm water and breathe in the warm mist., Take a couple of deep breaths two or three times every hour. Deep breaths will help open up your lungs., Tap your chest gently a few times a day while lying\u00a0with your head lower than your chest. This helps bring up mucus from the lungs so that you can cough it out.. Drink plenty of liquids, as long as your health care provider says it is OK.Drink water, juice, or weak tea, Drink at least 6 to 10 cups a day, Do\u00a0not drink alcohol. Get plenty of rest when you go home. If you have trouble sleeping at night, take naps during the day."}, "Pressure ulcer": {"Symptoms": ["Red skin that gets worse over time", "The area\u00a0forms a blister, then an open sore ", "Buttocks", "Elbow", "Hips", "Heels", "Ankles", "Shoulders", "Back", "Back of head ", "Stage I: A reddened area on the skin that, when pressed, does not turn white. This is a sign that a pressure ulcer is starting to develop.", "Stage II: The skin blisters or forms an open sore. The area around the sore may be red and irritated.", "Stage III: The skin\u00a0now develops an open, sunken hole called a crater. There is damage to the tissue below the skin.", "Stage IV: The pressure ulcer has become so deep that there is damage to the muscle and bone, and sometimes to tendons and joints. "], "Causes": "Pressure on the skin reduces blood flow to the area. Without enough blood, the skin can die. An ulcer may form. You are more likely to get a pressure ulcer if you:\u00a0Use a wheelchair or stay in bed for a long time, Are an older adult, Cannot\u00a0move certain parts of your body without help because of\u00a0a spine or brain injury or disease such as multiple sclerosis, Have a disease\u00a0that affects blood flow, including diabetes or vascular disease, Have\u00a0Alzheimer's disease or another condition that affects your mental status, Have fragile skin, Have urinary incontinence or bowel incontinence, Do not get enough nutrition (malnourishment) . ", "description": "A pressure ulcer is an area of skin that breaks down when something keeps rubbing or pressing\u00a0against the skin. ", "Prevention": "If you are on bedrest\u00a0or cannot move because of a medical condition, someone should check you for pressure sores every day.You or your caregiver should examine your body from head to toe. Pay special attention to the areas where pressure ulcers often form. Look for reddened areas that, when pressed, do not turn white. Also look for blisters, sores, or craters.Take the following steps to prevent pressure ulcers: Change position at least every 2 hours to relieve pressure. , Use items that can help reduce pressure -- pillows, sheepskin, foam padding, and powders from medical supply stores., Eat well-balanced meals that contain enough calories to keep you healthy., Drink plenty of water (8 to 10 cups) every day., Exercise daily, including range-of-motion exercises., Keep the skin clean and dry., After urinating or having a bowel movement, clean the area and dry it well. A doctor can recommend creams to help protect the skin. . "}, "Pulmonary edema": {"description": "Pulmonary edema is an abnormal buildup of fluid in the lungs. This buildup of fluid leads to shortness of breath.", "Symptoms": ["Coughing up blood or bloody froth", "Difficulty breathing when lying down (orthopnea) ", "Feeling of \"air hunger\" or \"drowning\" (This feeling is called \"paroxysmal nocturnal dyspnea\" if it causes you to wake up and try to catch your breath.) ", "Grunting, gurgling, or wheezing sounds with breathing", "Problems speaking in full sentences because of shortness of breath", "Anxiety or restlessness", "Decrease in level of alertness (consciousness)", "Leg or abdominal swelling", "Pale skin", "Sweating (excessive)"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a thorough physical exam. The health care provider will listen to your lungs and heart with a stethoscope to check for: Abnormal heart sounds, Crackles\u00a0in your lungs, called rales, Increased heart rate (tachycardia), Rapid breathing (tachypnea) . Other things that may be seen during the exam include:Leg or abdominal swelling, Abnormalities of your neck veins (which can show that there is too much fluid in your body), Pale or blue skin color (pallor or cyanosis) . Possible tests include:Blood chemistries, Blood oxygen levels(oximetry or arterial blood gases), Chest x-ray, Complete blood count (CBC), Echocardiogram (ultrasound of the heart) to see if there are problems with the heart muscle , Electrocardiogram (ECG) to look for signs of a heart attack or problems with the heart rhythm. ", "Causes": "Pulmonary edema is often caused by congestive heart failure. When the heart is not able to pump efficiently, blood can back up into the veins that take blood through the lungs. As the pressure in these blood vessels increases, fluid is pushed into the air spaces (alveoli) in the lungs. This fluid reduces normal oxygen movement through the lungs. These two factors combine to cause shortness of breath.Congestive heart failure that leads to pulmonary edema may be caused by:Heart attack, or any disease of the heart that weakens or stiffens the heart muscle (cardiomyopathy), Leaking or narrowed heart valves (mitral or aortic valves), Sudden, severe high blood pressure (hypertension). Pulmonary edema may also be caused by:Certain medicines, High altitude exposure, Kidney failure, Narrowed arteries that bring blood to the kidneys, Lung damage caused by poisonous gas or severe infection, Major injury. ", "Prevention": "Take all your medicines as directed if you have a disease that can lead to pulmonary edema or a weakened heart muscle.Following a healthy diet that is low in salt and fat, and controlling your other risk factors can reduce the risk of developing this condition.", "Treatment": "Pulmonary edema is almost always treated in the emergency room or hospital. You may need to be in an intensive care unit (ICU).Oxygen is given through a face mask or tiny plastic tubes are placed in the nose., A breathing tube may be placed into the windpipe (trachea) so you can be connected to a breathing machine (ventilator) if you cannot breathe well on your own. . The cause of edema should be identified and treated quickly. For example, if a heart attack has caused the condition, it must be treated right away.Medicines that may be used include:Diuretics that remove excess fluid from the body, Medicines that strengthen the heart muscle, control the heartbeat, or relieve pressure on the heart. "}, "Post-traumatic stress disorder": {"Symptoms": ["Flashback episodes in which the event seems to be happening again and again", "Repeated upsetting memories of the event", "Repeated nightmares of the event", "Strong, uncomfortable reactions to situations that remind you of the event ", "Emotional numbing or feeling as though you do not care about anything", "Feeling detached", "Not able to remember important parts of the event", "Not interested in normal activities", "Showing less of your moods", "Avoiding places, people, or thoughts that remind you of the event", "Feeling like you have no future ", "Always scanning your surroundings for signs of danger (hypervigilance)", "Not able to concentrate", "Startling easily", "Feeling irritable or having outbursts of anger", "Trouble falling or staying asleep ", "Constant guilt about the event, including survivor guilt", "Blaming others for the event", "Not being able to recall important parts of the event", "Loss of interest in activities or other people", "Agitation or excitability", "Dizziness", "Fainting", "Feeling your heart beat in your chest", "Headache "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider may ask how long you have had symptoms. PTSD is diagnosed when you have had symptoms for at least 30 days.Your health care provider may also do a mental health exam, physical exam, and blood tests. These are done to look for other illnesses that are similar to PTSD.", "description": "Post-traumatic stress disorder (PTSD)\u00a0is a type of anxiety disorder. It can occur after you have gone through an extreme emotional trauma that involved the threat of injury or death.", "Causes": "Doctors do not know why traumatic events cause PTSD in some people, but not in others. Your genes, emotions, and family setting may all play roles. Past emotional trauma may increase your risk of PTSD after a recent traumatic event.With PTSD, the body's response to a stressful event is changed. Normally, after the event, the body recovers. The stress hormones and chemicals the body releases due to the stress go back to normal levels. For some reason in a person with PTSD, the body keeps releasing the stress hormones and chemicals.PTSD can occur at any age. It can occur\u00a0after events such as:\r\n  Assault\r\n  , \r\n  Car accidents\r\n  , \r\n  Domestic abuse\r\n  , \r\n  Natural disasters\r\n  , \r\n  Prison stay\r\n  , \r\n  Sexual assault\r\n  , \r\n  Terrorism\r\n  , \r\n  War\r\n  . ", "Treatment": "Treatment for PTSD involves talk therapy (counseling), medicines, or both.TALK THERAPYDuring talk therapy, you talk with a mental health professional, such as a psychiatrist or therapist, in a calm and accepting setting. They can help you manage your PTSD symptoms. They will also guide you as you work through your feelings about the trauma.There are many types of talk therapy. One type that is often used for PTSD is called desensitization. During therapy, you are encouraged to remember the traumatic event and express your feelings about it. Over time, memories of the event become less frightening.During talk therapy, you may also learn ways to relax, especially when you start to have flashbacks.MEDICINESYour provider may suggest that you take medicines. They can help ease your depression or anxiety. They can also help you sleep better. Medicines need time to work. Do not stop taking them or change the amount (dosage) you take without talking to your provider. Ask your provider about possible side effects and what to do if you experience them."}, "Peripheral artery disease - legs": {"description": "Peripheral artery disease (PAD) is a condition of the blood vessels that supply the legs and feet. It leads to narrowing and hardening of the arteries. This causes decreased blood flow, which can injure nerves and other tissues.", "Possible Complications": "Blood clots or emboli that block small arteries, Coronary artery disease, Impotence, Open sores (ischemic ulcers) on the lower legs, Tissue death (gangrene), The affected leg or foot may need to be amputated. ", "Symptoms": ["At first, these symptoms may appear only when you walk uphill, walk faster, or walk for longer distances.", "Slowly, these symptoms\u00a0occur more quickly and with less exercise.", "Your legs or feet may feel numb when you are at rest. The legs also may feel cool to the touch, and the skin may look pale.", "Impotence", "Pain and cramps at night", "Pain or tingling in the feet or toes, which can be so severe that even the weight of clothes or bed sheets is painful", "Pain that is worse when you elevate the legs and improves when you dangle your legs over the side of the bed", "Skin that looks dark and blue", "Sores that do not heal"], "Exams and Tests": "During an exam, the health care provider may find:A whooshing sound when\u00a0the stethoscope is held over the artery (arterial bruits), Decreased blood pressure in the affected limb, Weak or absent pulses in the limb. When PAD is more severe, findings may include:Calf muscles that shrink (wither or atrophy), Hair loss over the legs, feet, and toes, Painful, non-bleeding sores on the feet or toes (usually black) that are slow to heal, Paleness of the skin or blue color in the toes or foot (cyanosis), Shiny, tight skin, Thick toenails. Blood tests may show high cholesterol or diabetes.Tests for PAD include:Angiography of the arteries in the legs (arteriography), Blood pressure measured in the arms and legs for comparison (ankle/brachial index, or ABI), Doppler ultrasound exam of an extremity, Magnetic resonance angiography or CT angiography. ", "Treatment": "Things you can do to control PAD include:Balance exercise with rest. Walk or do another activity to the point of pain and alternate it with rest periods. Over time, your circulation may improve as new, small (collateral) blood vessels form. Always talk to the doctor before starting an exercise program., Stop smoking. Smoking narrows the arteries, decreases the blood's ability to carry oxygen, and increases the risk of forming clots (thrombi and emboli)., Take care of your feet, especially if you also have diabetes. Wear shoes that fit properly. Pay attention to any cuts, scrapes, or injuries, and see your doctor right away. Tissues heal slowly and are more likely to get infected when there is decreased circulation. , Make sure your blood pressure is well-controlled., If you are overweight, reduce your weight., If your cholesterol is high, eat a low-cholesterol and low-fat diet., Monitor your blood sugar level if you have diabetes, and keep\u00a0it under control.. Medicines may be needed to control the disorder, including:Aspirin or a medicine called clopidogrel (Plavix), which keeps your blood from forming clots in your arteries. Do NOT stop taking these medications without first talking with your doctor., Cilostazol, a drug that works to enlarge (dilate) the affected artery or arteries for moderate-to-severe cases that are not\u00a0 candidates for surgery., Medicine to help lower your cholesterol., Pain relievers. . If you are taking medicines for high blood pressure or diabetes, take them as your doctor has prescribed.Surgery may be performed if the condition is severe and is affecting your ability to work or do important activities, or you are having pain at rest. Options are:Angioplasty and stent placement of the peripheral arteries (this is similar to the technique used to open the coronary arteries, but it is performed on the blood vessels of the affected leg), Peripheral artery bypass surgery of the leg. Some people with PAD may need to have the limb removed (amputated).", "Causes": "Peripheral artery disease is caused by arteriosclerosis, or \"hardening of the arteries.\" This problem occurs when fatty material (plaque) builds up on the walls of your arteries and makes them narrower. The walls of the arteries also become stiffer and cannot widen (dilate) to allow greater blood flow when needed.As a result, the muscles of your legs cannot get enough blood and oxygen when they are working harder (such as during exercise or walking). If PAD becomes severe, there may not be enough blood and oxygen, even when the muscles are resting.Peripheral artery disease is a common disorder. It most often affects men over age 50, but women can have it as well. People are at higher risk if they have a history of:Abnormal cholesterol, Diabetes, Heart disease (coronary artery disease), High blood pressure (hypertension), Kidney disease involving hemodialysis, Smoking, Stroke (cerebrovascular disease) . "}, "Pulmonary hypertension": {"Symptoms": ["Ankle and leg swelling", "Bluish color of the lips or skin (cyanosis)", "Chest pain or pressure, usually in the front of the chest", "Dizziness or fainting spells", "Fatigue", "Increased abdomen size", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination may show:Abnormal heart sounds, Feeling of a pulse over the breastbone, Heart murmur on the right side of the heart, Larger-than-normal veins in the neck, Leg swelling, Liver and spleen swelling, Normal breathing sounds. In the early stages of the disease, the exam may be normal or almost normal. The condition may take several months to diagnose. Asthma and other diseases may cause similar symptoms and must be ruled out.Tests may include:Blood tests, Cardiac catheterization, Chest x-ray, CT scan of the chest, Echocardiogram, ECG, Lung function tests, Nuclear lung scan, Pulmonary arteriogram, Six-minute walk test, Sleep study. ", "description": "Pulmonary hypertension is abnormally high blood pressure in the arteries of the lungs. It makes the right side of the heart work harder than normal.", "Causes": "The right side of the heart pumps blood through the lungs, where it picks up oxygen. Blood returns to the left side of the heart, where it is pumped to the\u00a0rest of the\u00a0body.When the small arteries (blood vessels) of the lung become narrowed, they cannot carry as much blood. When this happens, pressure builds up. This is called pulmonary hypertension.The heart needs to work harder to force the blood through the vessels against this pressure. Over time, this causes the right side of the heart to become larger. This condition is called right-sided heart failure, or cor pulmonale.Pulmonary hypertension may be caused by:Autoimmune diseases that damage the lungs, such as scleroderma and rheumatoid arthritis, Birth defects of the heart, Blood clots in the lung (pulmonary embolism), Heart failure, Heart valve disease, HIV infection, Low oxygen levels in the blood for a long time (chronic), Lung disease, such as COPD or pulmonary fibrosis, Medicines (for example, certain diet drugs), Obstructive sleep apnea. In many patients, the cause of pulmonary hypertension is unknown. In this case, the condition is called idiopathic pulmonary arterial hypertension (IPAH). Idiopathic means the cause of a disease is not known. IPAH is rare. It affects more women than men.If pulmonary hypertension is caused by a known medicine or medical condition, it is called secondary pulmonary hypertension.", "Treatment": "There is no cure for pulmonary hypertension. The goal of treatment is to control symptoms and prevent more lung damage. It is important to treat medical disorders that cause pulmonary hypertension, such as obstructive sleep apnea, lung conditions, and heart valve problems.Many treatment options for pulmonary arterial hypertension are available. If you are prescribed medicines, they may be taken by mouth (oral), received through the vein (intravenous, or IV), or breathed in (inhaled).\u00a0Your doctor will decide which medicine is best for you.\u00a0You will be closely monitored during treatment to watch for side effects and to see how well you are responding to\u00a0the medicine.\u00a0Do not stop taking your medicines without talking to your doctor.Other treatments may include:Blood thinners to reduce the risk of blood clots, especially if you have IPAH, Oxygen therapy at home, Heart-lung transplant, if medicines do not work. Other important tips to follow:Avoid pregnancy, Avoid heavy physical activities and lifting, Avoid traveling to high altitudes, Get a yearly flu vaccine, as well as other vaccines such as the pneumonia vaccine, Stop smoking. "}, "Peripheral neuropathy": {"description": "Peripheral neuropathy means these nerves don't work properly. Peripheral neuropathy may be damage to a single nerve. It may be damage to a nerve group. It may also affect nerves in the whole body.", "Symptoms": ["Sexual problems. Men may have problems with erections. Women may have trouble with vaginal dryness or orgasm.", "Some people may not be able to tell when their blood sugar gets too low.", "Bladder problems. You may leak urine. You may not be able to tell when your bladder is full. Some people are not able to empty their bladder.", "You may sweat too little or too much. This may cause problems controlling your body temperature."], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you and ask questions about your health history and symptoms.Blood tests may be done to look for causes of nerve damage.Your doctor may also recommend:Electromyography\u00a0-- to check activity in muscles, Nerve conduction studies\u00a0-- to see how fast signals travel along nerves, Nerve biopsy\u00a0-- to look at a sample of a nerve under a microscope . ", "Causes": "Neuropathy is very common. There are many types and causes. Often, no cause can be found. Some nerve diseases run in families.Diabetes is the most common cause of this type of nerve problem. High blood sugar levels over a long time can damage your nerves.Other health conditions that may cause neuropathy are:Autoimmune disorders, such as rheumatoid arthritis or lupus, Chronic kidney disease, HIV, Liver infections, Low levels of vitamin B12 or other vitamins, Metabolic disease, Poisoning due to heavy metals, such as lead, Poor blood flow to the legs, Underactive thyroid gland . Other things that can lead to nerve damage are:Broken bone that affects a nerve, Long-term, heavy alcohol use, Glue, lead, mercury, and solvent poisoning, Drugs that treat infections, cancer, seizures, and high blood pressure, Pressure on a nerve, such as from carpal tunnel syndrome, Being exposed to cold temperatures for a long period of time, Pressure from bad-fitting casts, splints, a brace, or crutches . ", "Prevention": "You can prevent some causes of nerve damage.Drink alcohol in moderation. , Follow a balanced diet. , Keep good control over diabetes and other medical problems. , Learn about chemicals used at your workplace.. ", "Treatment": "Treating the cause of nerve damage, if known, may improve your symptoms. People with diabetes should learn to control their blood sugar.If you use alcohol, stop. Your medicines may need to be changed. Do not stop taking any medicine before talking to your health care provider.Replacing a vitamin or making other changes in your diet may help. If you have low levels of B12 or other vitamins, your doctor may recommend supplements or injections.You may need surgery to remove pressure from a nerve.You may have therapy to learn exercises to improve muscle strength and control. Wheelchairs, braces, and splints may improve movement or the ability to use an arm or leg that has nerve damage.SETTING UP YOUR HOMESafety is very important for people with nerve damage. Nerve damage can increase the risk of falls and other injuries.Remove loose wires and rugs from areas where you walk. Do not keep small pets in your home. Fix uneven flooring in doorways.Have good lighting. Put handrails in the bathtub or shower and next to the toilet. Place a slip-proof mat in the bathtub or shower.WATCHING YOUR SKINWear shoes at all times to protect your feet from injury. Before you put them on, always check inside your shoes for stones, nails, or rough areas that may hurt your feet.Check your feet every day. Look at the top, sides, soles, heels, and between the toes. Wash your feet every day with lukewarm water and mild soap. Use lotion, petroleum jelly, lanolin, or oil on dry skin.Check bathwater temperature with your elbow before putting your feet in the water.Avoid putting pressure on areas with nerve damage for too long.TREATING PAINMedicines may help reduce pain in the feet, legs, and arms. They usually do not bring back loss of feeling.You may take pain pills. Medicines used to treat other medical problems, such as seizures or depression, can also help manage the pain. Use the lowest dose possible to avoid side effects.Your doctor may refer you to a pain specialist. Talk therapy may help you better understand how your pain is affecting your life. It can also help you learn ways to better cope with pain.TREATING OTHER SYMPTOMSTaking medications, sleeping with your head raised, and wearing elastic stockings may help with low blood pressure and fainting. Your health care provider may give you medicines to help with problems going to the bathroom. Eating small, frequent meals may help.To help bladder problems, you can learn exercises to strengthen your pelvic floor muscles. You may need to use a thin tube that is inserted into your bladder (urinary catheter). You may take medicines.Medicines can often help with erection problems."}, "Pulmonary valve stenosis": {"description": "Stenosis, or narrowing, occurs when the valve cannot open wide enough. As a result, less blood flows to the lungs.", "Possible Complications": "Abnormal heartbeats (arrhythmias), Death, Heart failure and enlargement of the right side of the heart\r\n  , Leaking of blood back into the right ventricle (pulmonary regurgitation) after repair. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal distention", "Bluish color to the skin (cyanosis) in some patients", "Chest pain", "Fainting", "Fatigue", "Poor weight gain or failure to thrive in infants with a severe blockage", "Shortness of breath", "Sudden death "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider may hear a heart murmur when listening to the heart using a stethoscope. Murmurs are blowing, whooshing, or rasping sounds heard during a heartbeat.Tests used to diagnose pulmonary stenosis may include:Cardiac catheterization, Chest x-ray, ECG, Echocardiogram, MRI of the heart. The health care provider will grade the severity of the valve stenosis to plan treatment. ", "Treatment": "Sometimes, treatment may not be needed if the disorder is mild.When there are also other heart defects, medicines may be used to:Help blood flow through the heart (prostaglandins), Help the heart beat stronger, Prevent clots (blood thinners), Remove excess fluid (water pills), Treat abnormal heartbeats and rhythms . Percutaneous balloon pulmonary dilation (valvuloplasty) may be performed when no other heart defects are present. This procedure is done through an artery in the groin., The doctor sends a flexible tube (catheter) with a balloon attached to the end up to the heart. Special x-rays are used to help guide the catheter., The balloon stretches the opening of the valve. . Some people may need heart surgery to repair or replace the pulmonary valve. The new valve can be made from different materials. If the valve cannot be repaired or replaced, other procedures may be needed.", "Causes": "Narrowing of the pulmonary valve is most often present at birth (congenital). It is caused by a problem that occurs as the baby develops in the womb before birth. The cause is unknown, but genes may play a role.Narrowing that occurs in the valve itself is called pulmonary valve stenosis. There may also be narrowing just before or after the valve. The defect may occur alone or with other heart defects that are present at birth. The condition can be mild or severe.Pulmonary valve stenosis is a rare disorder. In some cases, the problem runs in families."}, "Prostatitis - nonbacterial": {"description": "Chronic nonbacterial prostatitis causes long-term pain and urinary symptoms. It involves the prostate gland or other parts of a man's lower urinary tract or genital area. This condition is not caused by an infection with bacteria.", "Possible Complications": "Untreated symptoms of nonbacterial prostatitis may lead to sexual and urinary problems. These problems can affect your lifestyle and emotional well-being.", "Symptoms": ["Blood in the semen", "Blood in the urine", "Pain in the genital area and lower back ", "Pain with bowel movements", "Pain with ejaculation", "Problems with urinating"], "Exams and Tests": "Most of the time a physical exam is normal. However, the prostate may be swollen or tender.Urine tests may show white or red blood cells in the urine. A semen culture may show a higher number of white blood cells and low sperm count with poor movement. Urine culture or culture from the prostate does not show bacteria.", "Treatment": "Treatment for nonbacterial prostatitis is difficult. The problem is hard to cure, so the goal is to control symptoms. Several types of medicines may be used to treat the condition. These include:Long-term antibiotics to make sure that the prostatitis is not caused by bacteria. However, people who have had symptoms for a long time that are not helped by antibiotics should stop taking these medicines., Drugs called alpha-adrenergic blockers help relax the muscles of the prostate gland. It often takes about 6 weeks before these medicines start working. Many people do not get relief from these medicines., Aspirin, ibuprofen, and other nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs), which may relieve symptoms for some men. . Some people have found some relief from pollen extract (Cernitin) and allopurinol, although research does not confirm their benefit. Stool softeners may help reduce discomfort with bowel movements.Surgery, called transurethral resection of the prostate may be done in rare cases if medicine does not help. This surgery is not usually done on younger men because it may cause retrograde ejaculation. This can lead to sterility, impotence, and incontinence.Other treatments that may be tried include:Warm baths to ease some of the pain., Prostate massage, acupuncture, and relaxation exercises. However, none of these therapies have been proven to be effective. . ", "Causes": "Possible causes of nonbacterial prostatitis include:A past bacterial prostatitis infection, Bicycle riding, Less common types of bacteria, Irritation caused by a backup of urine flowing into the prostate, Irritation from chemicals, Nerve problem involving the lower urinary tract, Parasites, Pelvic floor muscle problem, Sexual abuse, Viruses. Life stresses and emotional factors may play a part in the problem. Most men with chronic prostatitis have the nonbacterial form."}, "Perianal streptococcal cellulitis": {"description": "Perianal streptococcal cellulitis is an inflammation of the anus and rectum caused by Streptococcus bacteria.", "Possible Complications": "Anal scarring, fistula, or abscess, Bleeding, discharge, Bloodstream or other streptococcal infections (including heart, joint, and bone), Kidney disease (acute glomerulonephritis), Severe skin and soft tissue infection (necrotizing fasciitis). ", "Symptoms": ["Fever", "Itching, pain, or bleeding with bowel movements", "Redness around the anus"], "Exams and Tests": "Rectal swab culture, Skin culture from rectal area, Throat culture. ", "Treatment": "The infection is treated with antibiotics for about 10 days, depending on how well and quickly it appears to be working. Penicillin is the most often used antibiotic in children who are not allergic to it.Mupirocin can be applied directly to the skin (topical). Topical medicine can be used along with other antibiotics, but should not be the only treatment.", "Causes": "Perianal streptococcal cellulitis usually occurs in children, often with or after strep throat, nasopharyngitis, or streptococcal skin infection (impetigo).Children may infect the skin around the anus while cleaning the area after using the toilet or by scratching with hands that have bacteria from their mouth or nose.", "Prevention": "Take a full course of antibiotics to eliminate the bacteria from the affected site. Careful handwashing can help prevent this and other infections caused by bacteria carried in the nose and throat."}, "Pulmonary alveolar proteinosis": {"Symptoms": ["Cough", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Shortness of breath", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor may hear crackles (\"rales\") in the lungs. Often, the physical examination is normal.The following tests may be done:Bronchoscopy with saline wash of the lungs (lavage), Chest x-ray, High-resolution CT scan of the chest, Pulmonary function tests, Open lung biopsy (surgical biopsy). ", "description": "Pulmonary alveolar proteinosis is a rare disease in which a type of protein builds up in the air sacs (alveoli) of the lungs, making breathing difficult.", "Causes": "In some cases, the cause of pulmonary alveolar proteinosis is unknown. In others, it occurs with lung infection or an immune problem. It also can occur with cancers of the blood system, and after exposure to high levels of environmental substances, such as silica or aluminum dust.This rare disorder generally affects people ages 30\u00a0to 50 and is seen in men more often than in women. A form of the disorder is present at birth (congenital).", "Treatment": "Treatment involves washing out the protein substance from the lung (whole-lung lavage) from time to time. Certain patients with this disease may need to have a lung transplant. Avoidance of dusts that might have caused the condition is also recommended.Research has shown some benefit to an experimental treatment that uses a blood-stimulating medication called granulocyte-macrophage colony stimulating factor (GM-CSF), which is known to be lacking in some patients with alveolar proteinosis."}, "Parathyroid cancer": {"description": "Parathyroid cancer is a cancerous (malignant) growth in a parathyroid gland.", "Possible Complications": "The cancer may spread (metastasize) to other places in the body, most commonly the lungs and bones.The most serious complication of parathyroid cancer is hypercalcemia. Most deaths from parathyroid cancer occur as a result of severe, difficult to control hypercalcemia, and not the cancer itself.The cancer commonly comes back (recurs). Additional surgeries may be needed. Complications from surgery can include:Hoarseness or voice changes as a result of damage to the nerve that controls the vocal cords, Infection at the site of surgery, Low level of calcium in the blood (hypocalcemia), a potentially life-threatening condition, Scarring . ", "Symptoms": ["Bone pain", "Constipation", "Fatigue", "Fractures", "Frequent thirst", "Frequent urination", "Kidney stones", "Muscle weakness", "Nausea", "Poor appetite", "Vomiting "], "Exams and Tests": "Parathyroid cancer is very hard to diagnose.Your doctor will perform a physical exam and ask about your medical history.About half of the time, feeling the neck with the hands (palpation) can reveal a cancerous parathyroid tumor.A cancerous parathyroid tumor tends to produce a very high amount of parathyroid hormone (PTH). Tests for this hormone may include:Blood calcium, Blood PTH. Before surgery, you will have a special radioactive scan of the parathyroid glands. The scan is called the sestamibi scan. You may also have a neck ultrasound. These tests are done to confirm which parathyroid gland is abnormal.", "Treatment": "The following treatments may be used to correct hypercalcemia due to parathyroid cancer:A drug called gallium nitrate, which lowers the calcium level in the blood , A natural hormone called calcitonin that helps control calcium level, Drugs that stop the breakdown and reabsorption of bones into the body, Fluids through a vein (IV fluids). Surgery is the recommended treatment for parathyroid cancer. Sometimes it is hard to determine whether a parathyroid tumor is cancerous. Your doctor may recommend surgery even without a confirmed diagnosis. Minimally invasive surgery, using smaller cuts, is becoming more common for parathyroid disease.If tests before the surgery can find the affected gland, surgery may be done on one side of the neck. If it is not possible to find the problem gland before surgery, the surgeon will look at both sides of your neck.Chemotherapy and radiation do not work well in preventing the cancer from coming back. Radiation can sometimes help reduce the spread of cancer to the bones. Repeated surgeries for cancer that has returned may increase survival rate and reduce the severe effects of hypercalcemia.", "Causes": "The parathyroid glands control the calcium level in the body. There are four parathyroid glands, two on top of each lobe of the thyroid gland, which is located at the base of the neck.Parathyroid cancer is a very rare type of cancer. Men and women are equally affected. It usually occurs in people older than 30.The cause of parathyroid cancer is unknown. People with a genetic condition called multiple endocrine neoplasia type I have an increased risk of this disease. People who had head or neck radiation may also be at increased risk. Such radiation exposure, however, is more likely to cause thyroid cancer."}, "Promethazine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Heart and blood vesselsRapid heartbeat, Convulsions. ", "Rapid heartbeat", "Convulsions", "Nervous system \r\n\r\nComa, Delirium, Depression, Disorientation, Drowsiness, Excitation, Fever, Hallucinations, Nervousness, Unsteadiness, Tremor. ", "Coma", "Delirium", "Depression", "Disorientation", "Drowsiness", "Excitation", "Fever", "Hallucinations", "Nervousness", "Unsteadiness", "Tremor", "Other \r\n\r\nFlushed skin, Large (dilated) pupils with vision difficulty, Muscle stiffness in face or neck. ", "Flushed skin", "Large (dilated) pupils with vision difficulty", "Muscle stiffness in face or neck"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Prerenal azotemia": {"description": "Prerenal azotemia is an abnormally high level of nitrogen waste products in the blood.", "Possible Complications": "Acute kidney failure\r\n, Acute tubular necrosis (tissue death). ", "Symptoms": ["Confusion", "Decreased alertness", "Decreased or no urine production", "Dry mouth", "Fast pulse", "Fatigue", "Pale skin color ", "Swelling", "Thirst", "Excessive urination at night", "Pain in the abdomen"], "Exams and Tests": "An examination may show:Collapsed neck veins, Dry mucus membranes, Little or no urine in the bladder, Low blood pressure, Low heart function or hypovolemia, Poor skin turgor, Rapid heart rate, Reduced pulse pressure (difference between systolic blood pressure and diastolic blood pressure), Signs of acute kidney failure. The following tests may be done:Blood creatinine, BUN, Urine osmolality and specific gravity, Urine tests to check sodium and creatinine levels and to monitor kidney function. ", "Treatment": "The main goal of treatment is to quickly correct the cause before the kidney becomes damaged. People often need to stay in the hospital, and may need treatment in an intensive care unit.Intravenous fluids, including blood or blood products, may be used to increase blood volume. After blood volume has been restored, medications may be used to increase blood pressure and heart output. These may include dopamine, dobutamine, and other heart medications. The cause of the decreased blood volume or blood pressure should be diagnosed and treated.If the person has other symptoms of acute kidney failure, treatment for it should include:Dialysis, including hemodialysis or dialysis inside the body (peritoneal dialysis), Diet changes, Medication. ", "Causes": "Prerenal azotemia is common, especially in people who are in the hospital.The kidneys normally filter the blood. When the volume or pressure of blood flow through the kidney drops, filtering of the blood also drops, or may not occur at all. Waste products stay in the blood and little or no urine is formed, even though the kidney itself is working.Nitrogen waste products, such as creatinine and urea, build up in the body (azotemia). These waste products act as poisons when they build up. They damage tissues and reduce the ability of the organs to function.Prerenal azotemia is the most common form of kidney failure in hospitalized patients. Any condition that reduces blood flow to the kidney may cause it, including:Burns, Conditions that allow fluid to escape from the bloodstream, Long-term vomiting, diarrhea, or bleeding, Loss of blood volume (such as with dehydration). Conditions in which the heart cannot pump enough blood or pumps blood at a low volume also increase the risk for prerenal azotemia. These conditions include:Heart failure, Shock (such as septic shock). It also can be caused by conditions that interrupt blood flow to the kidney, such as:Certain types of surgery, Injury to the kidney, Renal artery embolism, Renal artery occlusion. ", "Prevention": "Quickly treating any condition that reduces the volume or force of blood flow through the kidneys may help prevent prerenal azotemia."}, "Pulmonary embolus": {"description": "A pulmonary embolus is a blockage of an artery in the lungs. The most common cause of the blockage is a blood clot.", "Symptoms": ["Under the breastbone or on one side", "Sharp or stabbing", "Burning, aching, or dull, heavy sensation", "Usually gets worse with deep breathing", "You may bend over or hold your chest in response to the pain", "Bluish skin (cyanosis)", "Dizziness, lightheadedness, or fainting", "Fast breathing or wheezing", "Fast heart rate", "Feeling anxious", "Leg pain, redness, or swelling", "Low blood pressure", "Sudden cough, possibly coughing up blood or bloody mucus", "Shortness of breath that starts suddenly", "Sweating, clammy skin"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and ask about your symptoms and medical history.The following lab tests may be done to see how well your lungs are working:Arterial blood gases, Pulse oximetry . The following imaging tests can help determine where the blood clot is located:Chest x-ray, CT angiogram of the chest, Pulmonary ventilation/perfusion scan, also called a V/Q scan, Pulmonary angiogram. Other tests that may be done include:Chest CT scan, ECG, D-dimer level, Doppler ultrasound exam of the legs, Echocardiogram. ", "Causes": "A pulmonary embolus is most often caused by a blood clot in a vein. The most common blood clot is one in a deep vein of the thigh or in the pelvis (hip area). This type of clot is called a deep vein thrombosis (DVT). The blood clot breaks off and travels to the lungs.Less common causes include air bubbles, fat droplets, amniotic fluid, or clumps of parasites or tumor cells. You are more likely to get this condition if you or your family have a history of blood clots or certain clotting disorders. A pulmonary embolus may occur:After childbirth, After heart attack, heart surgery, or stroke, After severe injuries, burns, or fractures of the hips or thigh bone, After surgery, most commonly bone, joint, or brain surgery, During or after a long plane or car ride, If you have cancer, If you take birth control pills or estrogen therapy, Long-term bed rest or staying in one position for a long time. ", "Prevention": "Blood thinners may be prescribed to help prevent DVT in people at high risk, or those who are undergoing high-risk surgery.If you had a DVT, your doctor will prescribe pressure stockings. Wear them as instructed. They will improve blood flow in your legs and reduce your risk of blood clots.Moving your legs often during long plane trips, car trips, and other situations in which you are sitting or lying down for long periods can also help prevent DVT. People at very high risk of blood clots may need shots of a blood thinner called heparin when they take a flight that lasts longer than 4 hours.Do not smoke. If you smoke, quit. Women who are taking estrogen must stop smoking. ", "Treatment": "A pulmonary embolus requires treatment right away. You may need to stay in the hospital:You will receive medicines to thin the blood (to make it less likely your blood will form more clots)., In cases of severe, life-threatening pulmonary embolism, treatment may involve dissolving the clot. This is called thrombolytic therapy. You will receive medicines to dissolve the clot. . Whether or not you need to stay in the hospital, you will likely need to take medicines at home to thin the blood: You may be given pills to take or you may need to give yourself injections., For some medicines, you will need blood tests to monitor your dosage., How long you need to take these medicines depends mostly on the cause and size of your blood clot., Your health care provider will talk to you about the risk of bleeding problems when you take these medicines.. If you cannot take blood thinners, your doctor may suggest surgery to place a device called an inferior vena cava filter (IVC filter). This device is placed in the main vein in your belly. It keeps large clots from traveling into the blood vessels of the lungs. Sometimes a temporary filter can be placed and removed later."}, "Peutz-Jeghers syndrome": {"description": "Peutz-Jeghers syndrome (PJS) is a disorder passed down through families (inherited) in which the person develops intestinal polyps.\u00a0A person with PJS\u00a0has a\u00a0high risk developing certain cancers.", "Possible Complications": "Intussusception (part of the intestine folds in on itself), Polyps that lead to cancer, Ovarian cysts, Sex cord tumors. ", "Symptoms": ["Brownish or bluish-gray pigmented spots on the lips, gums, inner lining of the mouth, and skin", "Clubbed fingers or toes", "Cramping pain in the belly area", "Dark freckles on and around the lips of a newborn", "Blood in the stool that can be seen with the naked eye (occasionally)", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "The polyps develop mainly in the small intestine, but also in the colon. A colonoscopy will show colon polyps. The small intestine is evaluated with either a barium x-ray (small bowel series) or a small camera that is swallowed and then take multiple pictures as it travels through the small bowel (capsule endoscopy).Additional exams may show:Intussusception (part of the intestine folded in on itself), Noncancerous tumors in the ear (exostoses) . Laboratory tests may include:Complete blood count -- may reveal anemia, Genetic testing, Stool guaiac, Total iron-binding capacity (TIBC)\u00a0 - may be associated with iron-deficiency anemia. ", "Treatment": "Surgery may be needed to remove polyps that cause long-term problems. Iron supplements help counteract blood loss.Persons with this condition should be monitored by a health care provider and be checked periodically for cancerous polyp changes.", "Causes": "It is unknown how many people are affected by PJS. However, the National Institutes of Health estimates that it affects about 1 in 25,000 to 300,000 births.There are two types of PJS:Familial PJS\u00a0may be\u00a0due to a mutation in a gene called STK11. The genetic defect is passed down (inherited) through families as an autosomal dominant trait. That means if one of your parents has this type of PJS, you have a 50% chance of inheriting the\u00a0nonworking gene and having the disease., Sporadic PJS is not passed down through families and appears unrelated to\u00a0an STK11 gene mutation. . ", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling is recommended if you are planning to have children and have a family history of this condition."}, "Parathyroid adenoma": {"description": "A parathyroid adenoma is a noncancerous (benign) tumor of the parathyroid glands, which are located in the neck.", "Possible Complications": "Osteoporosis and the increased risk for bone fractures is the most common concern.Other complications are less common, but may include:Nephrocalcinosis (calcium deposits in the kidneys that can reduce kidney function), Osteitis fibrosa cystica (softened, weak areas in the bones). Complications from surgery include: Damage to a nerve that controls your voice, Damage to the parathyroid glands, which causes hypoparathyroidism (lack of enough parathyroid hormone) and low calcium levels. ", "Symptoms": ["Confusion", "Constipation", "Lethargy", "Muscle pain", "Nausea or decreased appetite", "Urinating more often at night "], "Exams and Tests": "Blood tests are done to check the levels of parathyroid hormone, calcium, phosphorus, and vitamin D.A 24-hour urine test may be done to check for increased calcium in the urine.Other tests include:Bone density exam, Kidney ultrasound or CT scan (may show kidney stones), Kidney x-rays (may show kidney stones), MRI, Neck ultrasound, Sestamibi neck scan (may show swelling of the parathyroid glands) . ", "Treatment": "Surgery is the most common treatment, and it often cures the condition. However, some people choose to only have regular check-ups with their health care provider if the condition is mild.Some medical treatments can also improve the condition. Your health care provider may ask you to stop taking calcium and vitamin D supplements. Postmenopausal women may want to discuss treatment with estrogen.", "Causes": "The parathyroid glands in the neck help control calcium use and removal by the body. They do this by producing parathyroid hormone, or PTH. PTH helps control calcium, phosphorus, and vitamin D levels in the blood and bone.Parathyroid adenomas can be due to a genetic problem. Parathyroid adenomas are the most common cause of hyperparathyroidism\u00a0(overactive parathyroid glands), which leads to increased blood calcium levels.Women over age 60 have the highest risk for developing this condition. Radiation to your head or neck also increases your risk."}, "Pinworms": {"description": "Pinworms are small worms that infect the intestines.", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty sleeping due to the itching that occurs during the night", "Intense itching around the anus", "Irritability due to itching and interrupted sleep", "Irritated or infected skin around the anus, from constant scratching", "Irritation or discomfort of the vagina in young girls (if an adult worm enters the vagina rather than the anus)", "Loss of appetite and weight (uncommon, but can occur in severe infections)"], "Exams and Tests": "Pinworms can be spotted in the anal area, especially at night when the worms lay their eggs there.Your doctor or nurse\u00a0may have you do a tape test. A piece of cellophane tape is pressed against the skin around the anus, and removed. This should be done in the morning before bathing or using the toilet, because bathing and wiping may remove eggs. The doctor will stick the tape to a slide and look for eggs using a microscope.", "Causes": "Pinworms are the most common worm infection in the United States. They are most common in school-age children.Pinworm eggs are spread directly from person to person. They can also be spread by touching bedding, food, or other items contaminated with the eggs.Typically, children are infected by unknowingly touching pinworm eggs and putting their fingers in their mouths. The eggs are swallowed, and eventually hatch in the small intestine. The worms mature in the colon.Female worms then move to the child's anal area, especially at night, and deposit more eggs. This may cause intense itching. The area may even become infected. When the child scratches the itching anal area, the eggs can get under the child's fingernails. These eggs can be transferred to other children, family members, and items in the house.", "Prevention": "Wash hands after using the bathroom and before preparing food. Wash bedding and underclothing frequently, especially those of any affected family members.", "Treatment": "Anthelmintic (anti-worm)\u00a0medicines are used to kill the pinworms (not their eggs). Your doctor or nurse will likely recommend one dose of\u00a0mebendazole or albendazole. These are available over-the-counter and by prescription.More than one household member is likely to be infected, so the entire household is often treated. Another dose is usually repeated after 2 weeks. This treats worms that hatched since the first treatment.To control the eggs:Clean toilet seats daily, Keep fingernails short and clean, Wash all bed linens twice a week, Wash hands before meals and after using the toilet. Avoid scratching the infected area around the anus. This can contaminate your fingers and everything else that you touch.Keep your hands and fingers away from your nose and mouth unless they are freshly washed. Be extra careful while family members are being treated for pinworms."}, "Prostatitis - bacterial": {"description": "Ongoing irritation of the prostate that is not caused by bacteria is called chronic nonbacterial prostatitis. ", "Possible Complications": "Abscess, Inability to urinate (urinary retention), Spread of bacteria from the prostate to the bloodstream (sepsis). ", "Symptoms": ["Chills", "Fever", "Flushing of the skin", "Blood in the urine", "Burning or pain with urination (dysuria)", "Difficulty starting to urinate or emptying the bladder", "Foul-smelling urine", "Weak urine stream ", "Pain or achiness in the abdomen above the pubic bone, in the lower back, in the area between the genitals and anus, or in the testicles", "Pain with ejaculation or blood in the semen", "Pain with bowel movements"], "Exams and Tests": "During a physical exam, your health care provider may find:Enlarged or tender lymph nodes in your groin, Fluid released from your urethra, Swollen or tender scrotum . The health care provider will perform a digital rectal exam to examine your prostate. During this exam, the provider inserts a lubricated, gloved finger into your rectum.The exam may reveal that the prostate is:Large and soft (with a chronic prostate infection), Warm, soft, swollen, or tender (with an acute prostate infection). Your doctor may do a prostatic massage to see whether you have an infection. To do this exam:The health care provider will rub a gloved finger over the prostate gland a few times to release fluid from the urethra, The fluid will be examined for signs of an infection. Urine samples may be collected for urinalysis and urine culture.Prostatitis may affect the results of the prostate-specific antigen (PSA), a blood test used to screen for prostate cancer.", "Treatment": "Antibiotics are often used to treat prostate infections.For acute prostatitis, you will take antibiotics for 4 to 6 weeks., For chronic prostatitis, you will take antibiotics for at least 4 to 6 weeks. Because the infection can come back, you may need to take medicine for up to 12 weeks.. Often, the infection will not go away even after taking antibiotics for a long time. Your symptoms may come back when you stop the medicine.If your swollen prostate gland makes it hard to empty your bladder, you may need a tube to empty it. The tube may be inserted through your abdomen (suprapubic catheter) or from inside your body (indwelling catheter).To care for prostatitis at home:Urinate often and completely., Take warm baths to relieve pain., Take stool softeners to make bowel movements more comfortable., Avoid substances that irritate your bladder, such as alcohol, caffeinated foods and drinks, citrus juices, and hot or spicy foods., Drink more fluid (64 - 128 ounces per day) to urinate often and help flush bacteria out of your bladder.. Get checked by your health care provider after you finish taking your antibiotic treatment to make sure the infection is gone. ", "Causes": "Prostatitis is most often caused by a bacterial infection of the prostate gland. Any bacteria that can cause a urinary tract infection can cause acute bacterial prostatitis.Some sexually transmitted diseases (STDs) can cause bacterial prostatitis. These include chlamydia and gonorrhea. STDs are more likely to occur from:Certain sexual practices, such as having anal sex without wearing a condom, Having many sexual partners. In men over age 35, E. coli and other common bacteria usually cause prostatitis. This type of prostatitis may occur after:Epididymitis, Urethritis, Urinary tract infections. Acute prostatitis may also be caused by problems with the urethra or prostate, such as:Bladder outlet obstruction, Foreskin of the penis that cannot be pulled back (phimosis), Injury to the area between the scrotum and anus (perineum), Urinary catheter, cystoscopy, or prostate biopsy (removing a piece of tissue to look for cancer). Men age 50 or older who have an enlarged prostate (benign prostatic hyperplasia) have a higher risk for prostatitis. The prostate gland may become blocked. This makes it easier for bacteria to grow. Symptoms of chronic prostatitis can be similar to symptoms of an enlarged prostate gland.", "Prevention": "Not all types of prostatitis can be prevented.You can prevent STD infections with safe sex behaviors."}, "Peripartum cardiomyopathy": {"description": "Peripartum cardiomyopathy is a rare disorder in which a pregnant woman's heart becomes weakened and enlarged. It develops during the last month of pregnancy, or within 5 months after the baby is born. ", "Possible Complications": "Cardiac arrhythmias (can be deadly), Congestive heart failure, Pulmonary emboli (blood clots in the lungs). ", "Symptoms": ["Fatigue", "Feeling of heart racing\u00a0or skipping beats (palpitations)", "Increased nighttime urination (nocturia)", "Shortness of breath with activity and when lying flat", "Swelling of the ankles "], "Exams and Tests": "During a physical exam, the health care provider will look for signs of fluid in the lungs by touching and tapping with the fingers. A stethoscope will be used to listen for lung crackles, a rapid heart rate, or abnormal heart sounds.The liver may be enlarged and neck veins may be swollen. Blood pressure may be low or may drop when standing up.Heart enlargement, congestion of the lungs or the veins in the lungs, decreased cardiac output, decreased movement or functioning of the heart, or heart failure may show up on:Chest x-ray, Chest CT scan, Coronary angiography, Echocardiogram, Nuclear heart scan, Cardiac MRI . A heart biopsy may help determine if the underlying cause of cardiomyopathy is a heart muscle infection (myocarditis). However, this procedure is not done very often. ", "Treatment": "A woman may need to stay in the hospital until acute symptoms subside.Because it is very often possible to restore heart function, and the women who have this condition are often young, everything possible is done to treat the problem. This may include extreme steps such as:Use of a balloon heart pump (aortic counterpulsation balloon), Immunosuppressive therapy (such as medicines used to treat cancer or prevent rejection of a transplanted organ), Heart transplant if severe congestive heart failure persists . For most women, however, treatment mainly focuses on relieving the symptoms. Some symptoms go away on their own without treatment.Medicines that are often used include:Digitalis to strengthen the heart's pumping ability, Diuretics (\"water pills\") to remove excess fluid, Low-dose beta-blockers . A low-salt diet may be recommended. Fluid may be restricted in some cases. Activities, including nursing the baby, may be limited when symptoms develop.Daily weighing may be recommended. A weight gain of 3\u00a0- 4 pounds or more over 1 or 2 days may be a sign of fluid buildup.Women who smoke and drink alcohol will be advised to stop, since these habits may make the symptoms worse.", "Causes": "Cardiomyopathy occurs when there is damage to the heart. As a result, the heart muscle becomes weak and does not pump well. This affects the lungs, liver, and other body systems.Peripartum cardiomyopathy is a form of dilated cardiomyopathy in which no other cause of heart weakening can be found.It may occur in childbearing women of any age, but it is most common after age 30.Risk factors for the condition include:Obesity, Personal history of cardiac disorders such as myocarditis, Use of certain medications, Smoking, Alcoholism, Multiple pregnancies, African-American descent, Poor nourishment . ", "Prevention": "Eat a well-balanced diet and get regular exercise to help keep your heart strong. Avoid cigarettes and alcohol. Your doctor may advise you to avoid getting pregnant again if you have had heart failure during a previous pregnancy."}, "Pneumonia - weakened immune system": {"description": "Related conditions include:", "Possible Complications": "Respiratory failure (the person needs machines to assist breathing), Sepsis, Spread of the infection, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Cough (may be dry or produce mucus-like, greenish, or pus-like sputum)", "Chills with shaking", "Easy fatigue", "Fever", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling (malaise)", "Headache", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea and vomiting", "Sharp or stabbing chest pain that gets worse with deep breathing or coughing", "Shortness of breath", "Heavy sweating or night sweats", "Stiff joints (rare)", "Stiff muscles (rare)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor may hear crackles or other abnormal breath sounds when listening to your chest with a stethoscope. Lack of breath sounds key sign. This may mean there is a buildup of fluid between the chest wall and lung (pleural effusion).Tests may include:Arterial blood gases, Blood chemistries, Blood culture, Bronchoscopy (in certain cases), Chest CT scan (in certain cases), Chest x-ray, Complete blood count, Lung biopsy (in certain cases), Serum Cryptococcus antigen test, Serum \u00df-glucan test, Serum galactomannan test, Sputum Gram stain, Sputum immunofluorescence tests (or other immune tests), Urine tests (to diagnose Legionnaire's disease) . ", "Treatment": "Antibiotics or antifungal medicines are used, depending on the type of germ that is causing the infection. You may need to stay in the hospital during the early stages of the illness.Oxygen and treatments to remove fluid and mucus from the respiratory system are often needed.", "Causes": "People whose immune system is not working well are less able to fight off germs. This makes them prone to infections from germs that do not often cause disease in healthy people. They are also more vulnerable to regular causes of pneumonia, which can affect anyone.Your immune system may be weakened or not work well because of:Bone marrow transplant, Chemotherapy, HIV infection, Leukemia, lymphoma, and other conditions that harm your bone marrow, Autoimmune disorders, Medications (including steroids, and those used to treat cancer and control autoimmune diseases), Organ transplant (including kidney, heart, and lung). ", "Prevention": "If you have a weakened immune system and are in the hospital, you may receive daily antibiotics to prevent some types of pneumonia.Ask your health care provider if you should receive the influenza (\"flu\") and pneumococcal (\"pneumonia\") vaccines.Practice good hygiene. Thoroughly wash your hands with soap and water:After being outdoors, After changing a diaper, After doing housework, After going to the bathroom, After touching body fluids, such as mucus or blood, After using the telephone, Before handling food or eating. Other things you can do to reduce your exposure to germs include:Keep your house clean., Stay away from crowds. , Ask visitors who have a cold to wear a mask or not to visit. , Do not do yard work or handle plants or flowers (they can carry germs).. "}, "Phenylketonuria": {"description": "Phenylketonuria (PKU) is a rare condition in which a baby is born without the ability to properly break down an amino acid called phenylalanine.", "Possible Complications": "Severe intellectual disability occurs if the disorder is untreated. ADHD (attention-deficit hyperactivity disorder) appears to be a common problem seen in those who do not stick to a very low-phenylalanine diet.", "Symptoms": ["Delayed mental and social skills", "Head size significantly below normal", "Hyperactivity", "Jerking movements of the arms or legs", "Intellectual disability", "Seizures", "Skin rashes", "Tremors", "Unusual positioning of hands"], "Exams and Tests": "PKU can be easily detected with a simple blood test. All states in the US require a PKU screening test for all newborns as part of the newborn screening panel. The test is generally done by taking a few drops of blood from the baby before the baby leaves the hospital.If the initial screening test is positive, further blood and urine tests are required to confirm the diagnosis.", "Treatment": "PKU is a treatable disease. Treatment involves a diet that is extremely low in phenylalanine, particularly when the child is growing. The diet must be strictly followed. This requires close supervision by a registered dietitian or doctor, and cooperation of the parent and child. Those who continue the diet into adulthood have better physical and mental health. \u201cDiet for life\u201d has become the standard recommended by most experts. This is especially important before conception and throughout pregnancy.Phenylalanine occurs in significant amounts in milk, eggs, and other common foods. The artificial sweetener NutraSweet (aspartame) also contains phenylalanine. Any products containing aspartame should be avoided.A special infant formula called Lofenalac is made for infants with PKU. It can be used throughout life as a protein source that is extremely low in phenylalanine and balanced for the remaining essential amino acids.Taking supplements such as fish oil to replace the long chain fatty acids missing from a standard phenylalanine-free diet may help improve neurologic development, including fine motor coordination. Other specific supplements, such as iron or carnitine, may be needed.", "Causes": "Phenylketonuria (PKU) is inherited, which means it is passed down through families. Both parents must pass on the defective gene in order for a baby to have the condition. This is called an autosomal recessive trait.Babies with PKU are missing an enzyme called phenylalanine hydroxylase, which is needed to break down an essential amino acid called phenylalanine. The substance is found in foods that contain protein.Without the enzyme, levels of phenylalanine and two closely-related substances build up in the body. These substances are harmful to the central nervous system and cause brain damage.", "Prevention": "An enzyme assay can determine if parents carry the gene for PKU. Chorionic villus sampling can be done during pregnancy to screen the unborn baby for PKU.It is very important that women with PKU closely follow a strict low-phenylalanine diet both before becoming pregnant and throughout the pregnancy, since build-up of this substance will damage the developing baby even if the child has not inherited the defective gene."}, "Poisoning - fish and shellfish": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal cramps", "Diarrhea (severe and watery)", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "A feeling that your teeth are loose and about to fall out", "Confusing hot and cold temperatures (for instance, you will feel that an ice cube is burning you, while a match is freezing your skin)", "Headache (probably the most common)", "Low heart rate and low blood pressure (in very severe cases)", "Metallic taste in the mouth", "Breathing problems (in severe cases)", "Extremely red skin on face and body", "Flushing", "Hives and itching", "Nausea", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or 1-800-222-1222 for a local poison control center."}, "Peppermint oil overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Slow heartbeat", "Shallow breathing", "Slow breathing", "Rapid breathing", "Abdominal pain", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "Blood in urine", "No urine production", "Convulsions", "Depression", "Dizziness", "Twitching", "Unconsciousness", "Uncoordinated movement", "Flushing"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Paint, lacquer, and varnish remover poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty (from inhalation)", "Throat swelling (may also cause breathing difficulty) ", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Vision loss ", "Abdominal pain -- severe", "Bloody stools", "Burns of the esophagus (food pipe)", "Vomiting, possibly with blood ", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure -- develops rapidly ", "Burns", "Irritation", "Necrosis (holes) in the skin or underlying tissues ", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Confusion", "Dizziness (from sniffing)", "Feeling of being drunk (euphoria)", "Incoordination", "Unsteadiness "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Paget\u2019s disease of the bone": {"description": "Paget's disease is a disorder that involves abnormal bone destruction and regrowth. This results in deformity of the affected bones.", "Possible Complications": "Bone fractures, Deafness, Deformities, Heart failure, Paraplegia, Spinal stenosis. ", "Symptoms": ["Bone pain, joint pain or stiffness, and neck pain\u00a0(the pain may be severe and present most of the time)", "Bowing of the legs and other visible deformities", "Enlarged head and skull deformities", "Fracture", "Headache", "Hearing loss", "Reduced height", "Warm skin over the affected bone "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may indicate Paget's disease include:Bone scan, Bone x-ray, Elevated markers of bone breakdown (for instance, N-telopeptide) . This disease may also affect the results of the following tests:ALP (alkaline phosphatase) isoenzyme, Serum calcium. ", "Treatment": "Not all people with Paget\u2019s disease need to be treated. Patients who may not need treatment include those who:Only have abnormal blood tests, Have no symptoms and no evidence of active disease . Paget's disease is commonly treated when:Certain bones, such as weight-bearing bones, are involved., Bony changes are getting worse quickly (treatment can reduce the risk of fractures)., Bony deformities are present., A person has pain or other symptoms., The skull is affected. (This is to prevent hearing loss.) . Drug therapy helps prevent further bone breakdown and formation. Currently, there are several classes of drugs used to treat Paget's disease. These include:Bisphosphonates. These drugs are the first treatment, and they help decrease bone remodeling. Medicines are commonly taken by mouth, but can also begiven through a vein (intravenously)., Calcitonin. This hormone is involved in bone metabolism. It may be given as a nasal spray (Miacalcin), or as an injection under the skin (Calcimar or Mithracin) . Acetaminophen (Tylenol) or non-steroidal anti-inflammatory medications (NSAIDs) may also be given for pain. In severe cases, orthopedic surgery may be needed to correct a deformity.", "Causes": "The cause of Paget's disease is unknown. It may be due to genetic factors or a viral infection early in life.The disease occurs worldwide, but is more common in Europe, Australia, and New Zealand.In people with Paget's disease, there is an abnormal breakdown of bone tissue in specific areas. This is, followed by abnormal bone formation. The new area of bone is larger, but weaker. The new bone is also filled with new blood vessels.The affected bone may only be in one or two areas of the skeleton, or throughout the body. It more often involves bones of the arms, collarbones, leg, pelvis, spine, and skull."}, "Polycythemia vera": {"Symptoms": ["Trouble breathing when lying down", "Dizziness", "Excess bleeding", "Full feeling in the left upper abdomen (due to enlarged spleen)", "Headache", "Itchiness, especially after a warm bath", "Red skin coloring, especially of the face", "Shortness of breath", "Symptoms of blood clots in veins near the skin surface (phlebitis)", "Bluish skin color", "Fatigue", "Red skin spots", "Vision problems"], "Possible Complications": "Acute myelogenous leukemia (AML), Bleeding from the stomach or other parts of the intestinal tract, Gout, Heart failure, Myelofibrosis, Thrombosis (blood clotting, which can cause a stroke, heart attack, or other body damage). ", "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. You may also have the following tests:Bone marrow biopsy, Complete blood count with differential, Comprehensive metabolic panel, Erythropoietin level, Genetic test for the JAK2V617F mutation, Oxygen saturation of the blood, Red blood cell mass, Vitamin B12 level. This disease may also affect the results of the following tests:ESR, Lactate dehydrogenase (LDH), Leukocyte alkaline phosphatase, Platelet aggregation test, Serum uric acid. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce the thickness of the blood and prevent bleeding and clotting.A method called phlebotomy is used to decrease blood thickness. One unit of blood (about 1 pint) is removed each week until the number of red blood cells drops. The treatment is continued as needed.Other treatments may include:Chemotherapy (specifically hydroxyurea) to reduce the number of red blood cells made by the bone marrow. This option may used when the numbers of other blood cell types are also high., Interferon to lower blood counts. , Anagrelide to lower platelet counts. Taking aspirin to reduce the risk of blood clots may be an option for some people. However, aspirin increase the risk of stomach bleeding.Ultraviolet-B light therapy can reduce the severe itching some patients experience.", "Causes": "Polycythemia vera is a disorder of the bone marrow. It mainly causes too many red blood cells to be produced. The numbers of white blood cells and platelets may increase as well..This is a rare disorder that occurs more often in men than in women. It is not often seen in people under age 40. The problem is often linked to a gene defect called JAK2V617F. The cause of this gene defect is unknown."}, "Plague": {"description": "Plague is a severe and potentially deadly bacterial infection.", "Symptoms": ["Chills", "Fever", "General ill feeling (malaise)", "Headache", "Muscle pain", "Seizures", "Smooth, painful lymph gland swelling called a buboCommonly found in the groin, but may occur in the armpits or neck, most often at the site of the infection (bite or scratch), Pain may occur in the area before the swelling appears. ", "Commonly found in the groin, but may occur in the armpits or neck, most often at the site of the infection (bite or scratch)", "Pain may occur in the area before the swelling appears", "Cough", "Difficulty breathing", "Fever", "Frothy, bloody sputum", "Pain in the chest when you breathe deeply", "Severe cough", "Abdominal pain", "Bleeding due to blood clotting problems", "Diarrhea", "Fever", "Nausea", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done include:Blood culture, Culture of lymph node aspirate (fluid taken from an affected lymph node or bubo), Sputum culture. ", "Causes": "Plague is caused by the bacteria Yersinia pestis. Rodents, such as rats, carry the disease. It is spread by their fleas.People can get plague when they are bitten by a flea that carries the plague bacteria from an infected rodent. In rare cases, people get the disease when handling an infected animal.Plague lung infection is called pneumonic plague. It\u00a0is spread from person-to-person. When someone with pneumonic plague coughs, tiny droplets carrying the bacteria move through the air. Anyone who breathes in these particles may catch the disease. An epidemic\u00a0can be started this way.In the Middle Ages in Europe, massive plague epidemics killed millions of people. Plague can still be found in Africa, Asia, and South America.Today, plague is rare in the United States. But it has been known to occur in parts of California, Arizona, Colorado, and New Mexico.There three most common forms of plague are:Bubonic plague, an infection of the lymph nodes, Pneumonic plague, an infection of the lungs, Septicemic plague, an infection of the blood. The time between being infected and developing symptoms is typically 2 to\u00a08 days.\u00a0But the time can\u00a0be as short as 1 day for pneumonic plague.Risk factors for plague include a recent flea bite and exposure to rodents, especially rabbits, squirrels, or prairie dogs, or scratches or bites from infected domestic cats.", "Prevention": "Rat control and watching for the disease in the wild rodent population are the main measures used to control the risk of epidemics. The plague vaccine is no longer used in the U.S. New vaccines are being developed.", "Treatment": "People with the plague need immediate treatment. If treatment is not received within 24 hours of when the first symptoms occur, death can result.Antibiotics such as streptomycin, gentamicin, doxycycline, or ciprofloxacin are used to treat plague. Oxygen, intravenous fluids, and respiratory support usually are also needed.Patients with pneumonic plague should be strictly isolated from caregivers and other patients. People who have had contact with anyone infected by pneumonic plague should be watched carefully and given antibiotics as a preventive measure."}, "Prolactinoma": {"Symptoms": ["Abnormal milk flow from the breast in a woman who is not pregnant or nursing (galactorrhea)", "Breast tenderness", "Decreased sexual interest", "Decreased peripheral vision", "Headache", "Infertility", "Stopping of menstruation not related to menopause, or irregular menstruation", "Vision changes", "Decreased sexual interest", "Decreased peripheral vision", "Enlargement of breast tissue (gynecomastia)", "Headache", "Impotence", "Infertility", "Vision changes", "Headache", "Lethargy", "Nasal drainage", "Nausea and vomiting", "Problems with the sense of smell", "Vision changes, such as double vision, drooping eyelids or visual field loss"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and ask about your symptoms. The doctor will also ask about medicines you are taking to treat conditions such as low thyroid or mental health problems.Tests that may be ordered include:Pituitary MRI or\u00a0brain CT scan, Decreased testosterone levels in men, Prolactin level, Thyroid function. ", "description": "A prolactinoma is a noncancerous (benign) pituitary tumor that produces a hormone called prolactin. This results in too much prolactin in the blood.", "Causes": "Prolactin is a hormone that triggers the breasts to produce milk (lactation).Prolactinoma is the most common type of pituitary tumor (adenoma). It makes up at least 30% of all pituitary adenomas.\u00a0Almost all\u00a0pituitary tumors are noncancerous (benign). Prolactinoma may occur as part of an inherited condition called multiple endocrine neoplasia type 1 (MEN 1)Prolactinomas occur most commonly in people under age 40. They are about five times more common in women than in men, but are rare in children.At least half of all prolactinomas are very small (less than 1 cm or 3/8 of an inch in diameter). These small tumors are more common in women. They stay small and never get larger.Larger tumors are more common in men. They tend to occur at an older age. The tumor can grow to a large size before symptoms appear.The tumor is often detected at an earlier stage in women than in men.Medicines that treat low thyroid function (hypothyroidism) and mental illnesses can raise prolactin level. This can cause symptoms similar to prolactinoma or an actual prolactinoma.", "Treatment": "Medicine is usually successful in treating prolactinoma. Some people have to take these medicines for life. Some people can stop taking them, especially if their tumor has disappeared from the MRI. But there is a risk that the tumor may grow and produce prolactin again, especially if it is a large tumor. A large prolactinoma can sometimes get larger during pregnancy.Surgery is done in some cases when symptoms are severe such as sudden worsening of vision.Radiation is usually only used in patients with prolactinoma that continues to grow or gets worse after both medication and surgery. It may be given in the form of:Conventional radiation, Gamma knife or stereotactic radiosurgery -- a type of radiation therapy that\u00a0focuses high-powered x-rays on a small area in the brain. . "}, "Peritonitis - spontaneous": {"description": "Peritonitis is inflammation of the peritoneum. This is the thin tissue that lines the inner wall of the abdomen and covers most of the abdominal organs.", "Possible Complications": "Hepatic encephalopathy, Hepatorenal syndrome, Sepsis. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain and bloating", "Abdominal tenderness", "Fever", "Low urine output", "Chills", "Joint pain", "Nausea and vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests will be done to check for infection and other causes of abdominal pain:Blood culture, \r\n  White blood cell count in a sample of peritoneal fluid\r\n  , \r\n  Chemical examination of peritoneal fluid\r\n  , Culture of peritoneal fluid, CT scan or ultrasound of the abdomen . ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause of the peritonitis.\r\n  Surgery may be needed if peritonitis is caused by a foreign object, such as a catheter used in peritoneal dialysis.\r\n  , \r\n  Antibiotics may control infection in cases of spontaneous peritonitis with liver or kidney disease.\r\n  , Intravenous therapy can treat dehydration.\r\n  . You may need to stay in the hospital so health care providers can rule out conditions such as such as appendicitis and diverticulitis.", "Causes": "Spontaneous peritonitis is most often caused by infection in fluid that collects in the peritoneal cavity (ascites). The fluid buildup often occurs with advanced liver or kidney disease.Risk factors for liver disease include:Very heavy alcohol use , Chronic viral hepatitis (hepatitis B or hepatitis C), Other diseases that lead to cirrhosis. Spontaneous peritonitis also occurs in people who are on peritoneal dialysis for kidney failure. Peritonitis may be due to inflammation, infection, or injury of the intestines. ", "Prevention": "Steps should be taken to prevent infection in people with peritoneal catheters.Antibiotics may be used:To prevent peritonitis from coming back in people with liver failure, To prevent peritonitis in people who have acute gastrointestinal bleeding due to other conditions. "}, "Peritonitis - secondary": {"description": "Secondary means it is due to another condition. It is most often caused by an infection that spreads from the digestive tract.", "Possible Complications": "Abscess, Gangrene (dead) bowel, Intraperitoneal adhesions ( (a potential cause of future bowel blockage), Septic shock. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal distention (swelling)\r\n  ", "Abdominal pain", "Decreased appetite", "Fever", "Low urine output", "Nausea", "Thirst", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "During a physical exam, the health care provider may notice abnormal vital signs with fever, rapid heart rate and breathing, and low blood pressure.Tests may include:Blood culture, Blood chemistry, including pancreatic enzymes, Complete blood count, Liver and kidney function tests, X-rays or CT scan, Peritoneal fluid culture, Urinalysis . ", "Treatment": "Often, surgery is needed to remove sources of infection. These may be an infected bowel, an inflamed appendix, or an abscess.General treatment includes:Antibiotics, Fluids through a vein (IV), Pain medicines, Tube through the nose into the stomach or intestine (nasogastric or NG tube) . ", "Causes": "Secondary peritonitis has several major causes. Bacteria may enter the peritoneum through a hole (perforation) in the gastrointestinal tract. The hole may be caused by a ruptured appendix, stomach ulcer, or perforated colon. It may also come from an injury, such as a gunshot or knife wound.Secondary peritonitis can also occur when bile or chemicals released by the pancreas (pancreatic enzymes) leak into the lining of the abdominal cavity.Substances from outside the body can also cause secondary peritonitis if they get into the peritoneal cavity. This can occur during use of peritoneal dialysis catheters or feeding tubes.Inflammation of the peritoneal cavity caused by bacteria can cause an infection of the bloodstream (sepsis). This is a severe illness.Secondary peritonitis can also affect premature babies who have necrotizing enterocolitis."}, "Phenytoin overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Coma", "Confusion", "Convulsions (occasionally) ", "Dizziness", "Fever", "Low blood pressure ", "Rigidity", "Sleepiness", "Side-to-side eye movement (nystagmus)", "Slurred speech", "Swollen gums", "Tremor", "Unsteadiness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Paroxysmal supraventricular tachycardia (PSVT)": {"Symptoms": ["Anxiety", "Chest tightness", "Palpitations (a sensation of feeling the heart beat), often with an irregular or fast rate (racing)", "Rapid pulse", "Shortness of breath", "Dizziness", "Fainting"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam during a PSVT episode will show a rapid heart rate. It may also show forceful pulses in the neck.The heart rate may be over 100, and even more than 250 beats per minute (bpm). In children, the heart rate tends to be very high. There may be signs of poor blood circulation such as light-headedness. Between episodes of PSVT, the heart rate is normal (60 to 100 bpm).An ECG during symptoms shows PSVT. An electrophysiology study (EPS) may be needed for an accurate diagnosis and to find the best treatment.Because PSVT comes and goes, to diagnose it patients may need to wear a 24-hour Holter monitor. For longer periods of time, another tape of the rhythm recording device may be used.", "description": "Paroxysmal supraventricular tachycardia (PSVT)\u00a0is\u00a0episodes of rapid heart rate\u00a0that start in a part of the heart above the ventricles. \"Paroxysmal\" means from time to time. ", "Causes": "Normally, the chambers of the heart (atria and ventricles) contract in a coordinated manner. The contractions are caused by an electrical signal that begins in an area of the heart called the sinoatrial node (also called the sinus node or SA node)., The signal moves through the upper heart chambers (the atria) and tells the atria to contract., After this, the signal moves down in the heart and tells the lower chambers (the ventricles) to contract. . The rapid heart rate from PSVT may start with events that occur in areas of the heart above the lower chambers (ventricles). PSVT can develop when doses of the heart medicine, digitalis, are too high. It can also occur with a condition known as Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome, which is most often seen in young people and infants.The following increase your risk for PSVT:Alcohol use, Caffeine use\r\n  , \r\n  Illicit drug use\r\n  , \r\n  Smoking\r\n  . ", "Treatment": "PSVT that occurs only once in a while may not need treatment if you don't have symptoms or other heart problems.You can try the following techniques to interrupt a fast heartbeat during an episode of PSVT: Valsalva maneuver. To do this, you hold your breath and strain, as if you were trying to have a bowel movement., Coughing while sitting with your upper body bent forward., Splashing ice water on your face . You should avoid smoking, caffeine, alcohol, and illicit drugs.Emergency treatment to slow the heartbeat back to normal may include:Electrical cardioversion, the use of electric shock, Medicines through a vein . Long-term treatment for people who have repeat episodes of PSVT, or who also have heart disease, may include:Cardiac ablation, a procedure used to destroy small areas in your heart that may be causing the rapid heartbeat (currently the treatment of choice for most PSVTs), Daily medications to prevent repeat episodes, Pacemakers to override the fast heartbeat (on occasion may be used in children with PSVT who have not responded to any other treatment), Surgery to change the pathways in the heart that send electrical signals (this may be recommended in some cases for people who need other heart surgery) . "}, "Psoriasis": {"description": "Psoriasis is a common skin condition that causes skin redness and irritation. Most people with psoriasis have thick, red skin with flaky, silver-white patches called scales.", "Symptoms": ["Itchy", "Dry and covered with silver, flaky skin (scales)", "Pink-red in color (like the color of salmon)", "Raised and thick ", "Genital sores in males", "Joint pain or aching", "Nail changes, including thick nails, yellow-brown nails, dents in the nail, and a lifting of the nail from the skin underneath", "Severe dandruff on the scalp ", "Erythrodermic -- The skin redness is very intense and covers a large area.", "Guttate -- Small, pink-red spots appear on the skin.", "Inverse -- Skin redness and irritation occurs in the armpits, groin, and in between overlapping skin.", "Plaque -- Thick, red patches of skin are covered by flaky, silver-white scales. This is the most common type of psoriasis.", "Pustular -- White blisters are surrounded by red, irritated skin. "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or nurse can very often diagnose this condition by looking at your skin. Sometimes, a skin biopsy is done to rule out other possible conditions. If you have joint pain, your doctor may order x-rays.", "Causes": "Psoriasis is very common. Anyone can get it, but it most often begins between ages 15 and 35.You cannot catch psoriasis or spread it to others.Psoriasis seems to be passed down through families. Doctors think it may be an autoimmune condition. This occurs when the immune system mistakenly attacks and inflames or destroys healthy body tissue. Normal skin cells grow deep in the skin and rise to the surface about once a month. When you have psoriasis, this process takes place too fast. Dead skin cells build up on the skin's surface.The following may trigger an attack of psoriasis or make the condition harder to treat: Bacteria or viral infections, including strep throat and upper respiratory infections, Dry air or dry skin, Injury to the skin, including cuts, burns, and insect bites, Some medicines, including antimalaria drugs, beta-blockers, and lithium, Stress, Too little sunlight, Too much sunlight (sunburn), Too much alcohol . Psoriasis may be worse in people who have a weak immune system. This may be due to:AIDS, Autoimmune disorders (such as rheumatoid arthritis), Cancer chemotherapy . Some people with psoriasis may also have arthritis (psoriatic arthritis).", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent psoriasis. Keeping the skin clean and moist and avoiding your specific psoriasis triggers may help reduce the number of flare-ups.Doctors recommend daily baths or showers for persons with psoriasis. Avoid scrubbing too hard, because this can irritate the skin and trigger an attack.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to control your symptoms and prevent infection.Three treatment options are available:Skin lotions, ointments, creams, and shampoos. These are called topical treatments., Pills or injections that affect the body's immune response, not just the skin. These are called systemic, or body-wide, treatments., Phototherapy, which uses light to treat psoriasis. . TREATMENTS USED ON THE SKIN (TOPICAL)Most of the time, psoriasis is treated with medicines that are placed directly on the skin or scalp. These may include:Cortisone creams and ointments, Creams or ointments that contain coal tar or anthralin, Creams to remove the scaling (usually salicylic acid or lactic acid), Dandruff shampoos (over-the-counter or prescription), Moisturizers, Prescription medicines containing vitamin D or vitamin A (retinoids). SYSTEMIC (BODY-WIDE) TREATMENTSIf you have very severe psoriasis, your doctor will likely recommend medicines that suppress the immune system's faulty response. These medicines include methotrexate or cyclosporine. Retinoids such as acitretin can also be used.Newer drugs called biologics are used when other treatments do not work. Biologics approved for the treatment of psoriasis include:Adalimumab (Humira), Etanercept (Enbrel), Infliximab (Remicade), Stelara . PHOTOTHERAPYSome people may choose to have phototherapy.Phototherapy is a medical treatment in which your skin is carefully exposed to ultraviolet light., Phototherapy may be given alone or after you take a drug that makes the skin sensitive to light., Phototherapy for psoriasis can be given as ultraviolet A (UVA) or ultraviolet B (UVB) light.. OTHER TREATMENTSIf you have an infection, your doctor will prescribe antibiotics.AT HOME CAREFollow these tips at home: Taking a daily bath or shower can help your psoriasis. Try not to scrub too hard because this can irritate the skin and trigger an attack., Oatmeal baths may be soothing and may help to loosen scales. You can use over-the-counter oatmeal bath products. Or, you can mix 1 cup of oatmeal into a tub of warm water., Keeping your skin clean and moist and avoiding your specific psoriasis triggers may help reduce the number of flare-ups., Sunlight may help your symptoms go away. Be careful not to get sunburned., Relaxation and antistress techniques may be helpful. The link between stress and flares of psoriasis is not well understood, however., Limiting the alcoholic beverages you drink may help keep psoriasis from getting worse. . "}, "Pulmonary actinomycosis": {"description": "Pulmonary actinomycosis is a rare bacterial lung infection.", "Possible Complications": "Brain abscess, Destruction of parts of the lungs, Emphysema, Meningitis, Osteomyelitis (bone infection). ", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain when taking a deep breath", "Cough with phlegm (sputum) ", "Fever", "Lethargy", "Night sweats", "Shortness of breath", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done include:Bronchoscopy with culture, Complete blood count (CBC), Chest x-ray, Chest CT scan, Lung biopsy, Modified AFB smear of sputum, Sputum culture, \r\n  Tissue and sputum Gram stain, Thoracentesis with culture, Tissue culture, Tissue and fluid analysis. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to cure the infection. Many patients take a long time to get better. To be cured, you may need to receive the antibiotic penicillin through a vein (intravenously) for 4 to 6 weeks. Then you need to take\u00a0penicillin by mouth. Some people need up to 18 months of treatment.If you cannot take penicillin, your doctor will prescribe other antibiotics.Surgery may be needed to drain fluid from the lungs and control the infection.", "Causes": "Pulmonary actinomycosis is caused by certain bacteria normally found in the mouth and gastrointestinal tract, where they do not usually cause harm. Poor dental hygiene and dental abscess can increase your risk\u00a0of face, jaw, and lung infections caused by these bacteria.Alcohol abuse, having scars on the lungs (bronchiectasis), and emphysema are all associated with lung infections caused by actinomycosis.The disease is rare in the U.S. It may occur at any age, but most patients are 30\u00a0to 60 years old. Men get this infection more often than women.", "Prevention": "Good dental hygiene may help reduce your risk of getting actinomycosis."}, "Periactin overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Eyes and skin \r\n\r\nDilated pupils, Flushed skin. ", "Dilated pupils", "Flushed skin", "Heart and blood vessels \r\n\r\nConvulsions, Low blood pressure, Rapid heartbeat. ", "Convulsions", "Low blood pressure", "Rapid heartbeat", "Nervous system \r\n\r\nAgitation, Coma, Confusion, Delirium, Depression, Disorientation, Drowsiness, Excitation, Hallucinations, Nervousness, Unsteadiness. ", "Agitation", "Coma", "Confusion", "Delirium", "Depression", "Disorientation", "Drowsiness", "Excitation", "Hallucinations", "Nervousness", "Unsteadiness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Peritonitis": {"description": "Peritonitis is an inflammation (irritation) of the peritoneum. This is the thin tissue that lines the inner wall of the abdomen and covers most of the abdominal organs.", "Possible Complications": "Peritonitis can be life-threatening and may cause complications.\u00a0These depend on the type of peritonitis.", "Symptoms": ["Fever and chills", "Passing little or no stools or gas", "Excessive fatigue", "Passing less urine", "Nausea and vomiting", "Racing heartbeat", "Shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will perform a physical exam. The abdomen is usually tender. It\u00a0may feel firm or \"board-like.\" Persons with peritonitis usually curl up or refuse to let anyone touch the area.Blood tests, x-rays, and CT scans may be done. If there is a lot of fluid in the belly area, the doctor may use a needle to remove some and send it for testing.", "Treatment": "The cause must be identified and treated promptly. Treatment typically involves surgery and antibiotics.", "Causes": "Peritonitis is caused by a collection of blood, body fluids, or pus in the abdomen (intra-abdominal abscess).Types of peritonitis are:Spontaneous peritonitis, Secondary peritonitis. "}, "Polyarteritis nodosa": {"description": "Polyarteritis nodosa is a serious blood vessel disease. The small and medium-sized arteries become swollen and damaged.", "Possible Complications": "Heart attack, Intestinal necrosis and perforation, Kidney failure, Stroke. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Decreased appetite", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Joint aches", "Muscle aches", "Unintentional weight loss", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "No lab tests are available to diagnose polyarteritis nodosa. You will have a physical exam. Lab tests that can help make the diagnosis include:Arteriogram, Complete blood count (CBC), creatinine, tests for hepatitis B and C, and urinalysis , Erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR) or C-reactive protein (CRP) , Tissue biopsy, Other blood tests may be done to rule out similar conditions, such as systemic lupus erythematosus (ANA) or granulomatosis with polyangiitis (ANCA).. ", "Treatment": "Treatment involves medicines to suppress the immune system. These may include steroids, such as prednisone. Similar medicines, such as azathioprine, methotrexate or mycophenolate that allow for reducing the dose of steroids are often used as well. Cyclophosphamide is used in severe cases.For polyarteritis nodosa related to hepatitis, treatment may involve plasmapheresis and antiviral medicines.", "Causes": "Arteries\u00a0are the blood vessels that carry oxygen-rich blood to organs and tissues. The cause of polyarteritis nodosa is unknown. The condition occurs when certain immune cells attack the affected arteries.More adults than children get this disease. The tissues that are fed by the affected arteries do not get the oxygen and nourishment they need. Damage occurs as a result. People with active hepatitis B\u00a0or hepatitis\u00a0C may develop this disease.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention. However, early treatment can prevent some damage and symptoms."}, "Post-streptococcal glomerulonephritis (GN)": {"description": "Post-streptococcal glomerulonephritis (GN) is a disorder of the kidneys that occurs after infection with certain strains of Streptococcus bacteria.", "Possible Complications": "Acute renal failure, Chronic glomerulonephritis, Chronic renal disease, Congestive heart failure or pulmonary edema, End-stage renal disease, Hyperkalemia, High blood pressure (hypertension), Nephrotic syndrome. ", "Symptoms": ["Decreased urine output", "Rust-colored urine", "Swelling (edema), general swelling, swelling of the abdomen, swelling of the face or eyes, swelling of the feet, ankles, hands \r\n ", "Visible blood in the urine", "Joint pain", "Joint stiffness or swelling"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination shows swelling (edema), especially in the face. Abnormal sounds may be heard when listening to the heart and lungs with a stethoscope (auscultation). Blood pressure is often high.Other tests that may be done include:Anti-DNase B, Kidney biopsy (this is usually not needed), Serum ASO (and streptolysin O), Serum complement levels, Urinalysis. ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for post-streptococcal glomerulonephritis. Treatment is focused on relieving symptoms.Antibiotics, such as penicillin, should be used to destroy any streptococcal bacteria that remain in the body., Blood pressure medications and diuretic medications may be needed to control swelling and high blood pressure., Corticosteroids and other anti-inflammatory medications are generally not effective.. You may need to limit salt in the diet to control swelling and high blood pressure.", "Causes": "Post-streptococcal GN is a form of glomerulonephritis. It is caused by an infection with a type of streptococcus bacteria. The infection does not occur in the kidneys, but in a different part of the body, such as the skin or throat.The strep bacterial infection causes the tiny blood vessels in the filtering units of the kidneys (glomeruli) to become inflamed. This makes the kidneys less able to filter the urine.Post-streptococcal GN is uncommon today because infections that can lead to the disorder are commonly treated with antibiotics. The disorder may develop 1 - 2 weeks after an untreated throat infection, or 3 - 4 weeks after a skin infection.It may occur in people of any age, but it most often occurs in children ages 6 - 10. Although skin and throat infections are common in children, post-streptococcal glomerulonephritis is a rare complication of these infections.Risk factors include:Strep throat, Streptococcal skin infections (such as impetigo). ", "Prevention": "Treating known streptococcal infections may prevent post-streptococcal GN."}, "Poison ivy - oak - sumac rash": {"Symptoms": ["Extreme itching", "Red, streaky, patchy rash where the plant touched the skin", "Red bumps, which may form large, weeping blisters"], "Causes": "The rash is caused by skin contact with the oils (resin) of certain plants. The oils usually enter the skin rapidly.\u00a0POISON IVY\u00a0This is one of the most frequent causes of skin rash among children and adults who spend time outdoors., The plant has three shiny green leaves and a red stem. . Poison ivy typically grows in the form of a vine, often along riverbanks. It can be found throughout much of the United States.POISON OAKThis plant\u00a0grows in the form of a shrub and has three leaves similar to poison ivy. Poison oak is mostly found on the West Coast.POISON SUMACThis plant\u00a0grows as a woody shrub. Each stem contains 7\u00a0to 13 leaves arranged in pairs. Poison sumac grows abundantly along the Mississippi River.AFTER CONTACT WITH THESE PLANTSThe rash does not spread by the fluid from the blisters. Therefore, once a person has washed the oil off the skin, the rash does not often spread from person to person., The plant oils may remain for a long time on clothing, pets, tools, shoes, and other surfaces. Contact with these items can cause rashes in the future if they are not cleaned well. . Smoke from burning these plants can cause the same reaction.", "description": "Poison ivy, oak, and sumac are plants that commonly cause an allergic skin reaction. The result is most often an itchy, red rash with bumps or blisters.", "Prevention": "Wear long sleeves, long pants, and socks when walking in areas where these plants may grow. , Apply skin products such as Ivy Block lotion beforehand to reduce the risk of a rash.. Other steps include:Learn to identify poison ivy, oak, and sumac. Teach children to identify them as soon as they are able to learn about\u00a0these plants. , Remove these plants if they grow near your home (but never burn them). , Be aware of plant resins carried by pets. , Wash skin, clothing and other items as soon as possible after you think you may have come in contact with the plant.. "}, "Poliomyelitis": {"description": "Poliomyelitis is a viral disease that can affect nerves and can lead to partial or full paralysis.", "Possible Complications": "Aspiration pneumonia, Cor pulmonale (a form of heart failure found on the right side of the circulation system), Lack of movement, Lung problems, Myocarditis, Paralytic ileus (loss of intestinal function), Permanent muscle paralysis, disability, deformity, Pulmonary edema, Shock, Urinary tract infections. Post-polio syndrome is a complication that develops in some patients, usually 30 or more years after they are first infected. Muscles that were already weak may get weaker. Weakness may also develop in muscles that were not affected before.", "Symptoms": ["General discomfort or uneasiness (malaise)", "Headache", "Red throat", "Slight fever", "Sore throat", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider may find:Abnormal reflexes, Back stiffness, Difficulty lifting the head or legs when lying flat on the back, Stiff neck , Trouble bending the neck . Tests include:Cultures of throat washings, stools, or spinal fluid, Spinal tap and examination of the spinal fluid (CSF examination) using PCR, Test for levels of antibodies to the polio virus. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to control symptoms while the infection runs its course. There\u00a0is no specific treatment for this viral infection.People with severe cases may need lifesaving measures, especially breathing help.Symptoms are treated based on their severity. Treatment may include:Antibiotics for urinary tract infections, Moist heat (heating pads, warm towels) to reduce muscle pain and spasms, Painkillers to reduce headache, muscle pain, and spasms (narcotics are not usually given because they increase the risk of breathing trouble), Physical therapy, braces or corrective shoes, or orthopedic surgery to help recover muscle strength and function. ", "Causes": "Poliomyelitis is a disease caused by infection with the poliovirus. The virus spreads by:Direct person-to-person contact, Contact with infected mucus or phlegm from the nose or mouth, Contact with infected feces. The virus enters through the mouth and nose, multiplies in the throat and intestinal tract, and then is absorbed and spread through the blood and lymph system. The time from being infected with the virus to developing symptoms of disease (incubation) ranges from 5 - 35 days (average 7 - 14 days). Most people do not develop symptoms.Risks include:Lack of immunization against polio, Travel to an area that has experienced a polio outbreak . Outbreaks can still occur in the developed world, usually in groups of people who have not been vaccinated. Polio often occurs after someone travels to a region where there has been an outbreak of disease. As a result of a massive, global vaccination campaign over the past 20 years, polio exists only in a few countries in Africa and Asia. These include Afghanistan, Cameroon, Equatorial Guinea, Ethiopia, Iraq, Israel, Nigeria, Pakistan, Somalia, and Syria.", "Prevention": "Polio immunization (vaccine) effectively prevents poliomyelitis in most people (immunization is over 90% effective)."}, "Psittacosis": {"description": "Psittacosis is an infection caused by Chlamydophila psittaci, a type of bacteria found in the droppings of birds. Birds spread the infection to humans.", "Possible Complications": "Brain involvement, Decreased lung function as a result of the pneumonia, Heart valve infection, Inflammation of the liver (hepatitis). ", "Symptoms": ["Blood-tinged sputum", "Dry cough", "Fatigue", "Fever and chills", "Headache", "Joint aches", "Muscle aches (especially in the head and neck)\r\n ", "Shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will hear abnormal lung sounds such as crackles and decreased breath sounds when listening to the chest with a stethoscope.Tests include:Antibody titer (rising titer over time is a sign of infection), Blood culture, Blood gases, CT scan of the chest, Sputum culture, X-ray of the chest. ", "Treatment": "The infection is treated with antibiotics. Doxycycline is used first. Other antibiotics that may be prescribed include:Macrolides, Fluoroquinolones, Other tetracycline antibiotics . Note: Tetracycline and doxycycline by mouth\u00a0are usually not prescribed for children until after all their permanent teeth have started to grow in, because they can permanently discolor teeth that are still forming. These medicines are also not prescribed to pregnant women. Other antibiotics are used in these situations.", "Causes": "Psittacosis is a rare disease. Only\u00a0100\u00a0to 200 cases are reported each year in the United States.Bird owners, pet shop employees, persons who work in poultry processing plants, and veterinarians are at increased risk for this infection. Typical birds involved are parrots, parakeets, and budgerigars, although other birds have also caused the disease.", "Prevention": "Avoid exposure to birds that may carry these bacteria, such as imported parakeets. Medical problems that lead to a weak immune system increase your risk for this disease and should be treated appropriately."}, "Pancreatic abscess": {"description": "A pancreatic abscess is an area filled with pus within the pancreas.", "Possible Complications": "Multiple abscesses\r\n, Sepsis. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal mass", "Abdominal pain", "Chills", "Fever", "Inability to eat", "Nausea and vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Most people with pancreatic abscesses have had pancreatitis. However, the complication often takes 7 or more days to develop.Signs of an abscess can be seen on:CT scan of the abdomen, MRI of the abdomen, Ultrasound of the abdomen . ", "Treatment": "It may be possible to drain the abscess through the skin (percutaneous). Abscess drainage can be done through an endoscope using endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in some cases. Surgery to drain the abscess and remove dead tissue is often needed.", "Causes": "Pancreatic abscesses develop in people who have pancreatic pseudocysts that become infected.", "Prevention": "Draining a pancreatic pseudocyst may help prevent some cases of pancreatic abscess. However, in many cases the disorder is not preventable."}, "Pericarditis - constrictive": {"description": "Related conditions include:", "Possible Complications": "Cardiac tamponade, Damage to the coronary arteries, Heart failure, Pulmonary edema, Scarring of the heart muscle. ", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty breathing (dyspnea) that develops slowly and gets worse", "Fatigue", "Long-term swelling (edema) of the legs and ankles", "Swollen abdomen", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "Constrictive pericarditis is very hard to diagnose. Signs and symptoms are similar to other conditions such as restrictive cardiomyopathy and cardiac tamponade. Your doctor will need to rule out these conditions when making a diagnosis.A physical exam may show that your neck veins stick out. This indicates increased blood pressure in the area. It is called Kussmaul's sign. The doctor may note weak or distant heart sounds when listening to your chest with a stethoscope.The physical exam may also reveal liver swelling and fluid in the belly area.The following tests may be ordered:Chest MRI, Chest CT scan, Chest x-ray, Coronary angiography or cardiac catheterization, ECG, Echocardiogram. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to improve heart function. The cause must be identified and treated. Depending on the source of the problem, treatment may include antibiotics, medicines for tuberculosis, or other treatments. Diuretics (\"water pills\") are often used in small doses to help the body remove excess fluid. Pain medicines may be needed for discomfort.Some people may need to cut down on their activity. A low-sodium diet may also be recommended.If other methods do not control the problem, surgery called a pericardiectomy may be needed. This involves cutting or removing the scarring and part of the sac-like covering of the heart.", "Causes": "Most of the time, constrictive pericarditis occurs due to things that cause inflammation to develop around the heart, such as: Heart surgery, Radiation therapy to the chest, Tuberculosis. Less common causes include:Abnormal fluid buildup in the covering of the heart. This may occur because of infection or as a complication of surgery., Mesothelioma. The condition may also develop without a clear cause. It is rare in children.", "Prevention": "Constrictive pericarditis in some cases is not preventable.However, conditions that can lead to constrictive pericarditis should be properly treated."}, "Pernicious anemia": {"description": "Pernicious anemia is a decrease in red blood cells that occurs when the intestines cannot properly absorb vitamin B12.", "Possible Complications": "People with pernicious anemia may have gastric polyps. They are also more likely to develop gastric cancer and gastric carcinoid tumors.Brain and nervous system problems may continue or be permanent if treatment is delayed.A woman with low B12 levels may have a false positive Pap smear. This is because vitamin B12 deficiency affects the way certain cells (epithelial cells) in the cervix look.", "Symptoms": ["Desire to eat ice or other non-food things (pica)", "Diarrhea or constipation", "Fatigue, lack of energy, or light-headedness when standing up or with exertion", "Loss of appetite", "Pale skin", "Problems concentrating", "Shortness of breath, mostly during exercise", "Swollen, red tongue or bleeding gums ", "Confusion", "Depression", "Loss of balance", "Numbness and tingling in the hands and feet "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will perform a physical exam. Tests that may be done include: Bone marrow examination (only needed if diagnosis is unclear), Complete blood count (CBC), Reticulocyte count, Schilling test, LDH level, Methylmalonic acid (MMA) level, Vitamin B12 level, Levels of antibodies against IF or the cells which make IF . Pernicious anemia may also affect the results of the following tests:Bilirubin, Cholesterol test, Gastrin, Leukocyte alkaline phosphatase, Peripheral smear, TIBC. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to increase your vitamin B12 levels: Treatment involves a shot of vitamin B12 once a month. Persons with severely low levels of B12 may need more shots in the beginning., Some patients may also need to take vitamin B12 supplements by mouth. For some people, high-dose vitamin B12 tablets taken by mouth work well, and shots are not needed., A certain type of vitamin B12 may be given through the nose. . Your doctor or nurse will also recommend eating a well-balanced diet. ", "Causes": "Pernicious anemia is a type of vitamin B12 anemia. The body needs vitamin B12 to make red blood cells. You get this vitamin from eating foods such as meat, poultry, shellfish, eggs, and dairy products. A special protein, called intrinsic factor (IF), helps your intestines absorb vitamin B12. This protein is released by cells in the stomach. When the stomach does not make enough intrinsic factor, the intestine cannot properly absorb vitamin B12.Common causes of pernicious anemia include:Weakened stomach lining (atrophic gastritis), An autoimmune condition in which the body's immune system attacks the actual intrinsic factor protein or the cells in the lining of your stomach that make it. . Very rarely, pernicious anemia is passed down through families. This is called congenital pernicious anemia. Babies with this type of anemia do not make enough intrinsic factor. Or they cannot properly absorb vitamin B12 in the small intestine. In adults, symptoms of pernicious anemia are usually not seen until after age 30. The average age of diagnosis is age 60. You are more likely to get this disease if you:Are Scandinavian or Northern European, Have a family history of the condition . Certain diseases can also raise your risk. They include:Addison disease, Chronic thyroiditis, Graves disease, Hypoparathyroidism, Hypopituitarism, Myasthenia gravis, Secondary amenorrhea, Type 1 diabetes, Testicular dysfunction, Vitiligo. ", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent this type of vitamin B12 anemia. However, early detection and treatment can help reduce complications."}, "Parainfluenza": {"description": "Parainfluenza refers to a group of viruses that lead to upper and lower respiratory infections.", "Possible Complications": "Secondary bacterial infections are the most common complication. Airway obstruction in croup and bronchiolitis can be severe and\u00a0even life threatening.", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Cough", "Croup", "Fever", "Runny nose", "Shortness of breath", "Sore throat", "Stuffy nose", "Wheezing"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show sinus tenderness, swollen glands, and a red throat. The doctor will listen to the lungs and chest with a stethoscope. Abnormal sounds, such as crackling or wheezing, may be heard.Tests that may be done include:Arterial blood gases, Blood cultures (to rule out other causes of pneumonia), Chest x-ray, CT scan of the chest, Complete blood count (CBC), Swab of nose for rapid viral test, Blood cultures (to rule out other causes of pneumonia). ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for the viral infection. Specific treatments are available for the symptoms of croup and bronchiolitis to make breathing easier. ", "Causes": "There are four types of parainfluenza virus, all of which can cause upper respiratory infections or lower respiratory infections (pneumonia) in adults and children. The virus can cause croup, bronchiolitis, bronchitis and certain types of pneumonia.The exact number of parainfluenza cases is unknown. The number is suspected to be very high. Sometimes the viruses cause only a runny nose and other symptoms that may be diagnosed as a simple cold rather than parainfluenza.Infections are most common in fall and winter. Parainfluenza infections are most severe in infants and become less severe with age. By school age, most children have been exposed to the parainfluenza virus. Most adults have antibodies against parainfluenza, although they can get repeat infections.", "Prevention": "There are no vaccines available for parainfluenza. Avoiding crowds to limit exposure during peak outbreaks may decrease the likelihood of infection. Wash your hands often.Limiting exposure to day care centers and nurseries may delay infection until the child is older."}, "Plastic casting resin poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Difficulty breathing", "Rapid breathing", "Severe pain in the throat", "Severe pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Loss of vision", "Throat swelling (which may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Severe abdominal pain", "Vomiting", "Burns of the esophagus (food pipe)", "Vomiting blood", "Blood in the stool", "Hypotension (low blood pressure) - develops rapidly", "Collapse", "Irritation", "Burn", "Necrosis (holes) in the skin or underlying tissues"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all poisons in childproof containers, with original labels, and out of reach of children."}, "Phenobarbital overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Blisters", "Breathing problems - slowed or stopped", "Confusion", "Coma", "Delirium", "Deep sleep", "Excitement", "Headache", "Low blood pressure", "Slurred speech", "Unsteady gait", "Weak pulse"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the\u00a0Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Pancreatic cancer": {"description": "Pancreatic cancer is cancer that starts in\u00a0the pancreas.", "Symptoms": ["Diarrhea", "Dark urine and clay-colored stools", "Fatigue and weakness", "Increase in blood sugar levals (diabetes)", "Jaundice (a yellow color in the skin, mucous membranes, or white part of the\u00a0eyes) and itching of the skin", "Loss of appetite and weight loss", "Nausea and vomiting", "Pain or discomfort in the upper part of the belly or abdomen "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and ask about your symptoms. During the exam, the doctor may feel a lump (mass) in your abdomen. Blood tests that may be ordered include:Complete blood count (CBC), Liver function tests, Serum bilirubin. Imaging tests that may be ordered include:CT scan of the abdomen, Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), Endoscopic ultrasound, MRI of the abdomen, Pancreatic biopsy. If tests confirm you have pancreatic cancer, more tests will be done to see if the cancer has spread. This is called staging. Staging helps guide treatment and gives you an idea of what to expect.\r\n", "Causes": "The pancreas is a large organ behind the stomach. It makes and releases enzymes into the intestines that help the body absorb food, especially fats. The pancreas also makes and releases insulin and glucagon. These are hormones that help the body control blood sugar level.There are different types of pancreatic cancers. The type depends on the cell the cancer develops in. Examples include:Glucagonoma, Insulinoma, Islet cell tumor, VIPoma. The exact cause of pancreatic cancer is unknown. It is more common in persons who:Are obese, Have a diet high in fat and low in fruits and vegetables, Have diabetes, Have long-term exposure to certain chemicals, Have long-term inflammation of the pancreas (chronic pancreatitis), Smoke. Pancreatic cancer is slightly more common in women than in men. The risk increases with age. Family history of the disease also increases the chance of getting this cancer.", "Prevention": "If you smoke, now is the time to quit., Keep\u00a0a diet high in fruits, vegetables, and whole grains., Exercise regularly to stay at a healthy weight.. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the stage of the tumor.Surgery may be done if the tumor has not spread or has spread very little. Along with surgery, chemotherapy or radiation therapy or both may be used.When the tumor has not spread out of the pancreas but cannot be removed, chemotherapy and radiation therapy together may be recommended.\r\nWhen the tumor has spread (metastasized) to other organs such as the liver, chemotherapy alone is usually used.With advanced cancer, the goal of treatment is to\u00a0manage pain and other symptoms. For example, if the tube that carries bile is blocked by the pancreatic tumor, a procedure to place a tiny metal tube (stent) may be done to open the blockage. This can help relieve loss of appetite, jaundice, and itching of the skin. \r\n"}, "Pharyngitis - viral": {"description": "Viral pharyngitis is inflammation of the pharynx (the part of the throat between the tonsils and the larynx).", "Possible Complications": "Complications of viral pharyngitis are extremely uncommon.", "Symptoms": [" \r\n Discomfort when swallowing \r\n ", "Fever", "Joint pain or muscle aches", "Sore throat", "Tender, swollen lymph nodes in the neck"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider usually diagnoses pharyngitis by examining your throat. A lab test of fluid from your throat will show that bacteria (such as group A streptococcus, or strep) is not the cause of the sore throat.", "Treatment": "\r\nThere is no specific treatment for viral pharyngitis. You can relieve symptoms by gargling with warm salt water several times a day (use \u00bd teaspoon of salt in a glass of warm water).\u00a0 Taking anti-inflammatory drugs or medications, such as acetaminophen, can control fever. Excessive use of anti-inflammatory lozenges or sprays may make a sore throat worse.It is important NOT to take antibiotics when a sore throat is due to a viral infection. The antibiotics will not help. Using them to treat viral infections helps bacteria become resistant to antibiotics.With some sore throats (such as those caused by infectious mononucleosis), the lymph nodes in the neck may become very swollen. They may be treated with anti-inflammatory drugs, such as prednisone.", "Causes": "Most sore throats are caused by viral pharyngitis.Pharyngitis may occur as part of a viral infection that also involves other organs, such as the lungs or bowel.", "Prevention": "Most cases are not preventable, because the viruses and bacteria that cause sore throats are commonly found in the environment. However, always wash your hands after contact with a person who has a sore throat. Avoid kissing or sharing cups and eating utensils with sick individuals."}, "Pyloric stenosis": {"Symptoms": ["Vomiting may occur after every feeding or only after some feedings", "Vomiting usually starts around 3 weeks of age, but may start any time between 1 week and 5 months of age", "Vomiting is forceful (projectile vomiting)", "The infant is hungry after vomiting and wants to feed again", "Abdominal pain", "Burping", "Constant hunger", "Dehydration (gets worse as vomiting gets worse)", "Failure to gain weight or weight loss", "Wave-like motion of the abdomen shortly after feeding and just before vomiting occurs"], "Exams and Tests": "The condition is usually diagnosed before the baby is 6 months old.A physical exam may reveal: Signs of dehydration, such as dry skin and mouth, less tearing when crying, and dry diapers, Swollen belly, Olive-shaped mass when feeling the upper belly, which is the abnormal pylorus. Ultrasound of the abdomen may be the first imaging test. Other tests that may be done include:Barium x-ray -- reveals a swollen stomach and narrowed pylorus, Blood tests -- often reveals an electrolyte imbalance. ", "description": "Pyloric stenosis is a narrowing of the pylorus, the opening from the stomach into the small intestine.", "Causes": "\r\n\r\nNormally, food passes easily from the stomach into the first part of the small intestine through a valve called the pylorus. With pyloric stenosis, the muscles of the pylorus are thickened. This prevents the stomach from emptying into the small intestine.The cause of the thickening is unknown. Genes may play a role, since children of parents who had pyloric stenosis are more likely to have this condition.Pyloric stenosis occurs most often in infants younger than 6 months. It is more common in boys than in girls. ", "Treatment": "Treatment for pyloric stenosis involves surgery to widen the pylorus. The surgery is called pyloromyotomy.If putting the infant to sleep for surgery is not safe, a device called an endoscope with a tiny balloon at the end is used.\u00a0The balloon is inflated to widen the pylorus. In infants who cannot have surgery, tube feeding or medicine to relax the pylorus is tried."}, "Pancreatic pseudocyst": {"description": "A pancreatic pseudocyst is a fluid-filled sac in the abdomen. It may also contain tissue from the pancreas, pancreatic enzymes, and blood.", "Possible Complications": "A pancreatic abscess can develop if the pseudocyst becomes infected., The pseudocyst can break open (rupture), which can be a serious complication because shock and excess bleeding (hemorrhage) may develop., The pseudocyst may press down on (compress) nearby organs. . ", "Symptoms": ["Bloating of the abdomen", "Constant pain or deep ache in the abdomen, which may also be felt in the back ", "Difficulty eating and digesting food"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider may\u00a0feel your abdomen for a pseudocyst. It will feel like a lump in the middle or left upper abdomen.Tests that may help diagnose pancreatic pseudocyst include:Abdominal CT scan, Abdominal MRI, Abdominal ultrasound, Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) . ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the size of the pseudocyst and whether it is causing symptoms. Many pseudocysts go away on their own. Those that remain for more than 6 weeks and are larger than 5 cm in diameter often need treatment.Possible treatments include:Drainage through the skin using a needle, usually guided by a CT scan, Endoscopic-assisted drainage using an endoscope (a tube containing a camera and a light that is passed down into the stomach), Surgical drainage of the pseudocyst, which involves making a connection between the cyst and the stomach or small intestine. This may be done using a laparoscope.. ", "Causes": "The pancreas is an organ located behind the stomach. It produces chemicals (called enzymes) needed to digest food. It also produces the hormones insulin and glucagon.Pancreatic pseudocysts most often develop after an episode of severe, acute pancreatitis. Acute pancreatitis is sudden swelling (inflammation) of the pancreas.A pancreatic pseudocyst may occur in someone with chronic pancreatitis. It may also occur after trauma to the abdomen, more often in children.The cyst happens when the ducts (tubes) in the pancreas are damaged by the inflammation or swelling that occurs during pancreatitis.", "Prevention": "The way to prevent pancreatic pseudocysts is by preventing pancreatitis. If pancreatitis is caused by gallstones, it is often necessary to remove the gallbladder with surgery (cholecystectomy). When pancreatitis occurs due to alcohol abuse, you must stop drinking alcohol to prevent future attacks.When pancreatitis occurs due to high blood triglycerides, this condition should be treated."}, "Pentazocine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Bluish skin color (cyanosis)", "Breathing difficulty", "Constipation", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Dry mouth", "Headache", "Rapid heart beat and blood pressure changes", "Pinpoint pupils \u00a0", "Seizures", "Stomach cramps", "Vomiting", "Anxiety and restlessness", "Diarrhea", "Goose bumps", "Rapid heart rate", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Pubic lice": {"description": "Pubic lice are tiny insects that infect the pubic hair area and lay eggs. These lice can also be found in armpit hair and eyebrows.", "Symptoms": ["Skin reaction that causes skin to turn bluish-gray in color", "Sores in the genital area due to bites and scratching "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will do an exam to look for:Small gray-white oval eggs (nits) attached to the hart shafts in the outer genital area. Adult lice may also be present., Scratch marks or signs of an infection, such as impetigo.. Because pubic lice may cause an eye infection (blepharitis) in young children, eyelashes should be viewed with a high-powered magnifying glass.Adult lice may be easily identified under the microscope. Pubic lice are often referred to as \"the crabs\" because of their appearance.Teenagers with pubic lice may need to be tested for other sexually transmitted infections (STIs).", "Causes": "Pubic lice are known as Pthirus pubis.\u00a0They are\u00a0found mostly in teenagers. Pubic lice are often spread\u00a0during sexual activity.Rarely, pubic lice can\u00a0passed through contact with objects such as toilet seats, sheets, blankets, or bathing suits at a store. Animals cannot spread lice to humans.Other types of lice include:Body lice, Head lice. You are at greater risk for pubic lice if you:Have many sexual partners, Have sexual contact with an infected person, Share bedding or clothing with an infected person. ", "Prevention": "Avoid sexual or intimate contact with people you know have pubic lice until they have been treated. Bathe or shower often and keep your bedding clean.\u00a0Avoid trying on bathing suits while you are shopping. If you must try on swimwear, be sure to wear your underwear. This may prevent you from getting or spreading pubic lice.", "Treatment": "MEDICINESPubic lice are best treated with a prescription wash containing permethrin, such as Elimite or Kwell:Thoroughly work the shampoo into dry\u00a0pubic hair and surrounding area for at least 5 minutes., Rinse well., Comb the pubic hair with a fine-toothed comb to remove eggs (nits). Applying vinegar to pubic hair before combing may help loosen nits. . Most people need only 1 treatment. If a second treatment is needed,\u00a0it should be done 4 days to 1 week later.Over-the-counter medicines\u00a0to treat\u00a0lice include Rid and Nix. Malathione lotion is another option.OTHER CAREWhile you are treating pubic lice:Wash all clothing and bedding in hot water. , Spray items\u00a0that cannot be washed may be sprayed with a medicated spray that you can buy at the store. You can also seal items\u00a0in plastic bags for 10 - 14 days to smother lice. , Makes sure anyone\u00a0with whom you have had sexual contact or shared a bed be treated at the same time.. People with pubic lice should be checked for other sexually-transmitted infections when\u00a0lice are discovered.\u00a0"}, "Peptic ulcer": {"description": "A peptic ulcer is an open sore or raw area in the lining of the stomach or intestine.", "Possible Complications": "Severe blood loss , Scarring from an ulcer may make it harder for the stomach to empty, Perforation or hole of the stomach and intestines. ", "Symptoms": ["Feeling of fullness and problems drinking as much fluid as usual", "Hunger and an empty feeling in the stomach, often 1 - 3 hours after a meal", "Mild nausea that may go away with vomiting ", "Pain or discomfort in the upper abdomen", "Pain in the upper abdomen that wakes you up at night", "Bloody or dark tarry stools", "Chest pain", "Fatigue", "Vomiting, possibly bloody", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "To diagnose an ulcer, your doctor may perform a test called an upper endoscopy (EGD).This is a test to examine the lining of the esophagus (the tube that connects your throat to your stomach), stomach, and first part of the small intestine., It is done with a small camera (flexible endoscope) that is inserted down the throat.. Upper endoscopy is done on most people when peptic ulcers are suspected or when you:Are older than 45 to 50, Have a low blood count (anemia), Have trouble swallowing, Are vomiting blood or your stools are blood or dark and tarry looking , Have been losing weight without trying. Tests for H. pylori is also needed.Your doctor may also order these tests:Hemoglobin blood test to check for anemia, Stool occult blood test to test for blood in your stool . Sometimes, you may need a test called an upper GI. A series of x-rays are taken after you drink a thick substance called barium.", "Treatment": "In order for your ulcer to heal and to reduce the chance it will come back, you will be given medicines to: Kill the H. pylori bacteria (if present), Reduce acid levels in the stomach. Take all of your medicines as your doctor recommends. Other changes in your lifestyle can also help.If you have a peptic ulcer with an H. pylori infection, the standard treatment uses different combinations of the following medications for 7- 14 days:Two different antibiotics to kill H. pylori, Proton pump inhibitors such as omeprazole (Prilosec), lansoprazole (Prevacid), or esomeprazole (Nexium), Bismuth (the main ingredient in Pepto-Bismol) may be added to help kill the bacteria. If you have an ulcer without an H. pylori infection, or one that is caused by taking aspirin or NSAIDs, your doctor will likely prescribe a proton pump inhibitor for 8 weeks. You may also be prescribed this type of medicine if you must continue taking aspirin or NSAIDs for other health conditions.Other medicines used for ulcers are:Misoprostol, a drug that may help prevent ulcers in people who take NSAIDs on a regular basis, Medicines that protect the tissue lining (such as sucralfate). If a peptic ulcer bleeds a lot, an EGD may be needed to stop the bleeding. Methods used to stop the bleeding include:Injecting medicine in the ulcer, Applying metal clips to the ulcer. Surgery may be needed if:Bleeding cannot be stopped with an EGD, The ulcer has caused a tear. ", "Causes": "Normally, the lining of the stomach and small intestines can protect itself against strong stomach acids. But if the lining breaks down, the result may be:Swollen and inflamed tissue, called (gastritis) , An ulcer. Watch this video about:Stomach ulcerMost ulcers occur in the first layer of the inner lining. A hole that goes all the way through the stomach or duodenum is called a perforation. A perforation is a medical emergency.The most common cause of ulcers is infection of the stomach by bacteria called Helicobacter pylori (H.pylori). Most people with peptic ulcers have these bacteria living in their digestive tract. Yet, many people who have these bacteria in their stomach do not develop an ulcer.The following factors raise your risk for peptic ulcers:Drinking too much alcohol, Regular use of aspirin, ibuprofen, naproxen, or other nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs). Taking aspirin or NSAIDs once in a while is safe for most people., Smoking cigarettes or chewing tobacco, Being very ill, such as being on a breathing machine, Having radiation treatments. A rare condition called Zollinger-Ellison syndrome causes stomach and duodenal ulcers.Many people believe that stress causes ulcers. It is not clear if this is true for normal stress.", "Prevention": "Avoid aspirin, ibuprofen, naproxen, and other NSAIDs. Try acetaminophen instead. If you must take such medicines, talk to your doctor first. Your doctor may:Test you for H. pylori before you take these medicines, Have you take proton pump inhibitors (PPIs) or an acid blocker, Have you take a drug called misoprostol . The following lifestyle changes may help prevent peptic ulcers:Do not smoke or chew tobacco., Limit alcohol to no more than two drinks per day. . "}, "Posterior cruciate ligament (PCL) injury": {"Symptoms": ["Knee swelling and tenderness in the space behind the knee (popliteal fossa)", "Knee joint instability", "Knee joint pain"], "Causes": "The posterior cruciate ligament (PCL) is the strongest ligament in the knee. It extends from the top-rear surface of the tibia (bone between the knee and ankle) to the bottom-front surface of the femur (bone that extends from the pelvis to the knee).The ligament prevents the knee joint from posterior instability. This means it prevents the tibia from moving too much and going behind the femur.The PCL is usually injured by overextending the knee (hyperextension). This can happen if you land awkwardly after jumping. The PCL can also become injured from a direct blow to the flexed knee, such as smashing your knee in a car accident (called \"dashboard injury\") or falling hard on a bent knee.Most PCL injuries occur with other ligament injuries and severe knee trauma. Often the knee is dislocated\u00a0and the\u00a0nerves and blood vessels are injured. If you suspect PCL injury, it is important to be seen by a doctor right away.", "description": "A posterior cruciate ligament injury is a partial or complete tearing or stretching of any part of the posterior cruciate ligament (PCL), which is located inside the knee joint.", "Prevention": "Use proper techniques when playing sports or exercising. Many cases are accidents and are not preventable."}, "Psoriasis - guttate": {"description": "Guttate psoriasis is a skin condition in which small, red, and scaly teardrop-shaped spots appear on the arms, legs, and middle of the body. Guttate means \"drop\" in Latin.", "Possible Complications": "Pain, Secondary skin infections, Severe itching. ", "Symptoms": ["Itching", "Spots on the skin that\u00a0are pinkish-red and look like teardrops. ", "Spots may be covered with silver, flaky skin called scales.", "Spots usually occur on the arms, legs, and middle of the body (the trunk), but may appear in other body areas."], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will look at your skin. Diagnosis is usually based on what the spots look like.Often, a person with this type of psoriasis has recently had a sore throat or upper respiratory infection.Tests to confirm the diagnosis may include:Skin biopsy, Throat culture. ", "Treatment": "Goal of treatment is to control your symptoms and prevent secondary infections.If you have a current or recent infection, your doctor may give you antibiotics.Mild cases of guttate psoriasis are usually treated at home. Your doctor may recommend any of the following:Cortisone (anti-itch and anti-inflammatory) cream, Dandruff shampoos (over-the-counter or prescription), Lotions that contain coal tar, Moisturizers, Prescription medicines\u00a0that have\u00a0vitamin D to apply to the skin (topically) or that have vitamin A (retinoids) to take by mouth (orally).. Persons with very severe guttate psoriasis may receive medicines to suppress the body's immune response. These medicines include cyclosporine and methotrexate.Your doctor may suggest\u00a0phototherapy.\u00a0This is a medical procedure in which your skin is carefully exposed to ultraviolet light. Phototherapy may be given alone or after you take a\u00a0medicine that makes the skin sensitive to light.", "Causes": "Guttate psoriasis is a\u00a0type \u00a0of psoriasis. It is usually seen in patients younger than 30. The condition often develops suddenly, usually after an infection, most notably strep throat. Guttate psoriasis is not contagious. This means it cannot spread to other people.Psoriasis seems to be passed down through families. Doctors think it probably occurs when the body's immune system mistakes healthy cells for harmful substances.\r\n In addition to strep throat, the following may trigger an attack of guttate psoriasis:Bacteria or viral infections, including upper respiratory infections, Injury to the skin, including cuts, burns, and insect bites, Some medicines, including those used to treat malaria and certain heart conditions, Stress, Sunburn, Too much alcohol. Psoriasis may be severe in persons who have a weakened immune system. This may include persons who have:AIDS, Autoimmune disorders, including rheumatoid arthritis, Chemotherapy for cancer. "}, "Periorbital cellulitis": {"Symptoms": ["Redness around the eye or in the white part of the eye", "Swelling of the eyelid, whites of eyes, and surrounding area "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will examine the eye and ask about symptoms.Tests that may be ordered include:Blood culture, Blood tests (complete blood count), CT scan, MRI scan. ", "description": "Periorbital cellulitis is an infection of the eyelid or skin around the eye.", "Causes": "Periorbital cellulitis commonly affects children under 18 months old. This infection can occur after a scratch, injury, or bug bite around the eye, which allows germs to enter the wound. Or it can extend from a nearby site that is infected, such as the sinuses. ", "Treatment": "Antibiotics will be prescribed. They are usually taken by mouth. Or they may also be given as shots (injection). "}, "Phencyclidine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Agitation (overly excited, violent behavior)", "Altered state of consciousness", "Catatonic trance (patient does not talk, move, or react)", "Coma", "Convulsions", "Hallucinations", "High blood pressure", "Nystagmus (side-to-side eye movements)", "Psychosis", "Uncontrolled movement", "Uncoordination"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Pheochromocytoma": {"description": "Pheochromocytoma is a rare tumor of adrenal gland tissue. It results in the release of too much epinephrine and norepinephrine, hormones that control heart rate, metabolism, and blood pressure.", "Possible Complications": "High blood pressure may continue in about 1 in 4\u00a0patients after surgery. However, standard treatments can usually control high blood pressure. In about\u00a01 in 10 people, the tumor may return. Patients who have been successfully treated for pheochromocytoma should have testing from time to time to make sure the tumor has not returned. Close family members may also benefit from testing, because some cases are inherited.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Chest pain", "Irritability", "Nervousness", "Pallor", "Palpitations", "Rapid heart rate", "Severe headache", "Sweating", "Weight loss ", "Hand tremor", "High blood pressure", "Sleeping difficulty "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. You may have high blood pressure, rapid heart rate, and fever during an attack of symptoms. Your vital signs can be normal at other times.Tests include:Abdominal CT scan, Adrenal biopsy, Catecholamines blood test (serum catecholamines), Glucose test, Metanephrine blood test (serum metanephrine), MIBG scintiscan, MRI of abdomen, Urine catecholamines, Urine metanephrines . ", "Treatment": "Treatment involves removing the tumor with surgery. It is important to stabilize your blood pressure and pulse with certain medications before surgery. You may need to stay in the hospital\u00a0and have\u00a0your vital signs closely monitored around the time of surgery. After surgery, your vital signs will be continuously monitored in an intensive care unit. When the tumor cannot be surgically removed, you will need to take medication to manage it.\u00a0A combination of medications is usually needed to control the effects of the excessive hormones. Radiation therapy and chemotherapy have not been effective in curing this kind of tumor.", "Causes": "Pheochromocytoma may occur as a single tumor or as more than one growth. It usually develops in the center (medulla) of one or both adrenal glands. Rarely, this kind of tumor occurs outside the adrenal gland. When it does, it is usually somewhere else in the abdomen.Very few pheochromocytomas are cancerous.The tumors may occur at any age, but they are most common from early to mid-adulthood."}, "Polycystic kidney disease": {"description": "Polycystic kidney disease is a kidney disorder passed down through families in which many cysts form in the kidneys, causing them to become enlarged.", "Possible Complications": "Anemia, Bleeding or rupture of cysts, Chronic kidney disease, End-stage kidney disease, High blood pressure, Infection of liver cysts, Kidney stones, Liver failure (mild to severe), Repeated urinary tract infections. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain or tenderness", "Blood in the urine", "Excessive urination at night", "Flank pain on one or both sides", "Drowsiness", "Joint pain", "Nail abnormalities"], "Exams and Tests": "An examination may show:Abdominal tenderness over the liver, Enlarged liver, Heart murmurs or other signs of aortic insufficiency or mitral insufficiency, High blood pressure, Growths in the kidneys or abdomen. Tests that may be done include:Cerebral angiography, Complete blood count (CBC) , Urinalysis. People with a personal or family history of PKD should be tested to determine if cerebral aneurysms are causing headaches.Polycystic kidney disease and cysts on the liver or other organs may be found with the following tests:Abdominal CT scan, Abdominal MRI scan, Abdominal ultrasound, Intravenous pyelogram (IVP). If several members of your family have PKD, genetic tests can be done to determine whether you carry the PKD gene.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to control symptoms and prevent complications. High blood pressure may be hard to control, but controlling it is the most important part of treatment.Treatment may include:Blood pressure medicines, Diuretics, Low-salt diet. Any urinary tract infection should be treated quickly with antibiotics.Cysts that are painful, infected, bleeding, or causing a blockage may need to be drained. There are usually too many cysts to make it practical to remove each cyst.Surgery to remove one or both kidneys may be needed. Treatments for end-stage kidney disease may include dialysis or a kidney transplant.", "Causes": "Polycystic kidney disease (PKD) is passed down through families (inherited), usually as an autosomal dominant trait. If one parent carries the gene, the children have a 50% chance of developing the disorder.Autosomal dominant PKD occurs in both children and adults, but it is much more common in adults. Symptoms often do not appear until middle age. It affects nearly 1 in 1,000 Americans. The actual number may be more, because some people do not have symptoms.An autosomal recessive form of PKD also exists. It appears in infancy or childhood. This form is much less common than autosomal dominant PKS, but it tends to be very serious and gets worse quickly. It can cause serious lung and liver disease, end-stage kidney disease, and it usually causes death in infancy or childhood.Persons with PKD have many clusters of cysts in the kidneys. What exactly triggers the cysts to form is unknown.PKD is associated with the following conditions:Aortic aneurysms, Brain aneurysms, Cysts in the liver, pancreas, and testes, Diverticula of the colon. As many as half of people with PKD have cysts on the liver. A family history of PKD increases your risk for the condition.", "Prevention": "Currently, no treatment can prevent the cysts from forming or enlarging."}, "Paroxysmal cold hemoglobinuria (PCH)": {"description": "Paroxysmal cold hemoglobinuria (PCH) is a rare blood disorder in which the body's immune system produces antibodies that destroy red blood cells when a person goes from cold to warm temperatures.", "Possible Complications": "Continued attacks, Kidney failure, Severe anemia. ", "Symptoms": ["Chills\r\n  ", "Fever", "Back pain", "Leg pain", "Abdominal pain", "Headache", "General discomfort, uneasiness, or ill feeling (malaise)\r\n  ", "Blood in the urine (red urine)"], "Exams and Tests": "Laboratory tests can help diagnose this condition.Bilirubin levels are high in blood and urine, Complete blood count (CBC) shows anemia., Coombs test is negative., Donath-Landsteiner test is positive., Level of hemoglobin is increased during attacks., Lactate dehydrogenase level is high.. ", "Treatment": "Treating the underlying condition can help. For example, if PCH is caused by syphilis, symptoms may get better when the syphilis is treated.In some cases, medicines that suppress the immune system are used.", "Causes": "Paroxysmal cold hemoglobinuria only occurs in the cold, and affects mainly the hands and feet. Antibodies attach (bind) to red blood cells, which allows other proteins in the blood (called complement) to also latch on. The antibodies destroy the red blood cells as they move through the body and get rewarmed. As the cells are destroyed, hemoglobin, the part of red blood cells that carries oxygen, is released into the blood and passed in the urine.PCH has been linked to secondary syphilis, tertiary syphilis, and other viral or bacterial infections. Sometimes the cause is unknown.The disorder is rare.", "Prevention": "Persons who have been diagnosed with this disease can prevent future attacks by staying out of the cold."}, "Pityriasis rosea": {"Symptoms": ["Are often pink or pale red", "Are oval in shape", "May be scaly", "May follow lines in the skin or appear in a \"Christmas tree\" pattern", "May itch"], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider can usually diagnose pityriasis rosea by the way the rash looks.Rarely, the following tests are needed:A blood test to be sure it is not a form of syphilis, which can cause a similar rash, A skin biopsy to confirm the diagnosis. ", "description": "Pityriasis rosea is a common type of skin rash seen in young adults.", "Causes": "Pityriasis rosea is believed to be caused by a virus. It occurs most often in the fall and spring.Although pityriasis rosea may occur in more than one person in a household at a time, it is not thought to spread from one person to another.", "Treatment": "If symptoms are mild, you may not need treatment.Gentle bathing, mild lubricants or creams, or mild hydrocortisone creams may be used to soothe irritation.Antihistamines taken by mouth may be used to reduce itching. You can buy antihistamines at the store without a prescription.Moderate sun exposure or ultraviolet (UV) light treatment may help make the rash go away more quickly. However, you must be careful to avoid sunburn."}, "Polymyositis - adult": {"description": "Polymyositis is a rare inflammatory disease that leads to muscle weakness, swelling tenderness, and tissue damage. It is part of a larger group of diseases called myositis.", "Possible Complications": "Calcium deposits in the affected muscles, especially in children with the disease, Cancer, Heart disease, lung disease, or abdominal complications. ", "Symptoms": [" \r\n Difficulty swallowing \r\n ", "Muscle pain", "Muscle weakness in the proximal muscles (shoulders, hips, etc.) this can make it hard to raise the arms over the head, get up from a sitting position, or climb stairs", "Problems with the voice (caused by weak throat muscles)", "Shortness of breath", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Joint pain", "Loss of appetite", "Morning stiffness", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests may include: \r\n Autoimmune antibodies and inflammation tests, CPK, Electromyography, MRI of affected muscles, Muscle biopsy, Myoglobin in the urine, Serum aldolase. People with this condition also must be watched carefully for signs of cancer.", "Treatment": "The main treatment is with corticosteroid medicines. The dose of medicine is slowly tapered off as muscle strength improves. This takes about 4-6 weeks. You will stay on a low dose of a corticosteroid medicine after that. Medicines to suppress the immune system, such as methotrexate and azathioprine, may be used for people who do not respond to corticosteroids.Intravenous gamma globulin has been tried, with mixed results. Biologic drugs also may play in part in treating this condition but it is too soon to know.If the condition is associated with a tumor, it may improve if the tumor is removed.", "Causes": "Polymyositis affects the skeletal muscles. It is also known as idiopathic inflammatory myopathy. The exact cause is unknown, but it may be related to an autoimmune reaction or infection.Polymyositis can affect people at any age. It most common in adults between ages 50 and 70, and in children ages 5 to 15. It affects women twice as often as men. It is more common in African Americans than Caucasians. "}, "Pancreas divisum": {"description": "Pancreas divisum is a birth defect in which parts of the pancreas do not join together. The pancreas is a long flat organ located between the stomach and spine. It helps in food digestion.", "Possible Complications": "The main complication of pancreas divisum is pancreatitis.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain, most often in the mid-abdomen, that may be felt in the back", "Abdominal swelling (distention)", "Nausea or vomiting "], "Exams and Tests": "Abdominal ultrasound, Abdominal CT scan, Amylase and lipase blood test, Endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography (ERCP), Magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP), \r\n  Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS)\r\n  . ", "Treatment": "The following treatments may be needed if you have symptoms of the condition, or if pancreatitis keeps returning:ERCP with a cut to enlarge the opening where the pancreatic duct drains, Placement of a stent to prevent the duct from getting blocked . You may need surgery if these treatments do not work. ", "Causes": "Pancreas divisum is the most common birth defect of the pancreas. In many cases, this defect goes undetected and causes no problems. The cause of the defect is unknown.As a baby develops in the womb, two separate pieces of tissue join together to form the pancreas. Each part has a tube, called a duct. When the parts join together, a final duct, called the pancreatic duct, is formed. Fluid and digestive juices (enzymes) produced by the pancreas normally flow through this duct.If the ducts do not join while the baby is developing in the womb, pancreas divisum results. Fluid from the two parts of the pancreas drains into separate areas of the upper portion of the small intestine (duodenum). This occurs in 5 to 15% of people.If a pancreatic duct becomes blocked, swelling and tissue damage (pancreatitis) may develop.", "Prevention": "Because this condition is present at birth, there is no known way to prevent it."}, "Paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria (PNH)": {"description": "Paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria is a rare disease in which red blood cells break down earlier than normal.", "Possible Complications": "Acute myelogenous leukemia, Aplastic anemia, Blood clots, Death, Hemolytic anemia, Iron deficiency anemia, Myelodysplasia. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Back pain", "Blood clots -- may form in some people", "Dark urine -- comes and goes", "Easy bruising or bleeding", "Headache", "Shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "Red and white blood cell counts and platelet counts may be low.Red or brown urine signals the breakdown of red blood cells and that hemoglobin is being released into the body's circulation and eventually into the urine.Tests that may be done to diagnose this condition include:Complete blood count (CBC), Coombs' test, Flow cytometry to measure certain proteins, Ham's (acid hemolysin) test, Serum hemoglobin and haptoglobin, Sucrose hemolysis test, Urinalysis, Urine hemosiderin . ", "Treatment": "Steroids or other drugs that suppress the immune system may help slow the breakdown of red blood cells. Blood transfusions may be needed. Supplemental iron and folic acid are provided. Blood thinners may also be needed to prevent clots from forming.Soliris (eculizumab) is a drug used to treat PNH. It blocks the breakdown of red blood cells.Bone marrow transplantation can cure this disease.All patients with PNH should receive vaccinations against certain types of bacteria to prevent infection. Ask your doctor which ones are right for you.", "Causes": "Persons with this disease have blood cells that are missing a gene called PIG-A. This gene allows a substance called glycosyl-phosphatidylinositol (GPI) to help certain proteins stick to cells.Without PIG-A, important proteins cannot connect to the cell surface and protect the cell from substances in the blood called complement. As a result, red blood cells break down too early. The red cells leak hemoglobin into the blood, which can pass into the urine. This can happen at any time, but is more likely to occur during the night or early morning.The disease can affect people of any age. It may be associated with aplastic anemia, myelodysplastic syndrome, or acute myelogenous leukemia.Risk factors, except for prior aplastic anemia, are not known.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent this disorder."}, "Potassium hydroxide poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain - severe", "Breathing difficulties due to the throat swelling shut", "Burns in the mouth and throat", "Collapse", "Diarrhea", "Mouth pain - severe", "Rapid drop in blood pressure", "Throat pain - severe", "Burning", "Severe pain", "Vision loss"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Porphyria": {"description": "Porphyrias are a group of rare disorders passed down through families. An important part of hemoglobin, called heme, is not made properly. Heme is also found in myoglobin, a protein found in certain muscles.", "Possible Complications": "Coma, Gallstones, Paralysis, Respiratory failure (due to weakness of chest muscles), Scarring of the skin. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain or cramping (only in some forms of the disease)", "Sensitivity to light that can cause rashes, blistering, and scarring of the skin (photodermatitis)", "Problems with the nervous system and muscles (seizures, mental disturbances, nerve damage)", "Muscle pain", "Muscle weakness or paralysis", "Numbness or tingling", "Pain in the arms or legs", "Pain in the back", "Personality changes", "Low blood pressure", "Severe electrolyte imbalances", "Shock"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will perform a physical exam, which includes listening to your heart. You may have a fast heart rate (tachycardia). The doctor may find that your deep tendon reflexes (knee jerks or others) do not work properly.Blood and urine tests may reveal kidney problems or other problems. Special tests can measure porphyrins in the blood.Some of the other tests that may be done include:Blood gases, Comprehensive metabolic panel, Porphyrin levels and levels of other chemicals linked to this condition (often checked in the urine), Ultrasound of the abdomen, Urinalysis. ", "Treatment": "Some of the medicines used to treat a sudden (acute) attack of porphyria may include:Hematin given through a vein (intravenously), Pain medication, Propranolol to control the heartbeat, Sedatives to help you feel sleepy and less anxious. Other treatments may include:Beta-carotene supplements, Chloroquine, Fluids and glucose to boost carbohydrate levels, which helps limit the production of porphyrins, Removal of blood (phlebotomy). Depending on the type of porphyria you have, your doctor may tell you to:Avoid all alcohol, Avoid drugs that may trigger an attack, Avoid injuring the skin, Avoid sunlight as much as possible and use sunscreen when outside, Eat a high-carbohydrate diet. ", "Causes": "Normally, the body makes heme in a multi-step process. Porphyrins are made during several steps of this process. Patients with porphyria are lacking certain enzymes needed for this process. This causes abnormal amounts of porphyrins or related chemicals to build up in the body.There are many different forms of porphyria. The most common type is porphyria cutanea tarda (PCT).Drugs, infection, alcohol, and hormones such as estrogen may trigger attacks of certain types of porphyria.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling may benefit people who want to have children and who have a family history of any type of porphyria."}, "Pine oil poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Difficulty swallowing", "Throat burning", "Eye burning ", "Breathing trouble ", "Abdominal pain", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "Rapid heartbeat", "Coma", "Confusion", "Depression", "Dizziness", "Headache", "Irritability", "Light-headedness", "Nervousness", "Stupor (decreased level of consciousness)", "Unconsciousness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Progeria": {"description": "Progeria is a rare genetic condition that produces rapid aging in children.", "Possible Complications": "Heart attack (myocardial infarction), Stroke. ", "Symptoms": ["Growth failure during the first year of life", "Narrow, shrunken or wrinkled face", "Baldness", "Loss of eyebrows and eyelashes", "Short stature", "Large head for size of face (macrocephaly)", "Open soft spot (fontanelle)", "Small jaw (micrognathia)", "Dry, scaly, thin skin", "Limited range of motion", "Teeth - delayed or absent formation"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam and order laboratory tests. This may show:Insulin resistance, Skin changes similar to that seen in scleroderma (the connective tissue becomes tough and hardened), Generally normal cholesterol and triglyceride levels . Cardiac stress testing may reveal signs of early atherosclerosis of blood vessels.Genetic testing can detect changes in the gene (LMNA) that causes progeria.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for progeria, but aspirin and statin medications may be used to protect against a heart attack or stroke.", "Causes": "Progeria is a rare condition that is remarkable because its symptoms strongly resemble normal human aging, but occur in young children. It usually is not passed down through families. Rarely is it seen in more than one child in a family."}, "Propyl alcohol": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Coma", "Dizziness", "Lethargy", "Low blood pressure", "Low urine output", "Nausea and vomiting", "Reflexes do not respond", "Slowed or labored breathing", "Stupor", "Uncoordinated movements", "Vomiting blood"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or a local poison control center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Proctitis": {"description": "Proctitis is an inflammation of the rectum. It can cause discomfort, bleeding, and the discharge of mucus or pus.", "Possible Complications": "Anal fistula, Anemia, Recto-vaginal fistula (women), Severe bleeding. ", "Symptoms": ["Bloody stools", "Constipation", "Rectal bleeding", "Rectal discharge, pus", "Rectal pain or discomfort", "Tenesmus (pain with bowel movement)"], "Exams and Tests": "Examination of stool sample, Proctoscopy, Rectal culture, Sigmoidoscopy. ", "Treatment": "Most of the time, proctitis will go away when the cause of the problem is treated. Antibiotics are used is an infection is causing the problem. Corticosteroids or mesalamine suppositories may relieve symptoms for some people.", "Causes": "There are many causes of proctitis. They can be grouped as follows:Autoimmune disease, Harmful substances, Non-sexually transmitted infection, Sexually transmitted disease (STD) . Proctitis caused by STD is common in people who have anal intercourse. STDs that can cause proctitis include gonorrhea, herpes, chlamydia, and lymphogranuloma venereum.Infections that are not sexually transmitted are less common than STD proctitis. One type of proctitis not from an STD is an infection in children that is caused by the same bacteria as strep throat.Autoimmune proctitis is linked to diseases such as ulcerative colitis or Crohn's disease. If the inflammation is in the rectum only, it may come and go or move upward into the large intestine.Proctitis may also be caused by some medicines, radiotherapy or inserting harmful substances into the rectum.Risk factors include:Autoimmune disorders, High-risk sexual practices such as anal sex. ", "Prevention": "Safe sex\u00a0practices may help prevent the spread of the disease."}, "Photographic fixative poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Burning pain in the throat", "Blurred vision", "Burning in the eye", "Coma", "Diarrhea (watery, bloody, green-blue colored)", "Low blood pressure", "Skin rash", "Stupor (confusion, decreased level of consciousness)", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Petroleum jelly overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Coughing", "Diarrhea", "Irritation of eyes, nose, throat, and skin", "Shortness of breath"], "description": "See also: Overdose", "Prevention": "Keep all poisons or potential poisons properly labeled and out of the reach of children. "}, "Pemphigus vulgaris": {"description": "Pemphigus vulgaris is an autoimmune disorder that involves blistering and sores (erosions) of the skin and mucus membranes.", "Possible Complications": "Secondary skin infections, Severe dehydration, Side effects of medications, Spread of infection through the bloodstream (sepsis). ", "Symptoms": ["Draining", "Oozing", "Crusting", "Peeling or easily detached", "In the mouth", "On the scalp, trunk, or other skin areas"], "Exams and Tests": "The skin separates easily when the surface of unaffected skin is rubbed sideways with a cotton swab or finger. This is called a positive Nikolsky's sign.A skin biopsy is usually done to confirm the diagnosis.", "Treatment": "Severe cases of pemphigus may need wound management, similar to the treatment for severe burns. People with this condition may need to stay in a hospital and receive care in a burn unit or intensive care unit.Treatment is aimed at reducing symptoms, including pain. It also aims to prevent complications, especially infections.Treatment may involve:Antibiotics and antifungal medications to control or prevent infections, Fluids and electrolytes given through a vein (IV), IV feedings if there are severe mouth ulcers, Numbing (anesthetic) mouth lozenges to reduce mouth ulcer pain, Pain medications if local pain relief is not enough. Body-wide (systemic) therapy is needed to control pemphigus and should be started as early as possible. Systemic treatment includes:An anti-inflammatory drug called dapsone, Corticosteroids, Medications containing gold, Medications that suppress the immune system (such as azathioprine, methotrexate, cyclosporine, cyclophosphamide, mycophenolate mofetil, or rituximab) . However, side effects from systemic therapy are a major complication.Some antibiotics are also effective, particularly minocycline and doxycycline. Intravenous immunoglobulin (IVIg) is occasionally used.Plasmapheresis is a process in which antibody-containing plasma is removed from the blood and replaced with intravenous fluids or donated plasma. Plasmapheresis may be used along with systemic medications to reduce the amount of antibodies in the blood.Ulcer and blister treatments include soothing or drying lotions, wet dressings, or similar measures.", "Causes": "Pemphigus is an autoimmune disorder. The immune system produces antibodies against specific proteins in the skin and mucus membranes. These antibodies break the bonds between skin cells. This leads to the formation of a blister. The exact cause is unknown.Sometimes pemphigus is caused by certain medications, although this is rare. Medications that may cause this condition include:A drug called penicillamine, which removes certain materials from the blood (chelating agent), Blood pressure medications called ACE inhibitors. Pemphigus is uncommon. It most often\u00a0 occurs in middle-aged or older people."}, "Peritonsillar abscess": {"description": "Peritonsillar abscess is a collection of infected material in the area around the tonsils.", "Possible Complications": "Airway obstruction, Cellulitis of the jaw, neck, or chest, Endocarditis (rare), Fluid around the lungs (pleural effusion), Inflammation around the heart (pericarditis), Pneumonia, Sepsis (infection in the blood)\u00a0\r\n . ", "Symptoms": ["Fever and chills", "Severe throat pain that is usually on one side", "Difficulty opening the mouth, and pain with opening the mouth", "Difficulty swallowing", "Drooling or inability to swallow saliva", " \r\n Facial or neck\u00a0swelling \r\n ", "Fever", "Headache", "Muffled voice", "Tender glands of the jaw and throat"], "Exams and Tests": "An examination of the throat often shows swelling on one side and on the roof of the mouth.The uvula in the back of the throat may be shifted away from the swelling. The neck and throat may be red and swollen on one or both sides.The following tests may be done:Aspiration of the abscess using a needle, CT scan. ", "Treatment": "If the infection is caught early, you will be given antibiotics. More likely, if an abscess has developed, it will need to be drained with a needle or by cutting it open. You will be given pain medicine before this is done.Sometimes, at the same time the abscess\u00a0is drained, the tonsils will be removed. In this case, you will be put to sleep with anesthesia.", "Causes": "Peritonsillar abscess is a complication of tonsillitis. It is most often caused by a type of bacteria called group A beta-hemolytic streptococcus.Peritonsillar abscess is usually a\u00a0condition of older children, adolescents, and young adults. It has become uncommon with the use of antibiotics to treat tonsillitis.", "Prevention": "Treating tonsillitis, especially bacterial tonsillitis, quickly and completely\u00a0may help prevent an abscess."}, "Pick disease": {"description": "Pick disease is a rare form of dementia that is similar to Alzheimer disease, except that it tends to affect only certain areas of the brain.", "Symptoms": ["Not able to\u00a0keep a job", "Compulsive behaviors", "Inappropriate behavior", "Inability to function or interact in social or personal situations", "Problems with personal hygiene", "Repetitive behavior", "Withdrawal from social interaction", "Abrupt mood changes", "Decreased interest in daily living activities", "Failure to recognize changes in behavior", "Failure to show emotional warmth, concern, empathy, sympathy", "Inappropriate mood", "Not caring about events or environment", "Cannot\u00a0speak (mutism)", "Decreased ability to read or write", "Difficulty finding a word", "Difficulty speaking or understanding speech (aphasia)", "Repeating anything spoken to them (echolalia)", "Shrinking vocabulary", "Weak, uncoordinated speech sounds", "Increased muscle tone (rigidity)", "Memory loss that gets worse", "Movement/coordination difficulties (apraxia)", "Weakness", "Urinary incontinence"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will ask about your medical history and symptoms.Your health care provider might order tests to help rule out other causes of dementia, including dementia due to metabolic causes. Pick disease is diagnosed based on symptoms and results of tests, including:Assessment of the mind and behavior (neuropsychological assessment), Brain MRI, Electroencephalogram (EEG), Examination of the brain and nervous system (neurological exam), Examination of the fluid around the central nervous system (cerebrospinal fluid) after a lumbar puncture, Head CT scan, Tests of sensation, thinking and reasoning (cognitive function), and motor function. A brain biopsy is the only test that can confirm the diagnosis.", "Causes": "People with Pick disease have abnormal substances (called Pick bodies and Pick cells) inside nerve cells in the damaged areas of the brain.Pick bodies and Pick cells contain an abnormal form of a protein called tau. This protein is found in all nerve cells. But some people with Pick disease have an abnormal amount or type of this protein.The exact cause of the abnormal form of the protein is unknown. Many different abnormal genes have been found that can cause Pick disease.\u00a0Some cases of Pick disease are passed down\u00a0in families.Pick disease is rare. It can occur in people as young as 20. But it\u00a0usually begins between ages 40 and 60. The average age at which it begins is 54.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for Pick disease. Medicines may help manage mood swings.Sometimes, patients with Pick disease\u00a0take the same medicines used to treat other types of dementia.In some cases, stopping or changing medicines that worsen confusion or that are not\u00a0needed can improve thinking and other mental functions. Medicines include:Analgesics, Anticholinergics, Central nervous system depressants, Cimetidine, Lidocaine. It is\u00a0important to treat any disorders that\u00a0can cause confusion. These include:Anemia, Decreased oxygen (hypoxia) levels, Heart failure, High carbon dioxide levels, Infections, Kidney failure, Liver failure, Nutritional disorders, Thyroid disorders, Psychiatric conditions such as depression. Medicines may be needed to control aggressive, dangerous, or agitated behaviors.Some patients may benefit from hearing aids, glasses, cataract surgery, or other treatments.Behavior modification can help some people control unacceptable or dangerous behaviors. This consists of rewarding appropriate or positive behaviors and ignoring inappropriate behaviors (when it is\u00a0safe to do so).Psychotherapy (talk therapy) does not\u00a0always work. This is\u00a0because it can cause further confusion or disorientation.Reality orientation, which reinforces environmental and other cues, may help reduce disorientation.Depending on the symptoms and severity of the disease, the patient may need monitoring and help with personal hygiene and self-care. Eventually, there may be a need for 24-hour care and monitoring at home or in a special facility. Family counseling can help the person cope with the changes needed for home care.Care may include:Adult protective services, Community resources, Homemakers, Visiting nurses or aides, Volunteer services. Persons with Pick disease\u00a0and their family may need to seek legal advice early in the course of the disorder. Advance directive, power of attorney, and other legal actions can make it easier to make decisions regarding the care of the person with Pick disease."}, "Prostate cancer": {"description": "Prostate cancer is cancer that starts in the prostate gland. The prostate is a small, walnut-sized structure that makes up part of a man's reproductive system. It wraps around the urethra. This is the tube that carries urine out of the body.", "Symptoms": ["Delayed or slowed start of urinary stream", "Dribbling or leakage of urine, most often after urinating", "Slow urinary stream", "Straining when urinating, or not being able to empty all of the urine", "Blood in the urine or semen"], "Exams and Tests": "An abnormal digital rectal exam may be the only sign of prostate cancer. A biopsy is needed to tell if you have prostate cancer. A biopsy is a procedure to remove\u00a0a sample of tissue from the prostate. The sample is sent to a lab for examination. It will be done in your doctor's office.Your doctor may recommend a\u00a0biopsy if:You have a high PSA level, A digital rectal exam\u00a0reveals a hard or uneven surface. The biopsy result is\u00a0reported using what is called a Gleason grade and a Gleason score.The Gleason grade tells you how fast the cancer might spread. It grades tumors on a scale of 1\u00a0through 5. You may have different grades of cancer in one biopsy sample. The two most common grades are added together. This gives you the Gleason score. The higher your Gleason score, the more likely the cancer\u00a0can spread\u00a0beyond the prostate:Scores 2\u00a0through 5: Low-grade prostate cancer., Scores 6\u00a0through 7: Intermediate- (or in the middle) grade cancer. Most prostate cancers fall into this group., Scores 8\u00a0through 10: High-grade cancer.. The following tests may be done to determine whether the cancer has spread:CT scan, Bone scan, MRI scan\u00a0\u00a0\r\n . The PSA blood test will also be used to monitor your cancer after treatment. ", "Causes": "Prostate cancer is the most common cause of death from cancer in men over age 75. Prostate cancer is rarely found in men younger than 40.People who are at high risk include:African American men, who are also more likely to develop this cancer at every age, Men who are older than 60, Men who have a father or brother with prostate cancer. Other people at risk include:Men who have been around Agent Orange, Men who use too much alcohol, Farmers, Men who eat a diet high in fat, especially animal fat, Obese men, Tire plant workers, Painters, Men who have been around cadmium. Prostate cancer is less common in people who do not eat meat (vegetarians).A common problem in almost all men as they grow older is an enlarged prostate. This is called benign prostatic hyperplasia, or BPH. It does not raise your risk of prostate cancer.\u00a0But it can increase your\u00a0prostate-specific antigen (PSA) blood test result.", "Prevention": "Talk with your health care provider about possible ways to lower your risk of prostate cancer. These may include lifestyle measures, such as diet and exercise. Taking extra vitamin E has not been found to reduce the risk of prostate cancer and may increase the risk. Talk with your doctor before taking larger doses of this vitamin.There are no medicines approved by the FDA for preventing prostate cancer.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on many things, including your Gleason score and your overall health. Your doctor will discuss your treatment options.If the cancer has not spread outside the prostate gland, common treatments include: Surgery (radical prostatectomy), Radiation therapy, including brachytherapy and proton therapy. If you are older, your doctor may recommend simply monitoring the cancer with PSA tests and biopsies.If the prostate cancer has spread, treatment may include hormone therapy (medicines to reduce testosterone levels). It may be used for all but the earliest stage of prostate cancer. It may be given before, along with, or after other treatments.If prostate cancer spreads even after hormone therapy, surgery, or radiation has been tried, treatment may include:Chemotherapy, Immunotherapy (medicine to trigger the immune system to attack and kill cancer cells)\u00a0\r\n  . Surgery, radiation therapy, and hormone therapy can affect your sexual performance. Problems with urine control are possible after surgery and radiation therapy. Discuss your concerns with your health care provider.After treatment for prostate cancer, you will be closely watched to make sure the cancer does not spread. This involves routine checkups, including PSA blood tests (usually every 3 months to 1 year).\r\n"}, "Poisoning first aid": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Bluish lips", "Chest pain", "Confusion", "Cough", "Diarrhea", "Difficulty breathing or shortness of breath", "Dizziness", "Double vision", "Drowsiness", "Fever", "Headache", "Heart palpitations", "Irritability", "Loss of appetite", "Loss of bladder control", "Muscle twitching", "Nausea and vomiting", "Numbness and tingling", "Seizures", "Skin rash\u00a0or burns", "Stupor", "Unconsciousness", "Unusual breath odor", "Weakness"], "Causes": "Items that can cause poisoning include: Carbon monoxide gas (from furnaces, gas engines, fires, space heaters), Certain foods, Chemicals in the workplace, Drugs, including over-the-counter and prescription medicines (such as an aspirin overdose) and illicit drugs such as cocaine, Household detergents and cleaning products, Household and outdoor plants (eating toxic plants), Insecticides, Paints . ", "description": "In the United States, call 1-800-222-1222 to speak with a local poison control center. This hotline number will let you talk to experts in poisoning. They will give you further instructions.", "Prevention": "Be aware of poisons in and around your home. Take steps to protect young children from toxic substances. Store all medicines, cleaners, cosmetics, and household chemicals out of reach of children, or in cabinets with childproof latches.Be familiar with plants in your home, yard, and vicinity. Keep your children informed, too. Remove any poisonous plants. Never eat wild plants, mushrooms, roots, or berries unless you very familiar with them.Teach children about the dangers of substances that contain poison. Label all poisons.Don't store household chemicals in food containers, even if they are labeled. Most nonfood substances are poisonous if taken in large doses.If you are concerned that industrial poisons might be polluting nearby land or water, report your concerns to the local health department or the state or federal Environmental Protection Agency."}, "Pertussis": {"description": "Pertussis is a highly contagious bacterial disease that causes uncontrollable, violent coughing. The coughing can make it hard to breathe. A deep \"whooping\" sound is often heard when the patient tries to take a breath.", "Possible Complications": "Pneumonia, Convulsions, Seizure disorder (permanent), Nose bleeds, Ear infections, Brain damage from lack of oxygen, Bleeding in the brain (cerebral hemorrhage), Intellectual disability, Slowed or stopped breathing (apnea), Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Runny nose", "Slight fever (102 \u00b0F or lower)", "Diarrhea"], "Exams and Tests": "The initial diagnosis is usually based on the symptoms. However, when the symptoms are not obvious, pertussis may be difficult to diagnose. In very young infants, the symptoms may be caused by pneumonia instead.To know for sure, the health care provider may take a sample of mucus from the nasal secretions and send it to a lab, which tests it for pertussis. While this can offer an accurate diagnosis, the test takes some time, and treatment is usually started before the results are ready.Some patients may have a complete blood count that shows large numbers of lymphocytes.", "Treatment": "If started early enough, antibiotics such as erythromycin can make the symptoms go away more quickly. Unfortunately, most patients are diagnosed too late, when antibiotics aren't very effective. However, the medicines can help reduce the patient's ability to spread the disease to others.Infants younger than 18 months need constant supervision because their breathing may temporarily stop during coughing spells. Infants with severe cases should be hospitalized.An oxygen tent with high humidity may be used.Fluids may be given through a vein if coughing spells are severe enough to prevent the person from drinking enough fluids.Sedatives (medicines to make you sleepy) may be prescribed for young children.Cough mixtures, expectorants, and suppressants are usually not helpful and should NOT be used.", "Causes": "Pertussis, or whooping cough, is an upper respiratory infection caused by the Bordetella pertussis bacteria. It is a serious disease that can affect people of any age\u00a0and cause permanent disability in infants, and even death.When an infected person sneezes or coughs, tiny droplets containing the bacteria move through the air, and the disease is easily spread from person to person.The infection usually lasts 6 weeks, but can last as long as 10 weeks.", "Prevention": "DTaP vaccination, one of the recommended childhood immunizations, protects children against pertussis infection. DTaP vaccine can be safely given to infants. Five DTaP vaccines are recommended. They are usually given to children at ages 2 months, 4 months, 6 months, 15\u00a0to 18 months, and 4\u00a0to 6 years.The Tdap vaccine should be given at age 11 or 12.During a pertussis outbreak, unimmunized children under age 7 should not attend school or public gatherings, and should be isolated from anyone known or suspected to be infected. This should last until 14 days after the last reported case.It is also\u00a0recommended that adults\u00a0age 19\u00a0and\u00a0older receive\u00a0one dose of the\u00a0Tdap vaccine against pertussis.Tdap is especially important for healthcare professionals and anyone having close contact with a baby younger than 12 months old.Pregnant women should get a dose of Tdap during every pregnancy between 27 and 36 weeks of each pregnancy, to protect the newborn from pertussis."}, "Pneumothorax - infants": {"description": "This article discusses pneumothorax in infants.", "Possible Complications": "As air builds up in the chest, it can push the heart toward the other side of the chest. This puts pressure on both the lung that hasn't collapsed and the heart. This condition is called tension pneumothorax. It is a medical emergency.", "Symptoms": ["Bluish skin color (cyanosis)", "Fast breathing", "Flaring of the nostrils", "Grunting with breathing", "Irritability", "Restlessness", "Use of other chest and abdominal muscles to aid breathing (retractions)"], "Exams and Tests": "The nurses and doctors may have difficulty hearing breath sounds when listening to the infant's lungs with a stethoscope. The heart or lung sounds may seem as if they are coming from a different part of the chest than is normal.Tests for pneumothorax include:Chest x-ray, Light probe placed against the baby's chest, also known as \"transillumination\" (pockets of air will show up as lighter areas) . ", "Treatment": "Babies without symptoms may not need treatment. The health care team will monitor your baby's breathing, heart rate, oxygen level, and skin color. Supplemental oxygen will be provided if needed.If your baby is having symptoms, the doctor will place a needle or thin tube called a catheter into the baby's chest to remove the air that has leaked into the chest space.Since treatment will also depend on the lung issues that led to the pneumothorax, it may last for days to weeks.", "Causes": "A pneumothorax occurs when some of the tiny air sacs (alveoli) in a baby's lung become overinflated and burst. This causes air to leak into the space between the lung and chest wall (pleural space).The most common cause of pneumothorax is respiratory distress syndrome. This is a condition that occurs in babies who are born too early (premature).The baby's lungs lack the slippery substance (surfactant) that helps them stay open. Therefore, the tiny air sacs are not able to expand as easily., If the baby is put on a breathing machine (mechanical ventilator), there is extra pressure on the baby's lungs, which can sometimes burst the air sacs. . Meconium aspiration syndrome is another cause of pneumothorax in newborns. During birth, the baby may breathe in the first bowel movement, called meconium. This may cause breathing problems and the need for a breathing machine.Other causes include pneumonia (infection of the lung) or pulmonary hypoplasia (underdeveloped lung tissue).Less commonly, an otherwise healthy infant can develop an air leak when he or she takes the first few breaths after birth. This occurs because of the pressure needed to expand the lungs for the first time.", "Prevention": "The health care providers in the newborn intensive care unit (NICU) should watch your infant carefully for signs of an air leak."}, "Pica": {"description": "Pica is a pattern of eating non-food materials, such as\u00a0dirt or paper.", "Possible Complications": "Bezoar (a mass of undigestible material trapped inside the body, usually in the stomach), Infection, Intestinal\u00a0blockage, Lead poisoning, Malnutrition. ", "Symptoms": ["Animal feces", "Clay", "Dirt", "Hairballs", "Ice", "Paint", "Sand"], "Exams and Tests": "There is no single test for pica. However, because pica can occur in people who have lower-than-normal nutrient levels and poor nutrition (malnutrition), the health care provider may test blood levels of iron and zinc.Blood tests can also be done to test for anemia. Lead levels should always be checked in children who may have eaten paint or objects covered in lead paint dust to screen for lead poisoning.The health care provider may also\u00a0test for infection if the person has been eating contaminated soil or animal waste.", "Treatment": "Treatment should first address any missing nutrients or other medical problems, such as lead poisoning.Treating pica involves behaviors, the environment, and family education. One form of treatment associates the pica behavior with negative consequences or punishment (mild aversion therapy). Then the person gets rewarded for eating normal foods.Medications may help reduce the abnormal eating behavior if pica is part of a developmental disorder such as intellectual disability.", "Causes": "Pica is seen more in young children than adults. Between 10% and 32% of children ages 1\u00a0to 6 have these behaviors. The incidence of intentional consumption of\u00a0dirt (geophagy)\u00a0among children, which is a subset\u00a0of children with pica behavior, is uncertain.Pica can also occur during pregnancy. In some cases, a lack of certain nutrients, such as iron deficiency anemia and zinc deficiency, may trigger the unusual cravings. Pica may also occur in adults who crave a certain texture in their mouth.", "Prevention": "There is no specific prevention. Getting adequate nutrition may help."}, "Pokeweed poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Convulsions", "Diarrhea", "Headache", "Heart block", "Low blood pressure", "Muscle spasms", "Nausea", "Rapid pulse", "Seizures", "Slow or difficult breathing", "Stomach pain", "Vomiting", "Weakness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Do not touch or eat any plant with which you are not familiar. Wash your hands after working in the garden or walking in the woods."}, "Posterior fossa tumor": {"description": "Posterior fossa tumor is a type of brain tumor located in or near the bottom of the skull.", "Possible Complications": "Cranial nerve palsies, Herniation, Hydrocephalus, Increased intracranial pressure. ", "Symptoms": ["Drowsiness", "Headache", "Imbalance", "Nausea", "Uncoordinated walk (ataxia)", "Vomiting", "Dilated pupils", "Eye problems", "Face muscle weakness", "Hearing loss", "Loss of feeling in part of the face", "Taste problems", "Unsteadiness when walking", "Vision problems"], "Exams and Tests": "Diagnosis is based on a thorough medical history and physical examination, followed by imaging tests. The best way to look at the posterior fossa is with an MRI scan. CT scans are usually not helpful to see that area of the brain.The following procedures may be used to remove a piece of tissue from the tumor to help with diagnosis:Open brain surgery, called a posterior craniotomy, Stereotactic biopsy. ", "Treatment": "Most tumors of the posterior fossa are removed with surgery, even if they are not cancerous. There is limited space in the posterior fossa, and the tumor can easily press on delicate structures if it grows.Depending on the type and size of the tumor, radiation treatment may also be used after surgery.", "Causes": "The posterior fossa is a small space in the skull, found near the brainstem and cerebellum. The cerebellum is the part of the brain responsible for movement, balance, and coordination. The brainstem is responsible for controlling vital body functions, such as breathing.If a tumor grows in the area of the posterior fossa, it can block the flow of spinal fluid and cause increased pressure on the brain and spinal cord.Most tumors of the posterior fossa are primary brain cancers. They start in the brain, rather than spreading from somewhere else in the body.Posterior fossa tumors have no known causes or risk factors."}, "Pleural effusion": {"description": "A pleural effusion is a buildup of fluid between the layers of tissue that line the lungs and chest cavity.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Lung damage, Infection that turns into an abscess, called an empyema, which will need to be drained with a chest tube, Air in the chest cavity (pneumothorax) after thoracentesis . ", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain, usually a sharp pain that is worse with cough or deep breaths", "Cough", "Fever", "Hiccups", "Rapid breathing", "Shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will examine you and\u00a0listen to your lungs with a stethoscope.The following tests may help to confirm a diagnosis:Chest CT scan, Chest x-ray, Kidney and liver function blood tests, Pleural fluid analysis (examining the fluid under a microscope to look for bacteria, cancer cells, and protein level), Thoracentesis (a sample of fluid is removed with a needle inserted between the ribs)\u00a0, Ultrasound of the chest and heart . ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to:Remove the fluid, Prevent fluid from building up again, Determine and treat\u00a0the cause of the fluid buildup. Removing the fluid (thoracentesis) may be done if there is a lot of fluid and it is\u00a0causing chest pressure, shortness of breath, or other breathing problems, such as a\u00a0low oxygen level. Removing the fluid allows the lung to expand, making breathing easier. The cause of the fluid buildup must also be treated.If it is due to\u00a0congestive heart failure, you may receive diuretics (water pills) and other medications to treat heart failure. Pleural effusion\u00a0caused by infection\u00a0is treated with antibiotics. In people with cancer or infection, the effusion is often treated by using a chest tube for several days to drain the fluid.Sometimes, small tubes can be left in the pleural cavity for a long time to drain the fluid. In some cases, the following may be done: Chemotherapy, Putting medication into the chest that prevents fluid from building up again after it is drained, Radiation therapy, Surgery. ", "Causes": "Your body produces pleural fluid in small amounts to lubricate the surfaces of the pleura. This is\u00a0the thin tissue that lines the chest cavity and surrounds the lungs. Pleural effusion is an abnormal, excessive collection of this fluid.There are two types:Transudative pleural effusion is caused by fluid leaking into the pleural space. This is\u00a0from increased pressure in the blood vessels or a low blood protein count. Congestive heart failure is the most common cause., Exudative effusion is caused by blocked blood vessels or lymph vessels, inflammation, lung injury, and tumors. . "}, "Perirenal abscess": {"description": "Perirenal abscess is a pocket of pus caused by an infection around one or both kidneys.", "Possible Complications": "If you have kidney stones, the infection may not go away.", "Symptoms": ["Chills", "Fever", "Pain in the flank (side of the abdomen) or abdomen, which may extend to the groin or down the leg", "Sweats"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you. You may have tenderness in the back or abdomen.Tests include:Blood culture, CT scan of the abdomen\r\n  , Ultrasound of the abdomen, Urinalysis, Urine culture. ", "Treatment": "To treat perirenal abscess, the pus can be drained through a catheter that is placed through the skin or with surgery. Antibiotics should also be given, at first through a vein (IV).", "Causes": "Most perirenal abscesses are caused by urinary tract infections that start in the bladder, spread to the kidney, and then spread to the area around the kidney. Surgery in the urinary tract or reproductive system and a bloodstream infection can also lead to a perirenal abscess.The biggest risk factor for perirenal abscess is kidney stones that block the flow of urine and provide a place for an infection to grow. Bacteria tend to stick to the stones and antibiotics can't kill the bacteria there.Stones are found in 20 - 60% of patients with perirenal abscess. Other risk factors for perirenal abscess include:Diabetes, Having an abnormal urinary tract, Trauma. ", "Prevention": "If you have kidney stones, ask your doctor about the best way to treat them to avoid a perirenal abscess. If you undergo urologic surgery, keep the surgical area as clean as possible."}, "Poinsettia plant exposure": {"Symptoms": ["Burning", "Redness ", "Nausea", "Vomiting", "Stomach ache ", "Skin rash and itching "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Do not touch or eat any plant with which you are not familiar. Wash your hands after working in the garden or walking in the woods."}, "Palatal myoclonus": {"Symptoms": ["Clicking in the ear", "Popping in the ear"], "description": "Palatal myoclonus is a fast spasm (contraction) of the muscles in the roof of the mouth.", "Causes": "Palatal myoclonus\u00a0is usually due to damage (lesions) on brain nerve pathways. Conditions that may lead to palatal myoclonus\u00a0include multiple sclerosis."}, "Pulmonary aspergilloma": {"description": "Pulmonary aspergilloma is a mass caused by a fungal infection that usually grows in lung cavities. It can also appear in the brain, kidney, or other organs.", "Possible Complications": "Difficulty breathing that gets worse, Massive bleeding from the lung, Spread of the infection. ", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Cough", "Coughing up blood", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Unintentional weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "Biopsy of lung tissue, Blood test for presence of aspergillus in the body (galactomannan), Blood test to detect antibodies to aspergillus (serum precipitins for aspergillus), Bronchoscopy or bronchoscopy with lavage, Chest CT, Chest x-ray, Sputum culture. ", "Treatment": "Many patients never develop symptoms. Often, no treatment is needed, unless you are coughing up blood.Occasionally, antifungal medications may be used.If you have bleeding in the lungs, your doctor may inject dye into the blood vessels (angiography) to find the site of bleeding. The bleeding is stopped by shooting tiny pellets into the bleeding vessel.Surgery is often the only choice if there is life-threatening bleeding.", "Causes": "Aspergillomas are formed when the fungus Aspergillus grows in a clump in a lung cavity, or invades healthy tissue, causing an abscess. The most common species of fungus that causes disease in humans is Aspergillus fumigatus.Aspergillus is a common fungus. It grows on dead leaves, stored grain, bird droppings, compost piles, and other decaying vegetation. Cavities in the lung may be caused by:Tuberculosis, Coccidioidomycosis , Cystic fibrosis, Histoplasmosis, Lung abscess, Lung cancer, Sarcoidosis. See also: Aspergillosis", "Prevention": "People who have had related lung infections or who have weakened immune systems should try to avoid environments where the aspergillus fungus is found."}, "Pulmonary veno-occlusive disease": {"description": "Pulmonary veno-occlusive disease is an extremely rare disease that causes high blood pressure in the lung arteries (pulmonary hypertension).", "Possible Complications": "Progressive difficulty breathing, Pulmonary hypertension, Right-sided heart failure (cor pulmonale), Coughing up blood . ", "Symptoms": ["Shortness of breath", "Fatigue on exertion", "Fainting", "Coughing up blood (hemoptysis)", "Difficulty breathing while lying flat "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you and ask about your medical history and symptoms.The exam may reveal:Increased pressure in the neck veins, Fingernail clubbing, Bluish coloration of the skin due to lack of oxygen (cyanosis), Swelling in the legs. Your doctor may hear abnormal heart sounds when listening to the chest and lungs with a stethoscope.The following tests may be done:Arterial blood gases, Blood oximetry, Chest x-ray, Chest CT, Cardiac catheterization, Lung function tests, Echocardiogram, Lung biopsy . ", "Treatment": "There is currently no known effective medical treatment. However, the following medications may be helpful for some patients:Vasodilator drugs (drugs that widen the blood vessels), Drugs that control the\u00a0immune system response (such as azathioprine or steroids) . A lung transplant may be needed.", "Causes": "In most cases, the cause of pulmonary veno-occlusive disease is unknown. The high blood pressure occurs in the pulmonary arteries, which are the\u00a0lung arteries directly connected to the right side of the heart.The condition may be related to a viral infection. It may occur as a complication of certain diseases such as lupus, or as a complication of leukemia, lymphoma, chemotherapy, or bone marrow transplantation.The disorder is most common among children and young adults. As the disease gets worse, it causes narrowed pulmonary veins, pulmonary artery hypertension, and congestion and swelling of the lungs."}, "Propane poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Burning sensation", "Convulsions", "Cough", "Diarrhea", "Dizziness", "Fever", "Heartbeat - irregular", "Heartbeat - rapid", "Lightheadedness", "Loss of consciousness", "Nausea", "Nervousness", "Pain and numbness in arms and legs", "Skin irritation", "Slow and shallow breathing", "Unconsciousness", "Vomiting", "Weakness"], "description": "This article\u00a0is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or 1-800-222-1222 for a local poison control center."}, "Prader-Willi syndrome": {"description": "Prader-Willi syndrome is a congenital (present from birth) disease. It affects many parts of the body. People with this condition are obese, have reduced muscle tone and mental ability, and have sex glands that produce little or no hormones.", "Possible Complications": "Type 2 diabetes, Right-sided heart failure, Bone (orthopedic) problems\u00a0\u00a0. ", "Symptoms": ["Newborns are often small and floppy.", "Male infants may have undescended testicles. ", "Trouble eating as an infant, with poor weight gain", "Almond-shaped eyes", "Delayed motor development", "Narrow bifrontal skull", "Rapid weight gain", "Short stature", "Slow mental development", "Very small hands and feet in comparison to the child's body "], "Exams and Tests": "Genetic testing is available to test children for Prader-Willi syndrome.As the child grows older, laboratory tests may show signs of morbid obesity, such as:Abnormal glucose tolerance, Above normal level of the hormone insulin in the blood, Decreased level of oxygen in the blood, Failure to respond to luteinizing hormone releasing factor. There may also be signs of right-sided heart failure and knee and hip problems.", "Treatment": "Obesity is the greatest threat to health. Limiting calories will control the obesity, but the family, neighbors, and school must work together closely because the child will try to get food wherever possible. Exercise can increase lean body mass in children with Prader-Willi syndrome.Growth hormone is approved by the Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of\u00a0Prader-Willi syndrome. It can help:Improve physical strength and agility, Improve height, Increase lean muscle mass and decrease body fat, Improve weight distribution, Increase stamina, Increase bone mineral density. There have been some concerns that taking growth hormone therapy may lead to sleep apnea. A child who takes hormone therapy needs to have annual sleep studies to monitor for sleep apnea.Low levels of sex hormones may be corrected at puberty with hormone replacement.", "Causes": "Prader-Willi syndrome is caused by a gene missing on part of chromosome 15. Normally, your parents each pass down a copy of this chromosome. Most persons with Prader-Willi syndrome are missing the genetic material on part of the father's chromosome. The rest of persons with this condition often have two copies of the mother's chromosome 15.The genetic changes occur randomly. Persons\u00a0who have\u00a0this syndrome usually do not have a family history of the condition."}, "Periodontitis": {"description": "Periodontitis is inflammation and infection of the ligaments and bones that support the teeth.", "Possible Complications": "Infection or abscess of the soft tissue (facial cellulitis), Infection of the jaw bones (osteomyelitis), Return of periodontitis, Tooth abscess, Tooth loss, Tooth flaring or shifting, Trench mouth. ", "Symptoms": ["Breath odor", "Gums that appear bright red or red-purple", "Gums that appear shiny", "Gums that bleed easily (blood on toothbrush even with gentle brushing of the teeth)", "Gums that are tender when touched but are painless otherwise", "Loose teeth", "Swollen gums"], "Exams and Tests": "An exam of the mouth and teeth by the dentist shows soft, swollen, red-purple gums. Deposits of plaque and tartar may be seen at the base of the teeth and the pockets in the gums may be enlarged. In most cases, the gums are painless or mildly tender, unless a tooth abscess is also present. Teeth may be loose and gums may be pulled back exposing the base of the teeth.Dental x-rays show the loss of supporting bone. They may also show the presence of plaque deposits under the gums.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce inflammation, remove \"pockets\" in the gums, and treat any underlying causes of gum disease. Rough surfaces of teeth or dental appliances should be repaired. It is important to have the teeth cleaned thoroughly. This may involve use of various tools to loosen and remove plaque and tartar from the teeth. Proper flossing and brushing is always needed, even after professional tooth cleaning, to reduce your risk of gum disease. Your dentist or hygienist will show you how to brush and floss properly. You may benefit from medicines that are put on your gums and teeth. Patients with periodontitis should have a professional tooth cleaning every three months.Surgery may be necessary. Deep pockets in the gums may need to be opened and cleaned. Loose teeth may need to be supported. Your dentist may need to remove a tooth or teeth so that the problem doesn't get worse and spread to nearby teeth.", "Causes": "Periodontitis occurs when inflammation or infection of the gums (gingivitis) is allowed to progress without treatment. Infection and inflammation spreads from the gums (gingiva) to the ligaments and bone that support the teeth. Loss of support causes the teeth to become loose and eventually fall out. Periodontitis is the primary cause of tooth loss in adults. This disorder is uncommon in young children, but increases during the teen years. Plaque and tartar build up at the base of the teeth. Inflammation from this build-up causes a pocket to form between the gums and the teeth, which fills with plaque and tartar. Soft tissue swelling traps the plaque in the pocket. Continued inflammation leads to damage of the tissues and bone surrounding the tooth. Because plaque contains bacteria, infection is likely, and a tooth abscess may also develop. This also increases the rate of bone destruction.", "Prevention": "Good oral hygiene is the best means of prevention. This includes thorough tooth brushing and flossing, and regular professional dental cleaning. The prevention and treatment of gingivitis reduces the risk of development of periodontitis."}, "Precocious puberty": {"description": "Puberty is the time during which a person's sexual and physical characteristics mature. Precocious puberty is when these body changes happen earlier than normal.", "Possible Complications": "Children who go through puberty too early may not reach their full height because growth stops too early.Children with early sexual development\u00a0may have psychological and social problems. Children and adolescents want to be the same as their peers. Early sexual development can make them appear different. Parents can support their child by explaining the condition and how the doctor plans to treat it.", "Symptoms": ["Armpit or pubic hair", "Beginning to grow faster", "Breasts", "First period (menstruation)", "Mature outer genitals", "Armpit or pubic hair", "Growth of the testes and penis", "Facial hair, often first on the upper lip", "Muscle growth", "Voice change (deepening)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam to check for signs of precocious puberty.Tests that may be ordered include:Blood tests to check\u00a0hormone levels, CT\u00a0 or MRI scan of the brain or of the abdomen\u00a0to rule out tumors.. ", "Treatment": "Depending on the cause, treatment for precocious puberty may include:Medications\u00a0to stop the release of sexual hormones, Surgery to remove a tumor. ", "Causes": "Puberty usually begins between ages\u00a08 and 14 for girls and ages\u00a09 and 16 for boys.The exact age a child enters puberty depends on a number of factors, including family history, nutrition, and gender.Often there is no clear cause for precocious puberty. Some cases are due to changes in the brain, genetic problems, or certain tumors that release hormones. These conditions include:Disorders of the testicles, ovaries, or adrenal glands, Tumor of the hypothalamus (hypothalamic hamartoma), Tumors that release a hormone called hCG. "}, "Pyruvate kinase deficiency": {"description": "Pyruvate kinase deficiency is an inherited lack of the enzyme pyruvate kinase, which is used by red blood cells. Without this enzyme, red blood cells break down too easily, resulting in low levels of these cells (hemolytic anemia).", "Possible Complications": "Gallstones are a common problem. They are made of too much bilirubin, which is produced during hemolytic anemia. Severe pneumococcal disease is a possible complication after splenectomy.", "Symptoms": ["Anemia", "A yellowing of the whites of the eyes (icterus)", "Fatigue, lethargy", "Jaundice", "Pale skin (pallor)"], "Exams and Tests": "During a physical exam, the doctor will look for an enlarged spleen.Tests include the following:Bilirubin in the blood, CBC, Genetic testing for mutation in the pyruvate kinase gene, Large red blood cells (macrocytosis), Levels of haptoglobin in the blood, Osmotic fragility, Pyruvate kinase activity, Stool urobilinogen. ", "Treatment": "People with severe anemia may need blood transfusions. Removing the spleen (splenectomy) may help reduce the destruction of red blood cells. However, this does not help in all cases. In newborns with dangerous levels of jaundice, the health care provider may recommend an exchange transfusion.Someone who had a splenectomy should receive the pneumococcal vaccine at recommended intervals. They also should receive preventive antibiotics until age 5.", "Causes": "Pyruvate kinase deficiency is passed down as an autosomal recessive trait. This means that a child must receive the non-working gene from both parents to develop the disorder.There are many different types of enzyme-related defects of the red blood cell that can cause hemolytic anemia. Pyruvate kinase deficiency is the second most common cause, after G-6-PD deficiency.Pyruvate kinase deficiency is found in people of all ethnic backgrounds. However, certain populations, such as the Amish, are somewhat more likely to develop the condition.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling can help would-be parents with a family history of pyruvate kinase deficiency. People who carry the gene can often be diagnosed by finding decreased RBC pyruvate kinase activity in their red blood cells."}, "Propoxyphene overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Hearing loss", "Pinpoint pupils", "Heart rhythm disturbances", "Low blood pressure", "Weak pulse", "Breathing problems", "Breathing slow, labored, or shallow", "No breathing", "Muscle spasticity", "Coma", "Drowsiness", "Seizures", "Cyanosis (blue fingernails or lips)", "Rash", "Nausea", "Spasms of the stomach or intestines (abdominal cramps)", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or 1-800-222-1222 to find a local poison control center. "}, "Progressive multifocal leukoencephalopathy": {"Symptoms": ["\r\n  Loss of coordination, clumsiness\r\n  ", "\r\n  Loss of language ability (aphasia)\r\n  ", "\r\n  Memory loss\r\n  ", "\r\n  Vision problems\r\n  ", "\r\n  Weakness of the legs and arms that gets worse\r\n  "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests may include:Brain biopsy (rare), Cerebrospinal fluid test for the JCV, CT scan of the brain, Electroencephalogram (EEG), MRI of the brain. ", "description": "Progressive multifocal leukoencephalopathy (PML) is a rare infection that damages the material (myelin) that covers and protects nerves in the white matter of the brain.", "Causes": "The JC virus (JCV) causes PML. By age 10, most people have been infected with this virus. But it hardly ever causes symptoms. However, persons with a weakened immune system are at risk of developing PML. Causes of a weakened immune system include:AIDS (less common now because of better AIDS treatments), Certain medicines that suppress the immune system. Such medicines may be used to prevent organ transplant rejection or to treat multiple sclerosis, rheumatoid arthritis, and related conditions., Cancers, such as leukemia and lymphoma . ", "Treatment": "In people with AIDS, treatment to strengthen the immune system can lead to recovery from the symptoms of PML. No other treatments have proved effective for PML."}, "Proximal renal tubular acidosis": {"description": "Proximal renal tubular acidosis is a disease that occurs when the kidneys don't properly remove acids from the blood into the urine. As a result, too much acid remains in the blood (called acidosis).", "Possible Complications": "Untreated, distal renal tubular acidosis can lead to any of the following conditions:Electrolyte imbalances, such as hypokalemia, Osteomalacia, Rickets . ", "Symptoms": ["Confusion or decreased alertness", "Dehydration", "Fatigue", "Increased breathing rate", "Osteomalacia", "Muscle pain", "Rickets", "Weakness", "Decreased urine output", "Increased heart rate or irregular heartbeat", "Muscle cramps", "Pain in the bones, back, flank, or abdomen", "Skeletal deformities"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and ask about the symptoms.Tests that may be ordered include:Arterial blood gas, Blood chemistry. Other tests that may be done include:Blood pH level, Urine pH, Urinalysis. ", "Treatment": "The goal is to restore normal acid level and electrolyte balance in the body. This will help correct bone disorders and reduce the risk of osteomalacia and osteopenia in adults.Some adults may need no treatment. All children need alkaline medicine such as potassium citrate and sodium bicarbonate. This is medicine that helps correct the acidic condition of the body. The medicine helps prevent bone disease caused by too much acid, such as rickets, and to allow normal growth. The underlying cause of proximal renal tubular necrosis should be corrected if it can be found.Vitamin D and calcium supplements may be needed to help reduce skeletal deformities resulting from osteomalacia or rickets.", "Causes": "When the body performs its normal functions, it produces acid. If this acid is not removed or neutralized, the blood will become too acidic. This can lead to electrolyte imbalances in the blood. It can also cause problems with normal function of some cells.The kidneys help control the body's acid level by removing acid from the blood and excreting it into the urine. Acidic substances in the body are neutralized by alkaline substances, mainly bicarbonate.Proximal renal tubular acidosis (Type II RTA) occurs when bicarbonate is not properly reabsorbed by the kidney's filtering system.Type II RTA is less common than Type I RTA. Type II most often occurs during infancy and may go away by itself.Causes of type II RTA include:Cystinosis (body is unable to break down the substance cysteine), Drugs such as ifosfamide (a chemotherapy drug), certain antibiotics that are no longer used much (tetracycline),\u00a0 or acetazolamide, Fanconi syndrome, Inherited fructose intolerance, Multiple myeloma, Primary hyperparathyroidism, Sjogren syndrome, Wilson disease, Vitamin D deficiency. ", "Prevention": "Most of the disorders that cause proximal renal tubular acidosis are not preventable."}, "Paranoid personality disorder": {"description": "Paranoid personality disorder is a\u00a0mental health\u00a0condition in which a person has a long-term pattern of\u00a0distrust and suspicion of others, but does not have a full-blown psychotic disorder such as schizophrenia.", "Possible Complications": "Extreme social isolation, Problems with\u00a0school or work. ", "Symptoms": ["Concern that other people have hidden motives", "Expectation that they will be exploited (used)\u00a0by others", "Inability to work together with others", "Social isolation", "Detachment", "Hostility"], "Exams and Tests": "Paranoid personality disorder is diagnosed based on a psychological evaluation\u00a0that assesses\u00a0the history and severity of the symptoms.", "Treatment": "Treatment is difficult because people with this condition are often very suspicious of doctors. If treatment is accepted, talk therapy and medications can often be effective.", "Causes": "Cause of paranoid personality disorder\u00a0is unknown. The disorder appears to be more common in families with psychotic disorders such as schizophrenia and delusional disorder. This suggests genes may be involved. Environmental factors may play a role as well.The condition appears to be more common in men."}, "Pulmonary tuberculosis": {"description": "Pulmonary tuberculosis (TB) is a contagious bacterial infection that involves the lungs. It may spread to other organs.", "Possible Complications": "Pulmonary TB can cause permanent lung damage if not treated early. It can also spread to other parts of the body. Medicines used to treat TB may cause side effects, including:Changes in vision, Orange- or brown-colored tears and urine, Rash, Liver inflammation. A vision test may be done before treatment so your doctor can monitor any changes in the health of your eyes.", "Symptoms": ["Breathing difficulty", "Chest pain", "Cough (usually with mucus)", "Coughing up blood", "Excessive sweating, especially at night", "Fatigue", "Fever", "Weight loss", "Wheezing "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. This may show:Clubbing of the fingers or toes (in people with advanced disease), Swollen or tender lymph nodes in the neck or other areas, Fluid around a lung (pleural effusion), Unusual breath sounds (crackles) . Tests that may be ordered include:Bronchoscopy, Chest CT scan, Chest x-ray, Interferon-gamma release blood test, such as the QFT-Gold test to test for TB infection (active or infection in the past), Sputum examination and cultures, Thoracentesis, Tuberculin skin test (also called a PPD test), Biopsy of the affected tissue (done rarely) . ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to cure the infection with medicines that fight the TB bacteria. Active pulmonary TB is treated with a combination of many medicines (usually four medicines). The person takes the medicines until lab tests show which medicines work best.You may need to take many different pills at different times of the day for 6 months or longer. It is very important that you take the pills the way your provider instructed.When people do not take their TB medicines like they are supposed to, the infection can become much more difficult to treat. The TB bacteria can become resistant to treatment. This means the medicines no longer work.If a person is not taking all the medicines as directed, a provider may need to watch the person take the prescribed medicines. This approach is called directly observed therapy. In this case, medicines may be given 2 or 3 times a week.You may need to stay at home or be admitted to a hospital for 2 to 4 weeks to avoid spreading the disease to others until you are no longer contagious.Your provider is required by law to report your TB illness to the local health department. Your health care team will ensure that you receive the best care.", "Causes": "Pulmonary tuberculosis (TB) is caused by the bacterium Mycobacterium tuberculosis (M. tuberculosis). TB is contagious. This means the bacteria is easily spread from an infected person to someone else. You can get TB by breathing in air droplets from a cough or sneeze of an infected person. The resulting lung infection is called primary TB.Most people recover from primary TB infection without further evidence of the disease. The infection may stay inactive (dormant) for years. In some people, it becomes active again (reactivates).Most people who develop symptoms of a TB infection first became infected in the past. In some cases, the disease becomes active within weeks after the primary infection.The following people are at high risk of active TB or reactivation of TB:Elderly, Infants, People with weakened immune systems, for example due to HIV/AIDS, chemotherapy, diabetes, or medicines that weaken the immune system . Your risk of catching TB increases if you:Are around people who have TB (during overseas travel), Live in crowded or unclean living conditions, Have poor nutrition . The following factors can increase the rate of TB infection in a population:Increase in HIV infections, Increase in number of homeless people (poor environment and nutrition), Drug-resistant strains of TB . ", "Prevention": "TB is preventable, even in those who have been exposed to an infected person. Skin testing for TB is used in high risk populations or in people who may have been exposed to TB, such as health care workers.People who have been exposed to TB should have a skin test as soon as possible and have a follow-up test at a later date, if the first test is negative. A positive skin test means you have come into contact with the TB bacteria. It does not mean that you have active TB or are contagious. Talk to your provider about how to prevent getting tuberculosis.Prompt treatment is very important in preventing the spread of TB from those who have active TB to those who have never been infected with TB.Some countries with a high incidence of TB give people a vaccine called BCG to prevent TB. But, the effectiveness of this vaccine is limited and it is not usually used in the United States.People who have had BCG may still be skin tested for TB. Discuss the test results (if positive) with your doctor."}, "Prune belly syndrome": {"description": "Prune belly syndrome is a group of birth defects that involve three main problems:", "Possible Complications": "Complications depend on the related problems. The most common are:Constipation, Bone deformities (clubfoot, dislocated hip, missing limb or digit, funnel chest), Disease of the urinary tract (patients may need dialysis and a kidney transplant). Undescended testicles can lead to infertility or cancer.", "Symptoms": ["\"Little Buddha\" appearance", "Constipation", "Delay in sitting and walking", "Difficulties coughing"], "Exams and Tests": "A woman who is pregnant with a baby who has prune belly syndrome may not have enough amniotic fluid (oligohydramnios). This can cause the infant to have lung problems due to the compression of the baby.An ultrasound done during pregnancy may show that the baby has a swollen bladder or enlarged kidney.In some cases, a pregnancy ultrasound may also help determine if the baby has:Heart problems, Bone/muscle (musculoskeletal) abnormalities, Stomach and intestinal problems, Underdeveloped lungs . The following tests may be performed on the baby after birth to diagnose the condition:Blood tests, Intravenous pyelogram (IVP), Ultrasound, Voiding cystourethrogram (VCUG), X-ray . ", "Treatment": "Early surgery is recommended to fix weak abdominal muscles, urinary tract problems, and undescended testicles.The baby may be given antibiotics to treat or help prevent urinary tract infections.", "Causes": "The causes of prune belly syndrome are unknown. The condition affects mostly boys.While in the womb, the developing baby's abdomen swells with fluid, often from a urinary tract abnormality. That fluid disappears after birth, leading to a wrinkled abdomen that looks like a prune. The appearance is more noticeable due to the lack of abdominal muscles.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent this condition. If the baby is diagnosed with a urinary tract obstruction before birth, in rare cases surgery during the pregnancy may help prevent the problem from progressing to prune belly syndrome."}, "Paraquat poisoning": {"description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Possible Complications": "Acute respiratory distress syndrome (lung failure), Holes in the esophagus, Inflammation of the area between the lungs (mediastinitis), Kidney failure, Scarring of the lungs (pulmonary fibrosis) . ", "Symptoms": ["Burns in throat", "Coma", "Difficulty breathing", "Nosebleed", "Seizures", "Shock", "Shortness of breath", "Sore throat", "Stomach pain", "Vomiting, including vomiting blood"], "Exams and Tests": "You will be asked if you have been exposed to Paraquat.Blood and urine tests will be done to determine how much Paraquat is in your system. Other tests that may be done include:Arterial blood gases (measures of oxygen, carbon dioxide, and acid-base balance), BUN and creatinine (kidney function tests), Chem-20, Chest x-ray, Lung function tests, Urinalysis, Urine toxicology screen (presence of legal and illegal drugs). ", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for Paraquat poisoning. The goal is to relieve symptoms and treat complications (supportive care).Remove all contaminated clothing.If the chemical touched your skin, wash the area with soap and water for 15 minutes, without scrubbing hard, so as not to cause abrasions which will allow greater absorption of the toxin.If there has been contamination of the eyes, flush them with water for 15 minutes.If you have swallowed Paraquat, you should receive activated charcoal as quickly as possible. Sicker patients may need a procedure called hemoperfusion, which filters the blood through charcoal to try to remove Paraquat from the lungs.", "Causes": "In the United States, Paraquat is classified as \"restricted commercial use,\" and people must obtain a license to use the product. Breathing in Paraquat may cause lung damage and can lead to a disease called Paraquat lung. Paraquat causes damage to the body when it touches the lining of the mouth, stomach, or intestines. You can get sick if Paraquat touches a cut on your skin. Paraquat may also damage the kidneys, liver, and esophagus.If Paraquat is swallowed, death can rapidly occur. Death may occur from a hole in the esophagus, or from acute inflammation of the mediastinum, the area that surrounds the major blood vessels and airways in the middle of the chest.Chronic exposure to Paraquat may cause pulmonary fibrosis, a stiffening of the lung tissue.", "Prevention": "Avoid exposure to Paraquat."}, "Premenstrual dysphoric disorder": {"description": "PMS refers to a wide range of physical or emotional symptoms that typically occur about 5-11 days before a woman starts her monthly menstrual cycle. The symptoms usually stop when, or shortly after, her period begins.", "Possible Complications": "PMDD symptoms may be severe enough to interfere with a woman's daily life. Women with depression may have worse symptoms during the second half of their cycle and may need changes in their medication.Some\u00a0women with PMDD have had suicidal thoughts. Suicide in women with depression is more likely to occur during the second half of the menstrual cycle.PMDD may be associated with eating disorders and smoking.", "Symptoms": ["No interest in daily activities and relationships", "Fatigue or low energy", "Feeling of sadness or hopelessness, possible suicidal thoughts", "Feelings of tension or anxiety", "Feeling out of control", "Food cravings or binge eating", "Mood swings\u00a0with periods of crying", "Panic attacks", "Irritability or anger that affects other people", "Physical symptoms, such as bloating, breast tenderness, headaches, and joint or muscle pain", "Problems sleeping", "Trouble concentrating"], "Exams and Tests": "No physical examination or lab tests can diagnose PMDD. A complete history, physical examination (including a pelvic exam), and psychiatric evaluation should be done to rule out other conditions.Keeping a calendar or diary of symptoms can help women identify the most troublesome symptoms and the times when they are likely to occur. This information may help the health care provider diagnose PMDD and determine the best treatment.", "Treatment": "A healthy lifestyle is the first step to managing PMDD.Eat\u00a0healthy foods\u00a0with more whole grains, vegetables, fruit, and little or no salt, sugar, alcohol, and caffeine., Get regular aerobic exercise throughout the month to reduce the severity of PMS symptoms., If you have problems sleeping, try changing your sleep habits before taking medicines for insomnia.. Keep a diary or calendar to record:The type of symptoms you are having, How severe they are, How long they last. Antidepressants may be helpful.The first option is usually an antidepressant known as a selective serotonin-reuptake inhibitor (SSRI). You can take SSRIs in the second part of your cycle up until your period starts, or for the whole month. Ask your doctor.Cognitive behavioral therapy (CBT) may be used either with or instead of antidepressants. During CBT, you have about 10 visits with a mental health professional over several weeks.Other treatments that may help include:Birth control pills may decrease or increase PMS symptoms, including depression, Diuretics may be useful for women who gain a lot of weight from fluid retention, Nutritional supplements -- such as vitamin B6, calcium, and magnesium -- may be recommended, Other medicines (such as Depo-Lupron) suppress the ovaries and ovulation, Pain relievers such as aspirin or ibuprofen may be prescribed for headache, backache, menstrual cramping and breast tenderness . ", "Causes": "The causes of PMS and PMDD have not been found.Hormone changes that occur during a woman's menstrual cycle\u00a0may play a role.PMDD affects between 3% and 8% of women during the years when they are having menstrual periods.Many women with this condition have:Anxiety, Severe\u00a0depression, Seasonal affective disorder (SAD). Other factors that may play a role include:Alcohol abuse, Being overweight, Drinking large amounts of caffeine, Having a mother with a history of the disorder, Lack of exercise . "}, "Pyogenic granuloma": {"description": "Pyogenic granulomas are small, raised, and red bumps on the skin. The bumps have a smooth surface and may be moist. They bleed easily because of the high number of blood vessels at the site.", "Possible Complications": "These problems may occur:Bleeding from the granuloma, Return of the condition after treatment . ", "Symptoms": ["A small red lump on the skin\u00a0that bleeds easily", "Often found at the site of a recent injury", "Usually seen on hands, arms, and face, but\u00a0they may develop in the mouth (most often in pregnant women) "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will do a physical exam to diagnose this condition.\u00a0You may also need a skin biopsy\u00a0to confirm the diagnosis.", "Treatment": "Small pyogenic granulomas may go away suddenly. Larger bumps are treated with:Surgery , Electrocautery\u00a0(heat) , Freezing, A\u00a0laser.. ", "Causes": "The exact cause of pyogenic granulomas is unknown. They often appear following an injury\u00a0on\u00a0the hands, arms, or face.Pyogenic granulomas are common in children."}, "Polycystic ovary syndrome": {"description": "Polycystic ovary syndrome is a condition in which a woman has an imbalance of female sex hormones. This may lead to changes in the menstrual cycle, cysts in the ovaries, trouble getting pregnant, and other health problems.", "Possible Complications": "\r\n\r\n\r\n\r\n\r\nWomen with PCOS are more likely to develop:Endometrial cancer \r\n \r\n , Infertility, Breast cancer \r\n \r\n\r\n\r\n\r\n\r\n(slightly increased\u00a0risk). ", "Symptoms": ["Not getting a period after you have had one or more normal ones during puberty (secondary amenorrhea)", "Irregular periods that may come and go, and be very light to very heavy", "Extra body hair that grows on the chest, belly, face, and around the nipples", "Acne on the face, chest, or back", "Skin changes, such as dark or thick skin markings and creases around the armpits, groin, neck, and breasts ", "Thinning hair on the head at the temples, called male pattern baldness", "Enlargement of the clitoris", "Deepening of the voice", "Decrease in breast size"], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor or nurse will perform a physical exam. This will include a pelvic exam. The exam may show:Swollen ovaries, Swollen clitoris (very rare) . The following health conditions are common in women with PCOS:Diabetes, High blood pressure, High cholesterol, Weight gain and obesity . Your doctor or nurse will check your weight and body mass index (BMI) and measure your belly size.Blood tests can be done to check hormone levels. These tests may include:Estrogen level, FSH level, LH level, Male hormone (testosterone) level, 17-ketosteroids. Other blood tests that may be done include:Fasting glucose (blood sugar) and other tests for glucose intolerance and insulin resistance, Lipid level, Pregnancy test (serum HCG), Prolactin level, Thyroid function tests. Your doctor may also order the following imaging test or surgeries to look at your ovaries:Vaginal ultrasound, Pelvic laparoscopy. ", "Treatment": "Weight gain and obesity\u00a0are common in women with PCOS. Losing weight, even a small amount of weight, can help treat the hormone changes and health conditions such as diabetes, high blood pressure, or high cholesterol. Your doctor may recommend birth control pills to make your periods more regular. These medicines may also help reduce abnormal hair growth and acne after you take them for several months. A diabetes medicine called Glucophage (metformin) may also be recommended to:Make your periods regular, Prevent type 2 diabetes, Help you lose weight . Other medicines that may be prescribed to help make your periods regular and help you get pregnant are:LH-releasing hormone (LHRH) analogs, Clomiphene citrate, which helps your ovaries grow and release eggs. These medicines work better if your body mass index (BMI) is 30 or less (below the obese range). Your doctor or nurse may also suggest other treatments for abnormal hair growth. Some are:Spironolactone or flutamide pills, Eflornithine cream . Permanent hair removal options include electrolysis and laser hair removal. However, many treatments may be needed, and treatments are expensive. A pelvic laparoscopy may be done to remove or alter an ovary to treat infertility. The effects are temporary.", "Causes": "PCOS is linked to changes in hormone levels that make it harder for the ovaries to release fully-grown (mature) eggs. The reasons for these changes are unclear. The hormones affected are:Estrogen and progesterone, the female hormones that help a woman's ovaries release eggs , Androgen, a male hormone that is found in small amounts in women. Normally, one or more eggs are released during a woman's cycle. This is known as ovulation. In most cases, this release of eggs occurs about 2 weeks after the start of a menstrual period. In PCOS, mature eggs are not released. Instead, they stay in the ovaries with a small amount of fluid around them. There can be many of these. However, not all women with the condition will have ovaries with this appearance. These problems with the release of eggs can contribute to infertility. The other symptoms of this disorder are due to the\u00a0hormone\u00a0imbalances.Most of the time, PCOS is diagnosed in women in their 20s or 30s. However, it may also affect teenage girls. The symptoms often begin when a girl's periods start. Women with this disorder often have a mother or sister who has similar symptoms. "}, "Plantar fasciitis": {"description": "The plantar fascia is the thick tissue on the bottom of the foot. It connects the heel bone to the toes and creates the arch of the foot. When this tissue becomes swollen or inflamed, it is called plantar fasciitis. ", "Symptoms": ["In the morning when you take your first steps", "After standing or sitting for awhile", "When climbing stairs", "After intense activity "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. This may show:Tenderness on the bottom of your foot, Flat feet or high arches, Mild foot swelling or redness, Stiffness or tightness of the arch in the bottom of your foot.. X-rays may be taken to rule out other problems.", "Causes": "Plantar fasciitis occurs when the thick band of tissue on the bottom of the foot is overstretched or overused. This can be painful and make walking more difficult.You are more likely to get plantar fasciitis if you: Have foot arch problems (both flat feet and high arches), Run long distances, downhill or on uneven surfaces, Are obese or gain weight suddenly , Have a tight Achilles tendon (the tendon connecting the calf muscles to the heel), Wear shoes with poor arch support or soft soles, Change your activities. Plantar fasciitis is seen in both men and women. However, it most often affects active men ages 40 - 70. It is one of the most common orthopedic foot complaints. Plantar fasciitis was commonly thought to be caused by a heel spur. However, research has found that this is not the case. On x-ray, heel spurs are seen in people with and without plantar fasciitis.", "Prevention": "Making sure your ankle, Achilles tendon, and calf muscles are flexible can help prevent plantar fasciitis. Stretch your plantar fascia in the morning before you get out of bed. Doing activities in moderation can also help.", "Treatment": "Your health care provider will often recommend these steps first:Acetaminophen (Tylenol) or ibuprofen (Advil, Motrin) to reduce pain and inflammation, Heel and foot stretching exercises, Night splints to wear while sleeping to stretch the foot, Resting as much as possible for at least a week, Wearing shoes with good support and cushions . Other steps to relieve pain include:Apply ice to the painful area. Do this at least twice a day for 10 - 15 minutes, more often in the first couple of days., Try wearing a heel cup, felt pads in the heel area, or shoe inserts., Use night splints to stretch the injured fascia and allow it to heal. . If these treatments do not work, your health care provider may recommend:Wearing a boot cast, which looks like a ski boot, for 3 - 6 weeks. It can be removed for bathing., Custom-made shoe inserts (orthotics), Steroid shots or injections into the heel . Sometimes, foot surgery is needed. "}, "Paradichlorobenzene poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Burning in mouth", "Breathing problems (rapid, slow, or painful)", "Cough", "Shallow breathing", "Changes in alertness", "Headache", "Slurred speech", "Weakness", "Yellow skin (jaundice)", "Abdominal pain", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Phobia - simple/specific": {"description": "A phobia is an ongoing and unreasonable fear of a certain object, animal, activity, or situation that poses little to no actual danger.", "Possible Complications": "Some phobias may have consequences that affect job performance or social functioning. Some anti-anxiety medications used to treat phobias may cause physical dependence.", "Symptoms": ["This fear or anxiety is much stronger than the real threat.", "You may sweat excessively, have problems controlling your muscles or actions, or have a fast heart rate. "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will ask about your history of phobia, and will get a description of the behavior from you, your family, and friends.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to help you function effectively. The success of the treatment usually depends on how severe your phobia is.Systematic desensitization is a technique used to treat phobias. You are asked to relax, then imagine the parts of the phobia, working from the least fearful to the most fearful. Gradual exposure to the real-life situation has also been used with success to help people overcome their fears.Anti-anxiety and antidepressant medications are sometimes used to help relieve the symptoms. Behavioral treatment is often used together with drug therapy. This can include:Cognitive-behavioral therapy, including learning to recognize and replace panic-causing thoughts, Exposure, Pleasant mental imagery, Relaxation techniques . Behavioral treatment appears to have long-lasting benefits.Other treatments that can reduce the number of attacks include:Getting regular exercise, Getting enough sleep, Reducing or avoiding the use of caffeine, some over-the-counter cold medications, and other stimulants. Phobia clinics and group therapy are available in some areas to help people deal with common phobias, such as a fear of flying.", "Causes": "Specific phobias are a type of anxiety disorder in which a person may feel extremely anxious or has a panic attack when exposed to the object of fear. Specific phobias are a common mental disorder.Common phobias include the fear of:\r\n  Blood, injections, and other medical procedures\r\n  , \r\n  Certain animals (for instance, dogs or snakes)\r\n  , \r\n  Enclosed spaces\r\n  , \r\n  Flying\r\n  , \r\n  High places\r\n  , \r\n  Insects or spiders\r\n  , \r\n  Lightning\r\n  . "}, "Pseudohypoparathyroidism": {"description": "A related condition is hypoparathyroidism,\u00a0in which the body does not make enough parathyroid hormone.\u00a0", "Possible Complications": "People with type Ia pseudohypoparathyroidism are more likely to have other endocrine system problems (such as hypothyroidism and hypogonadism).Pseudohypoparathyroidism may be connected to other hormone problems, resulting in:Low sex drive, Slow sexual development, Low energy levels, Weight gain . ", "Symptoms": ["Cataracts", "Dental problems", "Numbness", "Seizures", "Tetany (a collection of symptoms including muscle twitches and hand and foot spasms) ", "Calcium deposits under the skin", "Dimples that can replace knuckles on affected fingers", "Round face and short neck", "Short hand bones, especially the bone below the 4th finger", "Short height "], "Exams and Tests": "Blood tests will be done to check calcium, phosphorus, and PTH levels. You may also need urine tests.Other tests may include:Genetic testing, Head MRI or CT scan of the brain. ", "Treatment": "Your doctor will recommend calcium and vitamin D supplements to maintain a proper calcium level. If the blood phosphate level\u00a0is high, you may need to follow a\u00a0low-phosphorus diet or take medicines called phosphate binders (such as calcium carbonate or calcium acetate).", "Causes": "The parathyroid glands produce parathyroid hormone (PTH). PTH helps control calcium, phosphorus, and vitamin D levels in the blood and bone.If you have pseudohypoparathyroidism, your body produces the right amount of PTH, but is \"resistant\" to its effect. This causes low blood calcium levels and high blood phosphate levels.Pseudohypoparathyroidism is caused by abnormal genes. There are different types of pseudohypoparathyroidism. All forms are rare.Type Ia is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner. That means only one parent needs to pass you the faulty gene for you to have the condition. It is also called Albright hereditary osteodystrophy. The condition causes short stature, round face, obesity, developmental delay,\u00a0and short hand bones. Symptoms depend on whether you inherit the gene from your mother or father., Type Ib involves resistance to PTH only in the kidneys. Less is known about type Ib than type Ia. Calcium in the blood is low, but there are no symptoms of Albright hereditary osteodystrophy., Type II pseudohypoparathyroidism also involves low blood calcium and high blood phosphate levels. People with this form of the disorder do not have the physical traits common to people with Type Ia. The genetic abnormality that causes it is not known. . "}, "Plummer-Vinson syndrome": {"description": "Plummer-Vinson syndrome is a condition that can occurs in people with long-term (chronic) iron deficiency anemia. People with this condition have problems swallowing due to small, thin growths of tissue that partially block the upper food pipe (esophagus).", "Possible Complications": "Devices used to stretch the esophagus (dilators) may cause a tear, which leads to bleeding.Plummer-Vinson syndrome has been linked to esophageal cancer.", "Symptoms": ["Difficulty swallowing", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "You may develop skin and nail abnormalities that\u00a0your doctor can see during an exam.Upper GI series or upper endoscopy may show the abnormal tissue in the food pipe. You may have tests to look for anemia or iron deficiency. ", "Treatment": "Taking iron supplements may improve the swallowing problems.If supplements do not help, the web of tissue\u00a0can be widened during upper endoscopy. This will\u00a0allow normal swallowing and passage of food.", "Causes": "The cause of Plummer-Vinson syndrome is unknown. Genetic factors and a lack of certain nutrients (nutritional deficiencies) may play a role. It is a rare disorder that can be linked to cancers of the esophagus and throat. It is more common in women.", "Prevention": "Getting\u00a0enough iron in your diet may prevent this disorder."}, "Plant fertilizer poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Blue-colored fingernails, lips, or palms of the hand", "Burning skin", "Burning of the throat, nose, and eyes", "Dizziness", "Fainting", "Itchy skin", "Low blood pressure", "Seizures", "Shortness of breath", "Skin redness", "Stomach pain", "Stomach upset"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Parathyroid hyperplasia": {"description": "Parathyroid hyperplasia is the enlargement of all four parathyroid glands. The parathyroid glands are glands in the neck that produce parathyroid hormone (PTH).", "Possible Complications": "Parathyroid hyperplasia can cause hyperparathyroidism, which leads to an increase in blood calcium levels.Complications include increased calcium in the kidneys, which can cause kidney stones,\u00a0and osteitis fibrosa cystica (a softened, weak area in the bones).Patients may also have complications from the other tumors that are part of the multiple endocrine neoplasia syndromes. See also: MEN I, MEN IIA. ", "Symptoms": ["Bone fractures or bone pain", "Constipation", "Lethargy", "Muscle pain", "Nausea"], "Exams and Tests": "Blood tests will be done to check calcium, phosphorus, magnesium, PTH, and vitamin D levels. A 24-hour urine test may be done to determine how much calcium is being filtered out of the body into the urine.Bone x-rays and a bone density test (DXA) can help detect fractures, bone loss, and bone softening.", "Treatment": "Surgery is the preferred treatment. Usually 3 1/2 glands are removed. The remaining tissue may be implanted in the forearm so a doctor can easily operate on it if symptoms come back. This tissue will also help the body control calcium levels.", "Causes": "Parathyroid hyperplasia may occur in people without a family history of the disease, or as part of three inherited syndromes: Multiple endocrine neoplasia I (MEN I), MEN IIA, Isolated familial hyperparathyroidism. In people with an inherited syndrome, a changed (mutated) gene is passed down through the family. You only need to get the gene from one parent to develop the condition.In MEN I, problems in the parathyroid glands occur, as well as tumors in the pituitary gland and pancreas., In MEN IIA, overactivity of the parathyroid glands occurs, along with tumors in the adrenal or thyroid gland. . Parathyroid hyperplasia is more likely to occur as an effect of other medical conditions than from a problem of the parathyroid glands. The most common conditions that can cause parathyroid hyperplasia are chronic kidney disease and chronic vitamin D deficiency.", "Prevention": "Patients with a family history of the MEN syndromes may want to have genetic screening to check for the defective gene. Those who have the defective gene may have routine screening tests to detect any early symptoms."}, "Polymyalgia rheumatica": {"description": "Polymyalgia rheumatica (PMR) is an inflammatory disorder. It involves pain and stiffness in the shoulder and often the hip.", "Symptoms": ["Anemia", "Appetite loss, which leads to weight loss", "Depression", "Fever"], "Exams and Tests": "Lab tests alone cannot diagnose polymyalgia rheumatica. Most patients with this condition have a high sedimentation rate (ESR).Other test results for this condition include:Abnormal proteins in the blood\r\n  , Abnormal white blood cells\r\n  , Anemia (low blood count)\r\n  . These tests may also be used to monitor your condition.", "Causes": "Polymyalgia rheumatica most often occurs in people over 50 years old. The cause is unknown.PMR may occur before or with giant cell arteritis (also called temporal arteritis), in which blood vessels that supply blood to the head become inflamed.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention.", "Treatment": "There is no cure for polymyalgia rheumatica. Low doses of corticosteroids (such as prednisone) can ease symptoms within a day or two. The dose can then be slowly reduced to a very low level, but treatment needs to continue for about 2\u00a0to 6 years.Corticosteroids can cause many side effects, so you need to be watched closely if you are taking these medicines. "}, "Pathological gambling": {"description": "Pathological gambling is being unable to resist impulses to gamble, which can lead to severe personal or social consequences.", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Alcohol and drug abuse problems, Anxiety, Depression, Financial, social, and legal problems (including bankruptcy, divorce, job loss, time in prison), Heart attacks (from the stress and excitement of gambling), Suicide attempts. Getting the right treatment can help prevent many of these problems.", "Symptoms": ["Committing crimes to get money to gamble", "Feeling restless or irritable when trying to cut back or quit gambling", "Gambling to escape problems or feelings of sadness or anxiety", "Gambling larger amounts of money to try to make back past losses", "Losing a job, relationship, education, or career opportunity due to gambling", "Lying about the amount of time or money spent gambling", "Making many unsuccessful attempts to cut back or quit gambling", "Needing to borrow money due to gambling losses", "Needing to gamble larger amounts of money in order to feel excitement", "Spending a lot of time thinking about gambling, such as remembering past experiences or ways to get more money with which to gamble "], "Exams and Tests": "A psychiatric evaluation and history can be used to diagnose pathological gambling. Screening tools such as the Gamblers Anonymous 20 Questions can help with the diagnosis.", "Treatment": "Treatment for people with pathological gambling begins with recognizing the problem. Pathological gamblers often deny they have a problem or need treatment.Most people with pathological gambling only get treated when other people pressure them.Treatment options include:Cognitive behavioral therapy (CBT) , Self-help support groups, such as Gamblers Anonymous. Gamblers Anonymous is a 12-step program similar to Alcoholics Anonymous. Practices used to treat other types of addiction, such as substance abuse and alcohol dependence, can also be helpful in treating pathological gambling., A few studies have been done on medications for treating pathological gambling. Early results suggest that antidepressants and opioid antagonists (naltrexone) may help treat the symptoms of pathological gambling. However, it is not yet clear which people will respond to medications.. ", "Causes": "Pathological gambling usually begins in early adolescence in men, and between ages 20 and 40 in women.Pathological gambling often involves repetitive behaviors. People with this problem have a hard time resisting or controlling the impulse to gamble. Although it shares features of obsessive compulsive disorder, pathological gambling is likely a different condition.In people who develop pathological gambling, occasional gambling leads to a gambling habit. Stressful situations can worsen gambling problems.", "Prevention": "Exposure to gambling may increase the risk of developing pathological gambling. Limiting exposure may be helpful for people who are at risk.Public exposure to gambling, however, continues to increase in the form of lotteries, electronic and Internet gambling, and casinos. Intervention at the earliest signs of pathological gambling may prevent the disorder from getting worse."}, "Primary alveolar hypoventilation": {"description": "Primary alveolar hypoventilation is a rare disorder in which a person does not take enough breaths per minute. The lungs and airways are normal.", "Possible Complications": "Low blood oxygen level can cause high blood pressure in the lung blood vessels. This can lead to cor pulmonale (right-sided heart failure).", "Symptoms": ["Bluish coloration of the skin caused by lack of oxygen", "Daytime drowsiness", "Fatigue", "Lethargy", "Morning headaches", "Swelling of the ankles", "Waking up from sleep unrested", "Waking up many times at night "], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. Tests will be done to rule out other causes. For example, muscular dystrophy can make the rib muscles weak, and emphysema damages the lung tissue itself. A small stroke can affect the breathing center in the brain.Tests that may be done include:Blood gases, Chest x-ray, Hematocrit and hemoglobin blood tests, Lung function tests, Overnight oxygen level measurements (oximetry), Serum bicarbonate, Sleep study (polysomnography). ", "Treatment": "Medications that stimulate the respiratory system may be used but do not always work. Mechanical devices that assist breathing, particularly at night, may be helpful in some patients. Oxygen therapy may help in a few patients, but may worsen night symptoms in others.", "Causes": "Normally, when the oxygen level in the blood\u00a0is low or the carbon dioxide level is\u00a0high, there is a signal from the brain to breathe more deeply or quickly. In people with primary alveolar hypoventilation, this change in breathing does not happen.The cause of this condition is unknown. Some patients have a specific genetic defect.The disease mainly affects men 20 to 50 years old. It may also occur in children.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention. Patients should avoid using sleep medicines or other drugs that\u00a0can cause drowsiness."}, "Pierre Robin syndrome": {"description": "Pierre Robin syndrome (or sequence) is a condition present at birth, in which the infant has a smaller-than-normal lower jaw, a tongue that falls back in the throat, and difficulty breathing.", "Possible Complications": "Breathing difficulties, especially when the child sleeps, Choking episodes, Congestive heart failure, Death, Feeding difficulties, Low blood oxygen and brain damage (due to difficulty breathing), Pulmonary hypertension. ", "Symptoms": ["Cleft soft palate", "High-arched palate", "Jaw that is very small with small (receding) chin \r\n ", "Jaw that is far back in the throat", "Repeated ear infections", "Small opening in the roof of the mouth, which\u00a0may cause choking or regurgitation of liquids through the nose", "Teeth\u00a0that appear\u00a0when the baby is born (natal teeth)", "Tongue that is large compared to the jaw"], "Exams and Tests": "A health care provider can usually diagnose this condition during a physical exam. Consulting with a genetic specialist can rule out other problems linked to this syndrome.", "Treatment": "Infants with this condition should NOT be put on their back, to prevent the tongue from falling back into the airway.In moderate cases, the patient will need to have a tube placed through the nose and into the airways to avoid airway blockage. In severe cases, surgery is needed to prevent a blockage in the upper airway. Some patients need surgery to make a hole in the windpipe (tracheostomy).Feeding must be done very carefully to avoid choking and breathing liquids into the airways. The child may need to be fed through a tube\u00a0sometimes to prevent choking.", "Causes": "The exact causes of Pierre Robin syndrome are unknown. It may be part of many genetic syndromes.The lower jaw develops slowly before birth, but may speed up during the first year of life. ", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention. Treatment may reduce the episodes of breathing problems and choking."}, "Primary amyloidosis": {"description": "Primary amyloidosis is a disorder in which abnormal proteins build up in tissues and organs. Clumps of the abnormal proteins are called amyloid deposits.", "Possible Complications": "Congestive heart failure, Death, Kidney failure, Respiratory failure. ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal heart rhythm", "Swollen tongue", "Fatigue", "Numbness of hands or feet", "Shortness of breath", "Skin changes", " \r\n Swallowing problems \r\n ", "Swelling in the arms and legs", "Weak hand grip", "Weight loss", "Decreased urine output", "Diarrhea", "Hoarseness or changing voice", "Joint pain", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will examine you. You will be asked questions about your medical history and symptoms. A physical exam may show that you have an\u00a0swollen liver or spleen.The first step in diagnosing amyloidosis should be blood and urine tests to look for abnormal proteins. Other tests depend on your symptoms and what organ may be affected. Some tests include:Abdominal ultrasound to check the liver and spleen., Heart tests such as\u00a0an ECG\u00a0or echocardiogram., A carpal tunnel syndrome exam to check for a weak hand grip, including a\u00a0nerve conduction velocity test., Kidney function tests to check for signs of kidney failure (nephrotic syndrome).\r\n. Tests that can\u00a0help confirm the diagnosis include:Abdominal fat pad aspiration, Bone marrow biopsy, Rectal mucosa biopsy. This disease may also affect the results of the following tests:Bence-Jones protein (quantitative), Carpal tunnel biopsy, Gum biopsy, Immunoelectrophoresis - serum, Myocardial biopsy, Nerve biopsy, Quantitative immunoglobulins, Tongue biopsy, Urine protein. ", "Treatment": "This condition is treated the same way as multiple myeloma. Treatment may include: Chemotherapy\u00a0, Stem cell transplant . If the condition is caused by another disease, that disease should be aggressively treated. This may\u00a0improve symptoms or\u00a0slow the disease from getting worse. Complications such as heart failure, kidney failure, and other problems can sometimes be treated, when needed.", "Causes": "The cause of primary amyloidosis is unknown. The condition is related to abnormal and excess production of antibodies by a type of immune cell called plasma cells. Clumbs of abnormal proteins build up in certain organs. This reduces their ability to work correctly. \r\n Primary amyloidosis can lead to conditions that include:Carpal tunnel syndrome, Heart muscle damage (cardiomyopathy) leading to congestive heart failure, Intestinal malabsorption, Liver swelling, Kidney failure, Nephrotic syndrome, Nerve problems (neuropathy), Orthostatic hypotension (drop in blood pressure when you stand up). Primary amyloidosis is rare. It is similar to multiple myeloma.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention for primary amyloidosis."}, "Pulmonary atresia": {"description": "In pulmonary atresia, a solid sheet of tissue forms where the valve opening should be, and the valve stays closed. Because of this defect, blood from the right side of the heart cannot go to the lungs to pick up oxygen.", "Possible Complications": "Delayed growth and development, Seizures, Stroke, Infectious endocarditis, Heart failure, Death. ", "Symptoms": ["Bluish colored skin (cyanosis)", "Fast breathing", "Fatigue", "Poor eating habits (babies may get tired while nursing or sweat during feedings)", "Shortness of breath"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will use a stethoscope to listen to the heart and lungs. Persons with a PDA have a heart murmur that can be heard with a stethoscope.The following tests may be ordered:Chest x-ray, Echocardiogram, Electrocardiogram (ECG), Heart catheterization, Pulse oximetry - shows the amount of oxygen in the blood. ", "Treatment": "A medicine called prostaglandin E1 is usually used to help the blood move (circulate) into the lungs. This medicine keeps a blood vessel open between the pulmonary artery and aorta. The vessel is called a patent ductus arteriosus (PDA).Multiple\u00a0treatments are possible, but depend on the extent of the heart abnormalities that accompany the pulmonary valve defect. Potential treatments include:A thin, flexible tube (heart catheterization) to repair the problem, Open heart surgery to repair or replace the valve, or to place a tube between the right ventricle and the pulmonary (lung) arteries, Reconstructing the heart as a single ventricle (one pumping chamber instead of two), Heart transplant. ", "Causes": "As with most congenital heart diseases, there is no known cause of pulmonary atresia. The condition is associated with another type of congenital heart defect called a patent ductus arteriosus (PDA).Pulmonary atresia may occur with or without a ventricular septal defect (VSD). If the person does not have a VSD, the condition is called pulmonary atresia with intact ventricular septum (PA/IVS). , If the person has both problems, the condition is called pulmonary atresia with VSD. This is an extreme form of tetralogy of Fallot. . Although both conditions are called pulmonary atresia, they are actually different defects. This article discusses pulmonary atresia without a VSD.Persons with pulmonary atresia with intact ventricular septum may also have a poorly developed tricuspid valve. They may also have an underdeveloped right ventricle and abnormal blood vessels feeding the heart.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent this condition.All pregnant women should receive routine prenatal care. Many congenital defects can be discovered on routine ultrasound examinations. If the defect is found before birth, medical specialists (such as a pediatric cardiologist, cardiothoracic surgeon, and neonatologist) can be present at the birth, and ready to help as needed. This preparation can mean the difference between life and death for some babies."}, "Primary biliary cirrhosis": {"description": "Primary biliary cirrhosis is irritation and swelling (inflammation) of the bile ducts of the liver. This blocks the flow of bile, which damages the liver cells and leads to scarring called cirrhosis.", "Possible Complications": "Progressive cirrhosis can lead to liver failure. Complications can include:Bleeding, Damage to the brain (encephalopathy), Fluid and electrolyte imbalance, Kidney failure, Malabsorption, Malnutrition, Soft or weak bones (osteomalacia or osteoporosis) . ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Enlarged liver", "Fatigue", "Fatty deposits under the skin", "Fatty stools", "Itching", "Jaundice", "Soft yellow spots on the eyelid "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will do a physical exam. The following tests can check to see if your liver is working properly:\r\n  Albumin blood test\r\n  , Liver function tests (serum alkaline phosphatase is most important), Prothrombin time (PT), Cholesterol and lipoprotein blood tests . Other tests that can help diagnose this disease are:\r\n  Elevated immunoglobulin M level in the blood\r\n  , Liver biopsy, Anti-mitochondrial antibodies (results are positive in about 95% of cases) . ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to ease symptoms and prevent complications.Cholestyramine (or colestipol) may reduce the itching. Ursodeoxycholic acid may improve removal of bile from the bloodstream. This may improve survival in some patients.Vitamin replacement therapy restores vitamins A, K, E and D, which are lost in fatty stools. A calcium supplement or other bone medicines may be added to prevent or treat weak or soft bones (osteoporosis, and rarely osteomalacia).Liver transplant may be successful if it is done before liver failure occurs. ", "Causes": "The cause of inflamed bile ducts in the liver is not known. However, primary biliary cirrhosis is an autoimmune disorder. That means your body's immune system mistakenly attacks healthy tissue.The disease more commonly affects middle-aged women.Long-term bile obstruction is believed to lead to liver cirrhosis. The disease may be linked to autoimmune disorders such as:Celiac disease, Raynaud's phenomenon, Sicca syndrome (dry eyes or mouth), Thyroid disease . "}, "Perioral dermatitis": {"description": "Perioral dermatitis is a skin disorder in which tiny red bumps form around the mouth.", "Symptoms": ["Burning feeling around the mouth ", "Bumps around the mouth that may be filled with fluid or pus", "A similar rash may around the eyes, nose, or forehead "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will examine your skin to diagnose the condition. You may need to have other tests to find out if it is due to a bacterial infection. ", "Causes": "The exact cause of perioral dermatitis is unknown. It may occur after using face creams containing steroids for another condition. Young women are most likely to get this condition. ", "Prevention": "Avoid using skin creams containing steroids on your face, unless directed by your doctor.", "Treatment": "Do NOT use steroid creams to threat this condition. Treatment may include skin medicines such as:Metronidazole, Erythromycin, Benzoyl peroxide, Tacrolimus, Clindamycin, Pimecrolimus, Sodium sulfacetamide with sulfur . You may need to take antibiotic pills if the condition is severe. Antibiotics used to treat this condition include tetracycline, doxycycline, minocycline, or erythromycin."}, "Progressive supranuclear palsy": {"description": "Progressive supranuclear palsy is a movement disorder that occurs from damage to certain nerve cells in the brain.", "Possible Complications": "Blood clot in veins (deep vein thrombosis) due to limited movement, Injury from falling, Lack of control over vision, Loss of brain functions over time, Pneumonia due to\u00a0trouble swallowing, Poor nutrition (malnutrition), Side effects from medications . ", "Symptoms": ["Changes in expressions of the face", "Deeply lined face", "Difficulty moving the eyes, lack of control over the eyes, or problems keeping the eyes open", "Different sized pupils", "Difficulty swallowing", "General slowness of movement (bradykinesia)", "Jaw or face jerks or spasms", "Loss of coordination, unsteady gait (walking pattern)", "Mild-to-moderate dementia", "Personality changes", "Repeated falls", "Slow or stiff movements", "Speech difficulties, such as low voice volume, inability to say words clearly, slow speech", "Stiffness and rigid movement in the neck, middle of the body, arms, and legs", "Tremor", "Vision difficulty -- unable to look up or down without bending the neck "], "Exams and Tests": "An exam of the nervous system (neurological examination) may show:Dementia that is getting worse, Difficulty walking, Limited eye movements, especially up and down movements, Normal vision, hearing, feeling, and control of movement, Stiff and uncoordinated movements like those of Parkinson's disease . The health care provider may do the following tests to rule out other diseases: Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) might show shrinking of the brainstem (hummingbird sign), PET scan of the brain will show changes in the front of the brain . ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to control symptoms. There is no known cure for progressive supranuclear palsy.Levodopa or other drugs block the action of a nervous system chemical called acetylcholine. They may temporarily reduce some symptoms, such as rigid limbs or slow movements. But these medications are usually not as effective as they are for Parkinson's disease.Many people with this condition will eventually need around-the-clock care and monitoring as they lose brain functions.", "Causes": "Progressive supranuclear palsy is a condition that causes symptoms similar to those of Parkinson's disease.It involves damage to many cells of the brain. Many areas are affected, including the part of the brainstem where cells that control eye movement are located. Also affected is an area of the brain that controls steadiness when you walk. The frontal lobes of the brain are also affected, leading to personality changes.The cause of the damage to the brain cells is unknown. The disease gets worse over time.People with this condition have deposits in brain tissues that look like those found in patients with Alzheimer's disease. There is a loss of tissue in most areas of the brain and in some parts of the spinal cord.The disorder is most often seen in people over 60 years old, and is somewhat more common in men."}, "Pericarditis": {"description": "Pericarditis is a condition in which the sac-like covering around the heart (pericardium) becomes inflamed.", "Symptoms": ["May be felt in the neck, shoulder, back, or abdomen", "Often increases with deep breathing and lying flat, and may increase with coughing and swallowing", "Can feel sharp and stabbing", "Is often relieved by sitting up and leaning or bending forward ", "Ankle, feet, and leg swelling", "Anxiety", "Breathing difficulty when lying down", "Dry cough", "Fatigue"], "Exams and Tests": "When listening to the heart with a stethoscope, the health care provider can hear a sound called a pericardial rub. The heart sounds may be muffled or distant. There may be other signs of fluid in the pericardium (pericardial effusion).If the disorder is severe, there may be:Crackles in the lungs, Decreased breath sounds , Other signs of fluid in the space around the lungs. The following imaging tests may be done to check the heart and the tissue layer around it (pericardium):Chest MRI scan, Chest x-ray, Echocardiogram, Electrocardiogram, Heart MRI or heart CT scan, Radionuclide scanning . To look for heart muscle damage, the health care provider may order a troponin I test. Other laboratory tests may include:Antinuclear antibody (ANA), Blood culture, CBC, C-reactive protein, Erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), HIV test, Rheumatoid factor, Tuberculin skin test. ", "Causes": "The cause of pericarditis is unknown or unproven in many cases. It mostly affects men ages 20 - 50. Pericarditis is often the result of an infection such as: Viral infections that cause a chest cold or pneumonia, such as echovirus or coxsackie virus (common in children) and influenza, Infections with bacteria (less common), Some fungal infections (rare) . The condition may be seen with diseases such as:Cancer (including leukemia), Disorders in which the immune system attacks healthy body tissue by mistake, HIV infection and AIDS, Underactive thyroid gland, Kidney failure, Rheumatic fever, Tuberculosis (TB) . Other causes include:Heart attack, Heart surgery or trauma to the chest, esophagus, or heart, Certain medicines, such as procainamide, hydralazine, phenytoin, isoniazid, and some drugs used to treat cancer or suppress the immune system, Swelling or inflammation of the heart muscle, Radiation therapy to the chest . ", "Prevention": "Many cases cannot be prevented.", "Treatment": "The cause of pericarditis should be identified, if possible.High doses of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs) such as ibuprofen are often given. These medicines will decrease your pain and reduce the swelling or inflammation in the sac around your heart.If pericarditis does not go away after 1 to 2 weeks, or it comes back weeks or months later, a medicine called colchicine may be added. If the cause of pericarditis is an infection:Antibiotics will be used for bacterial infections, Antifungal medicines will be used for fungal pericarditis . Other medicines that may be used are:Corticosteroids such as prednisone (in some patients), \"Water pills\" (diuretics) to remove excess fluid . If the buildup of fluid makes the heart function poorly, treatment may include:Draining the fluid from the sac. This procedure, called pericardiocentesis, may be done using an echocardiography-guided needle., Cutting a small hole (window) in the pericardium (subxiphoid pericardiotomy) to allow the infected fluid to drain into the abdominal cavity . Surgery called pericardiectomy may be needed if the pericarditis is long-lasting, comes back after treatment, or causes scarring or tightening of the tissue around the heart. The operation involves cutting or removing part of the pericardium. "}, "Piperonyl butoxide with pyrethrins poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Chest pain", "Coma", "Convulsions", "Difficulty breathing", "Eye irritation if it touches the eyes", "Muscle weakness", "Nausea", "Rash (allergic reaction)", "Salivation", "Shortness of breath", "Skin hypersensitivity", "Sneezing", "Tremors", "Wheezing", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Keep all medicines in child-proof bottles and toxins in their original containers, labeled, and out of the reach of children."}, "Pleurisy": {"description": "Pleurisy is inflammation of the lining of the lungs and chest (the pleura) that leads to chest pain when you take a breath or cough.", "Possible Complications": "Breathing difficulty, Collapsed lung due to thoracentesis, Complications from the original illness. ", "Symptoms": ["Coughing", "Shortness of breath", "Rapid breathing"], "Exams and Tests": "When you have pleurisy, the normally smooth surfaces lining the lung (the pleura) become rough. They rub together with each breath. This results in a rough, grating sound called a friction rub. Your health care provider can hear this sound with the stethoscope.The health care provider may\u00a0order the following tests:CBC, X-ray of the chest, CT scan of the chest, Ultrasound of the chest, Thoracentesis. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on\u00a0the cause of\u00a0the pleurisy. Bacterial infections are treated with antibiotics. Surgery may be needed to drain infected fluid from the lungs.Viral infections normally run their course without medicines. Taking acetaminophen or ibuprofen can help reduce pain.", "Causes": "Pleurisy may develop when you have lung inflammation due to infection, such as a viral infection,\u00a0pneumonia or tuberculosis. It may also occur with:Asbestos-related disease, Certain cancers, Chest trauma, Pulmonary embolus, Rheumatoid arthritis, Lupus. ", "Prevention": "Early treatment of bacterial respiratory infections can prevent pleurisy."}, "Phenindamine overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Inability to urinate", "Difficulty urinating", "Blurred vision", "Dilated (enlarged) pupils", "Dry mouth", "Ringing of the ears", "Rapid heartbeat", "Increased blood pressure", "Agitation", "Coma", "Convulsions (seizures)", "Delirium", "Disorientation ", "Drowsiness", "Fever", "Hallucinations", "Nervousness", "Tremor", "Unsteadiness", "Weakness", "Flushed skin", "Nausea", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Pseudotumor cerebri": {"description": "Pseudotumor cerebri is a condition in which the pressure inside the skull is increased. The brain is affected in a way\u00a0that the condition\u00a0appears to be -- but is not -- a tumor.", "Possible Complications": "Vision loss is a serious complication of this condition.", "Symptoms": ["Headache", "Blurred vision", "Buzzing sound in the ears (tinnitus)", "Dizziness", "Double vision (diplopia)", "Nausea", "Vision loss"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam. Signs of this condition include:Bulging anterior fontanelle, Increased head size, Swelling of the optic nerve in the back of the eye (papilledema). Even though there is increased pressure in the skull, there is no change in alertness.Tests that may be done include:CT scan of the head, Eye exam, including visual field testing, MRI of the head with MR venography, Lumbar puncture (spinal tap) . Diagnosis is made when other health conditions are ruled out. Several conditions may cause increased pressure in the skull, including:Hydrocephalus, Tumor, Venous sinus thrombosis. ", "Treatment": "Treatment is aimed at the cause of the pseudotumor.A lumbar puncture can help relieve pressure in the brain and prevent vision problems.Other treatments may include:Fluid or salt restriction, Medications such as corticosteroids, acetazolamide, and furosemide, Shunting procedures to relieve pressure from spinal fluid buildup, Surgery to relieve pressure on the optic nerve, Weight loss. Patients will need to have their vision closely monitored. There can be vision loss, which is sometimes permanent. Follow-up MRI or CT scans may be done to rule out hidden cancer.", "Causes": "The condition occurs more often in women than men, especially in obese women who are about to go through menopause. It is rare in infants, but can occur in children.The cause is unknown.Certain medicines can increase your risk\u00a0of this condition. These medicines include:Birth control pills, Cyclosporine, Isotretinoin, Minocycline, Nalidixic acid, Nitrofurantoin, Phenytoin, Steroids (starting or stopping them), Sulfa drugs, Tamoxifen, Tetracycline, Vitamin A. The following factors are also related to this condition:Addison disease, Chronic kidney failure, Cushing's disease, Hypoparathyroidism, Iron deficiency anemia, Obesity, Onset of menstruation (menarche), Pregnancy. "}, "Pancreatic islet cell tumor": {"description": "A pancreatic islet cell tumor is a rare tumor of the pancreas that starts from a type of cell called the islet cell.", "Possible Complications": "\r\n  Diabetes\r\n  , \r\n  Hormone crises (if the tumor releases certain types of hormones)\r\n  , \r\n  \r\n  Severe low blood sugar (from insulinomas)\r\n  \r\n  , \r\n  Severe ulcers in the stomach and small intestine (from gastrinomas)\r\n  , \r\n  Spread of the tumor to the liver\r\n  . ", "Symptoms": ["\r\n  Feeling tired or weak\r\n  ", "\r\n  Shaking or sweating\r\n  ", "\r\n  Headache\r\n  ", "\r\n  Hunger\r\n  ", "\r\n  Nervousness, anxiety, or feeling irritable\r\n  ", "\r\n  Unclear thinking or feeling uneasy\r\n  ", "\r\n  Double or blurry vision\r\n  ", "\r\n  Fast or pounding heartbeat\r\n  ", "\r\n  Abdominal pain\r\n  ", "\r\n  Diarrhea\r\n  ", "\r\n  Ulcers in the stomach and small bowel\r\n  ", "\r\n  Vomiting blood (occasionally)\r\n  ", "\r\n  Diabetes\r\n  ", "Red, blistery rash in the groin or buttocks", "Weight loss", "Frequent urination and thirst "], "Exams and Tests": "Blood tests may vary depending upon the symptoms, but may include:Fasting glucose level, Gastrin level, Glucose tolerance test, Secretin stimulation test for pancreas, Blood glucagon level, Blood insulin C-peptide, Blood insulin level . Imaging tests may be done:Abdominal CT scan, Abdominal ultrasound, Endoscopic ultrasound, MRI of abdomen. A blood sample may also be taken from a vein in the pancreas for testing.Sometimes, surgery is needed to diagnose and treat this condition. During this procedure, the surgeon examines the pancreas by hand and with ultrasound.", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the type of tumor and if it is cancerous. Cancerous tumors can grow quickly and spread to other organs. They may not be treatable. Tumors are usually removed with surgery, if possible.If cancer cells spread to the liver, a part of the liver may also be removed, if possible. If the cancer is widespread, chemotherapy may be used to try and shrink the tumors.If the abnormal production of hormones is causing symptoms, you may receive medications to counteract their effects. For example, with gastrinomas, the overproduction of gastrin leads to too much acid in the stomach. Medications that block stomach acid release can reduce symptoms.", "Causes": "In the healthy pancreas, cells called islet cells produce hormones that regulate a several bodily functions. These include blood sugar level and the production of stomach acid.Tumors that arise from islet cells of the pancreas can also produce a variety of hormones, which can lead to specific symptoms. Pancreatic islet cell tumors can be noncancerous (benign) or cancerous (malignant).Islet cell tumors include:Gastrinoma (Zollinger-Ellison syndrome), Glucagonoma Insulinoma. A family history of multiple endocrine neoplasia, type I (MEN I) is a risk factor for the development of islet cell tumors.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention for these tumors."}, "Premenstrual syndrome": {"Symptoms": ["Bloating or feeling gassy", "Breast tenderness", "Clumsiness", "Constipation or diarrhea", "Food cravings", "Headache", "Less tolerance for noises and lights ", "Confusion, trouble concentrating, or forgetfulness", "Fatigue and feeling slow or sluggish", "Feelings of sadness or hopelessness", "Feelings of tension, anxiety, or edginess", "Irritable, hostile, or aggressive behavior, with outbursts of anger toward self or others", "Loss of sex drive (may increase in some women)", "Mood swings", "Poor judgment", "Poor self-image, feelings of guilt, or increased fears", "Sleep problems (sleeping too much or too little) "], "Exams and Tests": "There are no specific signs or lab tests that can diagnose PMS. To rule out other\u00a0possible causes of symptoms, it is important to have a: Complete medical history, Physical exam (including pelvic exam). A symptom calendar can help women identify the most troublesome symptoms and confirm the diagnosis of PMS.", "description": "Premenstrual syndrome (PMS) refers to a wide range of symptoms that:", "Causes": "The exact cause of PMS is not known. Changes in brain hormone levels may play a role, but this has not been proven. Women with premenstrual syndrome may also respond differently to these hormones.PMS may be related to social, cultural, biological, and psychological factors.Up to 3 out of every 4 women experience PMS symptoms during their childbearing years. PMS occurs more often in women:Between their late 20s and late 40s, Who have had at least one child, With a personal or family history of major depression, With a history of postpartum depression or an affective mood disorder . The symptoms often get worse in a woman's late 30s and 40s as she approaches the transition to menopause.", "Treatment": "Keep a daily diary or log for at least 3 months. Record the type of symptoms you have, how severe they are, and how long they last. This symptom diary will help you and your health care provider find the best treatment.A healthy lifestyle is the first step to managing PMS. For many women, lifestyle approaches are often enough to control symptoms.Drink plenty of fluids (water or juice, not soft drinks, alcohol, or other beverages with caffeine) to help reduce bloating, fluid retention, and other symptoms., Eat frequent, small meals. Do not go more than 3 hours between snacks. Avoid overeating., Eat a balanced diet with extra whole grains, vegetables, and fruit, and limited or no salt and sugar., Your health care provider may recommend that you take nutritional supplements. Vitamin B6, calcium, and magnesium are commonly used. Tryptophan, which is found in dairy products, may also be helpful., Get regular aerobic exercise throughout the month to help reduce the severity of PMS symptoms. Exercise more often and harder during the weeks when you have PMS., Try changing your nighttime sleep habits before taking drugs for insomnia. . Aspirin, ibuprofen, and other NSAIDs may be prescribed for headache, backache, menstrual cramping, and breast tenderness.Birth control pills may decrease or increase PMS symptoms.In severe cases, medicines to treat depression may be helpful. Antidepressants known as selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors (SSRIs) are often tried first, and have been shown to be very helpful. You may also want to seek the advice of a counselor or therapist. Other medicines that you may use include:Anti-anxiety drugs for severe anxiety, Diuretics (may help with severe fluid retention, which causes bloating, breast tenderness, and weight gain) . "}, "Pyogenic liver abscess": {"description": "Pyogenic liver abscess is a pus-filled area in the liver.", "Possible Complications": "Life-threatening sepsis can develop.", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain (lower right)", "Pain in the right upper abdomen (more common) or throughout the abdomen (less common)", "Clay-colored stools", "Dark urine", "Fever, chills", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea, vomiting", "Unintentional weight loss", "Weakness", "Yellow skin (jaundice) "], "Exams and Tests": "Tests may include:Abdominal CT scan, Abdominal ultrasound, Bilirubin blood test, Blood culture for bacteria, Complete blood count (CBC), Liver biopsy, Liver function tests. ", "Treatment": "Treatment usually consists of placing a tube through the skin to drain the abscess. Less often, surgery is required. You will also receive antibiotics for about 4 - 6 weeks. Sometimes, antibiotics alone can cure the infection.", "Causes": "There are many potential causes of liver abscesses, including:Abdominal infection, such as appendicitis, diverticulitis, or a perforated bowel, Infection in the blood, Infection of the bile draining tubes, Recent endoscopy of the bile draining tubes, Trauma that damages the liver. The most common bacteria that cause liver abscesses are:Escherichia coli, Bacteroides, Enterococcus, Klebsiella pneumoniae, Staphylococcus aureus, Streptococcus. In most cases, more than one type of bacteria is found.", "Prevention": "Prompt treatment of abdominal and other infections may reduce the risk of developing a liver abscess, but most cases are not preventable."}, "Postpartum depression": {"description": "Postpartum depression is moderate to severe depression in a woman after she has given birth. It may occur soon after delivery or up to a year later. Most of the time, it occurs within the first 3 months after delivery.", "Possible Complications": "Left untreated, postpartum depression can last for months or years.\u00a0The potential long-term complications are the same as in major depression. Untreated postpartum depression may put you at risk of harming yourself or your baby. ", "Symptoms": ["Agitation or irritability", "Changes in appetite", "Feelings\u00a0of worthlessness or guilt", "Feeling like you're\u00a0withdrawn or unconnected", "Lack of pleasure or interest in most or all activities", "Loss of concentration", "Loss of energy", "Problems doing tasks at home or work", "Significant anxiety", "Thoughts of death or suicide", "Trouble sleeping ", "Be unable to care for herself or her baby", "Be afraid to be alone with her baby", "Have negative feelings toward the baby or even think about harming the baby (Although these feelings are scary, they are almost never acted on. Still you should tell your doctor about them right away.)", "Worry intensely about the baby, or have little interest in the baby"], "Exams and Tests": "There is no single test to diagnose postpartum depression. Diagnosis is based on the symptoms you describe to your doctor or nurse.Women with postpartum depression should have blood tests to screen for medical causes of depression.", "Treatment": "A new mother who has any symptoms of postpartum depression should contact\u00a0her doctor or nurse right away to get help.Here are some other helpful tips:Ask your partner, family, and friends for help with the baby's needs and in the home., Don't hide your feelings. Talk about them with your partner, family, and friends., Don't make any major life changes during pregnancy or right after giving birth., Don't try to do too much, or to be perfect., Make time to go out, visit friends, or spend time alone with your partner., Rest as much as you can. Sleep when the baby is sleeping., Talk with other mothers or join a support group.. The treatment for depression after birth often includes medication, therapy, or both.\u00a0Breastfeeding will play a role in what medicine your doctor recommends. You may be\u00a0referred to a mental health specialist. Cognitive behavioral therapy (CBT) and interpersonal therapy (IPT) are types of talk therapy that often help postpartum depression.Support groups may be helpful, but they should not replace medication or talk therapy if you have postpartum depression.Having good social support from family, friends, and coworkers may help reduce the seriousness of postpartum depression.", "Causes": "The exact causes of postpartum depression are unknown. Changes in hormone levels during and after pregnancy may affect a woman\u2019s mood. Many non-hormonal factors may also affect mood during this period:Changes in your body from pregnancy and delivery, Changes in work and social relationships, Having less time and freedom for yourself, Lack of sleep, Worries about your ability to be a good mother. You may have a higher chance of postpartum depression if you:Are under age 20, Currently abuse alcohol, take illegal substances, or smoke (these also cause serious health risks for the baby), Did not plan the pregnancy, or had mixed feelings about the pregnancy, Had depression, bipolar disorder, or an anxiety disorder before your pregnancy, or with a past pregnancy, Had a stressful event during the pregnancy or delivery, including personal illness, death or illness of a loved one, a difficult or emergency delivery, premature delivery, or illness or birth defect in the baby, Have a close family member who has had depression or anxiety, Have a poor relationship with your significant other or are single, Have money or housing problems , Have little support from family, friends, or your spouse or partner. ", "Prevention": "Having good social support from family, friends, and coworkers may help reduce the seriousness of postpartum depression, but may not prevent it.Women who had postpartum depression after past pregnancies may be less likely to develop postpartum depression again if they start taking antidepressant medications after they deliver. Talk therapy may also be helpful in preventing depression. "}, "Panic disorder": {"description": "Panic disorder is a type of anxiety disorder in which you have repeated attacks of intense fear that something bad will happen.", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain or discomfort", "Dizziness or faintness", "Fear of dying", "Fear of losing control or impending doom", "Feeling of choking", "Feelings of detachment", "Feelings of unreality", "Nausea or upset stomach", "Numbness or tingling in the hands, feet, or face", "Palpitations, fast heart rate, or pounding heart", "Sensation of shortness of breath or smothering", "Sweating, chills, or hot flashes", "Trembling or shaking "], "Exams and Tests": "Many people with panic disorder first seek treatment in the emergency room. This is because the panic attack often feels like a heart attack.The health care provider will perform a physical exam and a mental health assessment.Blood tests will be done. Other medical disorders must be ruled out before panic disorder can be diagnosed. Disorders related to substance use\u00a0will be considered because symptoms can\u00a0resemble panic attacks.", "Causes": "The cause is unknown. Genes may play a role. Other family members may have the disorder. But panic disorder often occurs when there is no family history.Panic disorder is twice as common in women as it is in men. Symptoms often begin before age 25, but may occur in the mid-30s. Children can also have panic disorder, but it is often not diagnosed until they are older.", "Prevention": "If you get panic attacks, avoid the following:Alcohol, Stimulants such as caffeine and cocaine. These substances may trigger or worsen the symptoms.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to help you function well during everyday life. Using both medicines and talk therapy works best.Types of medicines used to treat panic disorder:Antidepressant medicines called selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors (SSRIs) are most\u00a0often prescribed for panic disorder. , Sedatives are medicines that relax you. These may be used for a short time. There is a risk of becoming dependent on these medicines., Antiseizure\u00a0medicines are\u00a0sometimes used\u00a0in severe cases.. Your symptoms should slowly get better over a few weeks. Do not stop taking your medicine or change the amount you are taking\u00a0(dosage) without talking with your health care provider.Talk therapy (cognitive-behavioral therapy, or CBT)\u00a0helps you understand your behaviors and how to change them. During therapy you will learn how to:Understand and control distorted views of life stressors, such as other people's behavior or life events., Recognize and replace thoughts that cause panic and decrease the sense of helplessness., Manage stress and relax when symptoms occur., Imagine the things that cause the anxiety, starting with the least fearful. Practice in real-life situations\u00a0to help you overcome your fears. . The following may also help reduce the number or severity of panic attacks:Not drinking alcohol, Eating at regular times, Getting plenty of exercise\u00a0, Getting enough sleep, Reducing or avoiding caffeine, certain cold medicines, and stimulants . "}}